Vol. I.1
THE JOURNEY.
CHAPTER I.
Westward, ho!
The
ordinary causes of seeking new homes in the West
are well known. There, it is sometimes expected, a broken
fortune may be repaired, or one here too narrow, become, by
change of circumstances, ample enough for a growing family,
or a larger ambition. Indolence leads some thither, a
distaste
of conventional trammels others; while not a few hope
to find a theatre, where small talents and learning may
figure to better advantage.
But some are led away to the West by poetical
inducements
.
To persons of tender sensibilities and ardent
enthusiasm
,
that is a land of beautiful visions; and its gorgeous
clouds, like drapery around the golden sunsets, is a curtain
veiling other and more distant glories. Such persons are
not insensible to worldly advantages, yet they abandon not
the East from the love of gain. They are rather evoked
and charmed away by a potent, if an imaginary spirit,
resident
in that world of hoary wilds. From the prairie
spreading
its grassy and flowery plains to meet the dim horizon,
from the river rolling a flood across half a continent, from
the forest dark and venerable with the growth of many
centuries
,
come, with every passing cloud and wind, the words
of resistless invitation; till the enchanted, concealing the
true causes, or pretending others, depart for the West. They
are weary of a prosaic life; they go to find a poetic one.
To much of this day-dreaming spirit is the world indebted
for the author's sojourn of seven and a half years in a part
of what was, at the time of this journey, the
Far West
.
In early boyhood, Mr. Carlton was no ordinary dreamer:
nay, in the sunshine, as by moonlight, shadows of branching
antlers and flint-headed arrows caused many a darkness in
his path, as visionary deer bounded away before the visionary
hunter. At school a boy of kindred soul occupied the
adjacent
seat; and this boy's father had left him, as was then
believed, countless acres of rough mountains and woods
undesecrated by civilized feet. How far away this sylvan
territory may have been, was never asked, but it was near
enough and easy of access to day-dreamers; for we had
actually devised a plan to steal off secretly at some
favourable
moment and find a joyous life in that forest elysium.
Before the external eye lay, indeed, Dilworth, his columns
of spelling in dreadful array of single, double and treble
files, surrounded by dog-ears curling up from the four
corners
of the dirt-stained page; but the inner eye saw them
not. And if our lips moved, it was not to call over the
names of the detested words; no, it was in mysterious
whispers:we were wrapt in a vision, and talked of bark
huts and bows and arrowsay, we were setting dead-falls
and snares, and arranging the most feasible plans for the
woods and the mountains.
Such talks would, indeed, begin, and for a while, continue
so like the inarticulate buzz and hum of an old-fashioned
school-boy getting by heart, as to awaken no suspicion
in Master Strap. As enthusiasm, however, kindled, tones
became better defined and words more and more articulate.
Then ensued, first a very ominous and death-like stillness
in all parts of the school-room except ours, and thenthe
sudden touch of a wand came that broke a deep spell, and
alas! alas! awoke us to our spelling! Poor children! we
cried then for pain and disappointment! The hour came
when we shed more bitter tears at sorer disappointments,
and in a severer school! Even as I write there is a thrill
of boyhood in my soul, and in despite of philosophy tears
are trembling in my eyes;as if the
man
wept for the
crushed hopes of the
boy!
Experience may curb our yearning towards the earth, yet
even amidst the longings after immortality and the things
that eye hath not seen, there do remain hungerings and
thirstings after a possible and more perfect mundane state.
At the dawn, therefore, of manhood Mr. Carlton still hoped
to meet in the Far West visions embodied although
pictured
now in softer lights and graver colours. Shortly,
then, after our marriage in the first quarter of the present
century, after the honey-moon, indeed, but still within the
love and cottage period, Mrs. Carlton was persuaded to
exchange the tasteless and crowded solitude of
Philadelphia
for the entrancing and real loneliness of the wilds, and
the promenade of dead brick for the living carpet of the
natural meadow.
Having no immoveables, and our moveables being easily
transmuted into baggage, preparation was speedily made;
and then hands were grasped and cheeks kissed, alas! for
a long adieu:for when we returned with sober views and
chastened spirits, these, our first and best loved friends,
were sought, but they were not.
CHAPTER II.
Who goes there?A friend.
From
Philadelphia to Pittsburgh was formerly a journey
of days. Hence, to avoid travelling on the Sabbath it was
arranged by us to set out at three o'clock, A. M., on Monday.
A porter, however, of the stage-office aroused us at one
o'clock; when, hurrying on our garments, we were speedily
following our baggage trundled by the man, in that most
capacious of one-wheeled carriagesan antiquated
wheelbarrow
.
Arrived at the office, then kept by the Tomlinsons, the
agent affected to consider me and my wife as only one
person, and hence while I paid for two seats, he forced me
to pay for all my wife's baggage as extra;an imposition
only submitted to, because in running my eye over the names
booked as passengers, while the vexatious record of the
baggage was making, travelling associates were seen written
there who were too delightful to be lsot fora trifle. These
names were Colonel Wilmar of Kentucky and his cousin,
Miss Wilmar, of Philadelphia. In addition were three
strange names booked for Pittsburgh, a Mr. Smith and a
Mr. Brown, and also a name hardly legible, but which, if
I had decyphered correctly, seemed very like Clarence
strange, indeed, and yet familiar;surely it had been known
to me onceClarence?who could it be?
None of these persons had yet reached the office, (the
stage, however, being ready and waiting only their arrival,)
and when they did come, owing to the dim light of the
room and the bustle of an immediate movement towards the
stage, countenances could not be distinguished; and even
the Wilmars could not have been recognised without the
premonition of the way-bill.
The stages of that day wore no boots. In place of that
leathern convenience, was a cross-barred ornament
projecting
in the rear to receive the baggage or at least half of it.
This receptacle was called the Rack. Perhaps from
its wonderful adaptation for the utter demolition of what it
received, it was originally named Wreck; and this word,
in passing through the ordeal of vulgar pronunciation, where
it was called first Wrack, having lost its W, remained,
what indeed it so much resembledthe Rack. In binding
Mrs. Carlton's trunk to this curious engine, the porter broke
the rope, and her trunk falling down, the articles within, in
spite of an old lock and a rotten strap, burst from their
confinement
and were scattered over the street. The porter
was very prompt in his aid in gathering the articles and
securing the lid, and as some compensation for his blunder
and its consequences, he refused the usual fee of the
wheelbarrow
service. Of course he received now thanks for
generosity instead of rebukes for negligence: but on
inspecting
afterwards our trunk, the absence of a purse
containing
seven dollars and of a silver cup worth twice as
much, awakened suspicions of less honourable cause for the
porter's conduct.
Here then were, at the outset, extortion and theft, and
felt, too, as evils; but there was present a believing spirit
mingling sweetness with the wormwood. Ay! were we
not actually on our way to the land of vision! Surely no
such baseness is there! The sanctity of that Far West is
inviolate!
Inside, our stage was most judiciously filled with three
tiers. The lower tier was composed of saddle-bags, valises,
small trunks and carpet-bags; the second, of human beings
supported upright by an equal squeeze on all sides; and
then, on the condensed laps of the living tier, rested the
third tier, made up of extra cloaks, some band-boxes and
work-baskets, several spare hats in pasteboard cases, half
a dozen canes and umbrellas, and one fowling-piece done
up in green baize. Notwithstanding the great felicity of
this arrangement, the inquietude of the upper and lower
tiers when the stage first started, occasioned in the sentient
tier some inarticulate growling and a little half-smothered
cursing; which crusty symptoms, however, presently yielded
to a good-natured laugh at the perseverance with which Mr.
Brown remained on a French gentleman's foot, through a
misapprehension of a very polite and indirect request not to
stand therea laugh in which the parties themselves joined.
Our driver had, at the office, seated between two
way-passengers
with the curtain behind them dropped, given the
signal, when away dashed the horses; and then commenced
the inconsiderate restlessness of the internal baggage and
the ill-concealed surliness of the passengers. But at the
end of a few squares the stage suddenly stopped at a hotel,
when the door of the vehicle being instantly opened, the
space was filled with the head and shoulders of Mr. Brown,
who began as follows:
Ladies and gentlemen, you seem to be full in here, I
suppose it is no use to be looking for my seat in the dark
Sareresponded, evidently by the accent, a
Frenchman
,
and in a most complaisant and supplicatory tone
Sare, do not you
know
my
foote
is under yours?
No, sir,replied Mr. Brown standing up as well as
he could in the stage, and feeling about for some space.
Sare, do
not
you know my
foote
is under yours?
voice higher and quicker.
No, sir, I don't,surprised, but not budging.
Sare,
do
you not know my
foote
is under yours?on
the octave, and getting higher and more emphatic.
O! I beg your pardon, sir,do you mane I'm raelly
treading on your
fut?
without, however, moving off, but
generously waiting for information.
Yes! sare! I do!
Oh! I beg pardon, sirraelly I thought I was standing
on a carpet-bagwhen, satisfied he was wrong in his
conjecture, and that it was raelly the fut, Mr. Brown
instantly
removed the aggravating pressure.
Our friends thus introduced by the
foote
and the
fut
as the gentleman from France and the gentleman from
Ireland
,
were welcomed by no inaudible laughter, in which
they also participated, while at the moment the door was
violently slammed, and that instantly followed by a startling
crack of the impatient whip. This was of great advantage
to Mr. Brown, as it helped him to a seat somewhere; although
from some peevish expressions, he must have alighted on
other quarters as well as his own. All outcries and
growlings
,
however, occasioned by hats and bonnets innocently
dashed into neighbouring faces, or by small trunks unable
to keep their gravity, and elastic sticks and umbrellas that
rubbed angrily against tender ancles or poked smartly into
defenceless backs, all were drowned in the rattling thunder
of the rolling wheels; and the tiers, rather loosely packed
at first, were soon, by the ferocious and determined jerking
and plunging of the vehicle, shaken into one compact
quiescent
and democratical mass.
Unsuccessful attempts then came to sustain a general talk
on the weather, the time of reaching the breakfast, the hour
of the night, and the like novel and interesting topics; the
questions being commonly put, and the replies hazarded by
six or eight voices together, and in as many intervals of
pitch, from the grumbled bass to the most tremulous and
piteous treble. To these succeeded equally abortive efforts
to sustain duos and trios, till the whole performance of the
talk remained a solo. This performer, when day peeped
in upon us, proved to be a middle-aged and corpulent lady,
who sang out in a very peculiar and most penetrating tone;
herself both asking and answering, often categorically, but
for the most part in the guess and may be style of
recitativo
.
Encouraged by the silence of the company, the lady
at length in the same lofty strains sang out portions of her
own history, introducing the pleasing variations of
may-be-it-would
and may-be-it-would'ntI guessed and he
guessedand says I and says he, &c. The burden,
however, of the piece was this:it was her first trip to the
city, although from a little girl she had lived within thirty
milesbut her mother could never spare herand when
she married Jacob,
her
and
him
could never leave home
together, and Jacob, he would never let her go alone by
herself
,
being right down sarten she'd never come back again
alive or without some of her bones broken.
Soon, however, we began to go slowly and sadly over
the Schuylkill bridge, when something not unlike snoring
admonished the lady of our seeming inattention, and her
musical narrative suddenly ceased, like the sudden holding
up of a hard rain; and then all were quickly either
practising
sleep at random, or with troubled thoughts wandering
to the absent or indulging fitful dreams of the future.
Morning revealed by degrees the
incumbents
, and in very
imposing
attitudes. For instance, there was the
Frenchman
,his
head on the Irishman's shoulder, and keeping
pretty tolerable time to the music of the jolting carriage;
while the Irishman revived now and then by a desperate
lurch extra, as in atonement for his fault, made no attempt
to be rid of his burden, but slowly closing his eyes, nodded
away with his own head in the direction of our solo. But
all noddings in this book will be indulged by the classic
reader, who knows well enough:
Aliquando bonus dormitat Homerus.
The excellent Homer takes a nap now and then.
Fronting myself was a person with hands holding to a
strap pendent from the roof, his head inclined towards his
breast, and his hat fallen off, but intercepted by Col.
Wilmar
,
his sleeping neighbour. This stranger, on several
1*
elevations of his head, presented a countenance that set me
to recalling past scenes and associates, and I was in a fair
way of making some discovery, when all were fiercely
jerked into wakefulness by a most unnatural and savage
plunge of the stage, followed on the instant, like severe
lightning, by an explosion; the tiers becoming all vocal
with bless my soul'smy goodnesses!and vulgar
ouches! Above all, however, sounded this pathetic
remonstrance
in our talking lady's inimitable style:La!
Mister! if you aint nodded agin this here right bran new
bonnit of mine, till I vow if it aint as good as spiled! To
this no reply was permitted as the horses suddenly halted,
and a venerable and decent landlord having opened the door
of the carriage, requested us to alight, adding that the
stage
breakfasts here.
The
live
stock accordingly was unpacked and extricated
from the
dead
, no important damage being visible, except in
the bran new bonnit; and sure enough it was curiously
sloped contrary to nature, with an irregular concave in the front
and suitable enlargements sideways. Sceptics like Hume
would doubtless have raised a query, if the width was
entirely
owing to the noddings of the Irish gentleman, or the
very ample rotundity of the cherry-cheeked and good,
humoured face expanded within the bonnet; but Mr. Brown
himself at once admitted his inconsiderate butting as the
cause, and with every appearance of concern he busied
himself with assisting the matron to alight and looking after
her baskets and boxes. This so won on her, that when at
the first opportunity Mr. Brown attempted an apology and
condolence, he was interrupted by her sayingOh! never
mind it, Mister, it aint no odds no how, and I guess we can
soon
fix
it.
During our ablutions I caught the eye of the young
stranger
already named, fixed with an inquiring look on my face;
and then we both, towel in hand, gradually advanced, yet
embarrassed and hesitating as if both recollected the
incident
,
you thought it was me and I thought it was you, and
faith its nather of us, till, arrived at proper distance, he
extended his hand and hazarded the affirmative inquiry:
If I mistake not this is Robert Carlton!
My reply showed it
was
each of us:
Clarence! Charles Clarence!is it possible!is this
you!
Reader, this Charles Clarence was the identical boy of
the adjacent seat, whose enthusiasm for bark cabins and
forest life, like my own, had beguiled us of many a hateful
lesson, and gained for us many a
smart
application of birch
and leather in parts left defenceless by scant patterns of
primitive roundabouts!
Shortly after this, in the parlour of the Warren tavern, a
general introduction took place among the Pittsburgh
travellers
:
viz. Mr. Brown, Mr. Smith, Col. Wilmar and Miss
Wilmar, Mr. Clarence and Mr. and Mrs. Carlton; who all,
in due season, shall be more particularly introduced to our
readers, as the Party. At present we must obey the signal
for breakfast; that meal being really prepared for the
passengers
,
although, by metonomy, it was in old times said to
be for the
stage
.
CHAPTER III.
Hominem pagina nostra sapit.
Our page describes some gentlemen.
When
summoned to the stage by the driver's horn, it
seemed we had lost some way-passengers, room being thus
obtained for the lady of the bonnet; who, however, appeared
wearing the old article, having, with a corrected judgment,
consigned the damaged one to the band-box. So, also,
greater space was found for the French gentleman's foot,
who had, from apprehension of cold or from gout, so encased
his pedalic appendages in socks of carpet-stuff as to lead
a careless observer, even by day-light, to mistake his feet
for two of the many travelling bags on the floor.
Opportunity
also was afforded now of a more judicious disposal of
various rubbing, poking and punching articles, so that, aided
by a good breakfast and a morning cold but bright, we were
soon engaged in a conversation, general, easy and animated.
And now we may properly proceed to introduce the
gentlemen
of the party. Please then, reader, notice first that
pleasant-looking personage bowing so profoundly, and
evidently
anxious to win your favour. That ishem!that is
Robert Carlton, Esq. He takes the opportunity of soliciting
your company not only for the journey butall the way
through his two volumes. He would also say, it is his
purpose
to imitate Julius Csar occasionally, and use the third
instead of the first person singular, and to adopt now and
then, too, the regal style, in employing nominative
we
,
possessive
our
or
ours
, objective
us
. These imitations, it is
supposed, will give a very pleasing variety to the book,
enable
the author to utter complimentary things about Mr.
Carlton and his lady with greater freedom, and not run so
hard upon capital I's, or, in technical phrase, not exhaust
the printer's sorts.
This next gentleman is my friend Mr. Smith. Like so
many of the name, he was in all respects a worthy man, and
honoured, at the time, with a high station in the magistracy
of Pittsburgh. Our party shared his liberal hospitality there,
and since that hour we have been quite partial in our regard
of the Smiths, and their relatives the Smythes. Happy
partiality this; for if all classed and sorted under that
grand-common-proper-noun take a corresponding liking for
our author, where will be the limit to the number of copies
and editions?
Ladies and gentlemen, this is Mr. Brown. He was an
Irish gentleman, had travelled extensively in Europe, and
had the manners of the best society. At present he was at
the commencement of a tour, to be extended over most of the
United States. Among his oddities, not the least was his
odd person, entitling him to Noah Webster's word,
lengthy
,
he appearing alternately all body, when one looked up, and
all legs, when one looked down:a peculiarity I am led the
more to notice, as I found his elongation very unfavourable
to skiff navigation afterwards on the Ohio river; and indeed
it put us in jeopardy, if not of life, yet of immersion. In
spite of all his reading(Mr. Boz, however, had not then
published his American notes)Mr. Brown was remarkably
ignorant of our country, expressing unfeigned surprise that
our road, only twenty miles from Philadelphia, in place of
leading into dark forests filled with wild beasts and naked
savages, did really run amid open farms and smiling scenery,
abounding with domestic animals and civilized
agriculturalists
.
Pittsburgh was his
uliima Thule
, beyond which he
expected to find
no place
, or even something worse.
Distinguished
,
however, for his agreeable manners and frank
disposition, cheerfully confessing and laughing at his own
mistakes, he became of course a universal favourite.
Col. Wilmar was, however, my beau ideal of a gentleman.
To a manly beauty he had added the qualities of good
education
and the grace of many accomplishments. He was
courteous, brave and even chivalrous; his attention to others
resulting from benevolence and not from prudence. Ladies
under his care, (and that, from a knowledge of his character,
was often the case,) were regarded by him more as sisters
having claims on a brother's attentions, than as strangers
committed to his trust. With pleasure we thought such a
specimen of our citizens could be contemplated by Mr.
Brown; and Mr. Carlton rejoiced that he knew one worthy
to live in the land of poetry and dreams: for the colonel
was an inhabitant of the West.
In the last war with Great Britain, Col. Wilmar, then a
very young man, commenced his military career as a
volunteer
,
and after being actively engaged in many skirmishes
and other warlike enterprises, he served finally as an aid to
Gen. Winchester in the disastrous battle of the river Raisin.
Taken prisoner he escaped the massacre made of his
associates
by the Indians, and was then marched to Fort Malden;
whence, after a detention of some months, he was restored
to his home. Here, his military feelings being yet dominant,
he was soon honoured with an important command among
the militia and volunteers of Kentuckyhis native State.
When we became, as a party, the sole occupants of the
stage, and, in the ascent of the mountains, had opportunities
for prolonged narratives, among other matters the colonel
gave, at our request, a sketch of his military adventures.
And one story may properly find a place here by way of
episode
in the description of my companions.
But hark!some one hails our driver, and the stage
stops
Law! bless my senses, if there aint Jacob in his cart
come out for me at the end of our road!was the
immediate
exclamation that burst from our heroine. The
unexpected
sight of her husband and the thoughts of home,
(where we learned she expected to see little Peggy,)
were too powerful for the prudent resolves or secret awe
that had, for the last hour, kept our dame silent; and out
rushed nature's feelings as above described. Nor did the
torrent exhaust itself at one gushingit paused and then
continued:
I vow I thought he'd a met one at the tavern in
Dowington
but
Jacob's so monstrous afeard of a body's gittin
hurt, that he's staid out hereI do wonder how he left
them all at home?
In the meantime, Mr. Brown, pleased with her
self-satisfaction
,
good nature, and forgiving temper, had got out
and stood receiving first the band-box containing the
pummelled
bonnet, and then aiding its owner to alight; for
which he received a cordial thankee, sir, and a pressing
invitation to call and see her and Jacob if ever he should
be travelling that way again.
All that could be heard of the conjugal dialogue was
Well I vow, Jacob, who'd a thought of seeing you at our
road!to which was answeredAnd so, Peggy,the
rest being lost in the renewed thunder of our wheels.
Jacob was evidently pleased to receive Peggy safe; and
his calm quaker-like dress and countenance seemed to
look and say, he was by no means the Mercury or chief
speaker in the domestic circle.
Return we to our episode, Col. Wilmar's narrative.
Among our volunteers was a young man, a tailor I
believe
,
but in all respects decidedly our best soldier. He
was tall, well proportioned, and fit for any feat of strength
and dexterity; besides, he was observant of every duty, and
ready at any time for either parade or battle. Without
being myself a member of the church, I believe the many
excellences of his brave, benevolent, and self-sacrificing
spirit were owing mainly to religious principles. He was, I
know, a professor of religion.
In one battle at the Raisin, he was slightly wounded
a knowledge of which must have led to the tragedy that
followed our capture. Turner, for that was the soldier's
name, did, indeed, try to conceal his wound from the
Indians
;
and I well know it did not retard his progress: but
unless our captors were determined to avoid even the
possibility
of any hinderance, we never could conjecture any
other plausible reason for what followed.
My friend was in the same division of prisoners with
myself, the assistant surgeon and several of our townsmen;
and at night when we halted, Turner was seated near me at
the fire in the woods, while the Indians dealt us out a little
bread and beef. On my left, and nearly opposite the poor
fellow, I saw, for some time, an Indian who kept his eye
on Turner, with an expression that looked like mischief;
and then I saw the savage, as if by stealth, grasp his
tomahawk
and move round without any noise till he came up
immediately behind us. Why, I cannot tell, but perhaps
Turner, too, had noticed all this; he sprang, however,
suddenly to his feet and with the most amazing activity,
arrested the blow of the weapon with his arm, receiving a
deep gash in his shoulder, and thus warding off the blow
from his head. And then, gentlemen, that wounded man
darted upon that Indian, and actually wrested the hatchet
from his hand, and in the next instant raised it to aim a
deadly blow at his enemy's headay, gentlemen, I saw
the hatchet tremble in his graspI saw, as I think, the
weapon almost descending with its fatal strokeand yet,
at that very moment, it was stayedand the next it was
thrown down upon the ground.
For on the instant our surgeon, who had noticed
the Indians drawing their knives and hatchets for our
massacre, cried outTurner! Turner! for God's sake,
don't kill him!And then, Turner, our noble, godlike
comrade, comprehending at a glance our danger, looked
up a moment, as if in prayerflinging, at the same time,
the weapon on the earth. And there he stood!his arms
calmly folded across his breast, and with
such
a look of
self-devotion and Christian resignation, until the
demon-like
savage having picked up the hatchet, approached his
victim, and buried it, with one terrific blow, deep in his
head!
A tear trembled in the colonel's eye as he concluded;
and although many years have passed since I heard him
tell this story, I am moved when I think of that godlike
warrior so dying!but then the story was better told.
Charles Clarence my new found friend was an orphan.
His parents both had died, he being scarcely three years
old, leaving him however, heir nominally to large and
valuable
tracts of land. But he succeeded to nothing, at last,
more valuable than a very large mass of useless papers;
unless we except some trinkets indicative of an ancient and
wealthy family: and even these the sole mementos of
departed parents were sacrificed to supply the urgent
necessities
of Clarence, when he found himself a deserted boy.
Some relatives did not then know of his existenceand
some only found it out when he did not need either
recognition
or assistance. A maternal uncle, however, in the
far South, prevented by sudden death from adopting my
friend as a son, had left him a legacy: and from this he
had been liberally educated, with many interruptions,
however, and many distressing inconveniences, owing to
the interception of his small dividends on some occasions
by dishonest agents.
Still the apparent neglect of some relatives, the want of
a guardian and other seeming evils had been of service to
Clarence in giving stamina to his character, wanting,
naturally
,
in bone and sinew. Even the interruption of his
studies had led to several voyages and journeys with peril
indeed, to life and health, but with advantage to his mind
and manners. His fondness, too, for adventure was
indulged
,
and he was rendered thus a more interesting and
instructive companion and friend. Sobered, it is true, by
disappointment and grief, my friend was; yet I found him
now sufficiently sanguine and confident to venture on
enterprises
considered praiseworthy, if one succeed, but not
so, if unsuccessful. Indeed but lately had he returned
from a visit to the Falls of Niagara, in which from want
of money, he had been induced to use the vulgar mare
that required only rest and no oatsin other words, with a
knapsack on his back he had, in company with two
associates
,
made a tour of three hundred miles on foot. He had
also travelled many thousand miles in various directions
and in various capacities, so that he abounded in
anecdotes
and incidents, which he could so relate as to make
himself a companion for a journey by no means
undesirable
.
At this very time Clarence was going to Kentucky on a
very grand adventure:he was on his way to be married.
When only sixteen years of age he became affianced to a
maiden, whose family shortly after emigrating to the
West, thus, for a long time, had separated the lovers.
But now at the end of seven years, during which the
parties
had never met, Clarence was going as he pretended to
see the family; but in reality, reader, to marry his
sweet-heart
.
Ladies! will you please note this as an offset to
instances of faithlessness in our sex? And were not
these specimens of long cherished love and unbroken faith
worthy the poetical land?
But what lights in the distance? Oh! that is
Lancaster
,
and there we eat supper and change stages: excuse
me, then, reader, we have no time to introduce our ladies.
Supper ended, we found a
new
stage, if by new is
understood
another
, for old enough it was and a
size
(?) less
than our old stage;which after all was nearly a new one.
True, excepting monsieur, we had before stopping let out
all our way passengers; but fortunately on attempting to
get in ourselves now, we discovered enough new way
passengers
not only to take the seats of the former ones, but
our seats alsoso remarkably accommodating were the
old-fashioned
accommodation
stages and stage owners!
Alas! for us that night! that it was before the era of
caoutchouc or gum elastic!stages' bodies of that could
have so easily become, almost at will, a size larger and a
size less, expanding and contracting as passengers got in
or out! Oh! the crammingthe jammingthe bumping
about of that night! How we practiced the indirect style of
discontent and cowardice, in giving it to the intruders over
the shoulders of stage owners, and agents, and drivers, and
horses! And how that crazy, rattling, rickety, old
machine
rolled and pitched and flapped its curtains and
walloped
us for the abuse, till we all were quashed, bruised,
and mellowed into a quaking lump of passive, untalking,
sullen victims!
CHAPTER IV.
Pshaw!
Dashed
away from the hotel the stage with such
vengeance
and mischief in the speed that the shops ran
backward
in alarm and lights streamed mere ribbons of fire, as
when urchins whirl an ignited stick! Discontent, therefore,
found a present alleviation in the belief that such driving,
by landing us in Harrisburg speedily, would soon terminate
our discomforts. But the winged horses, once beyond
Lancaster, turned again into hoofy quadrupeds moving
nearly
three miles per hour! And then the watering places!
the warming places!the letting out places!the
letting
in places!the grog stations!and above all! the
post-offices!and oh! the marvellous multiplication of
extra drivers!and extra driver's friends!and extra
hostlers!it was like the sudden increase of bugs that
wait for the darkness before they take wing! And then the
flavour of the stable considerately tempered with the smell
of ginsling and apple whiskey!both odours occasionally
overpowered by the fragrance of cigars bought six for a
penny!
At first, so decided a growl arose from the imprisoned
travellers whenever a cigar was lighted, that the smoking
tobacco was at once cast away; but the rising of the
numberless
other gases, soon taught us of two evils to bear
the least, and the cigars were finally tolerated to the last
puff.
And then the talk on the driver's seat!how interesting
and refreshing!For instance, the colloquies about Jake!
and Ike! and Nance! and Poll! The talk, too, first
about
the horses, and then the talk
with
the horses; on which
latter
occasions the four legged people were kindly addressed
by their Christian names and complimented with an
encomiastic
flourish and cut of the lash. To these favours the
answer was commonly an audible and impatient swing of
horse tails; sometimes, however, it came in form of a
sudden and malicious, dislocating jerk of the stage; and
sometimes, I am sorry to add, the answer was altogether
disrespectful, indicating an indulged and pampered favourite.
Within the den, the ominous pop, at irregular intervals,
(but not like angel's visits in the number and length,) and
the smell of fresh brandy, intimated dealings with evil spirits,
and that some carried bacchanalian pocket pistolsmore
fatal even and much nastier than the powder and bullet
machines used in other murders and suicides. Olfactories
were regaled also with essence of peppermint, spicy
gingerbread
,
and unctuous cold sausage; such and other
delicacies
being used by different inmates to beguile hunger
and tedium.
At length a jew pedlar with a design of selling the
article
as well as gratifying a musical penchant, exhibited
not to our eyes, it was an Egyptian night withinbut to
our ears, a musical snuff box, if not enchanting yet
certainly
enchanted, as it possessed the art of self-winding, to
judge from the endless and merciless repetitions and
alternations
of the Copenhagen Waltz and Yankee Doodle. Its
tinkling, however, was ultimately drowned by a more
powerful musician on the driver's seat. This was an
extra
driver, so wrought up by the pedlar's box, that his
feelings
could be no longer controlled, but suddenly exploded
with the most startling effect in the following exquisite lyric
or ballad. Perhaps the words were not extempore, yet
from the variations of the wondrous hum-drum fitted to
them, and the prolongation and shortening of notes, and a
peculiar
slurry
way to bring in several syllables to one note,
it may be supposed our songster chose not to halt or stump
from any defect of memory.
The Extra-Driver's Song
.
Come all ye young people, I'm going for to sing,
Consarnin Molly Edwards and her lovyer Peter King,
How this young woman did break her lovyer's heart,
And when he went and hung hisself how hern did in her smart.
This Molly Edwar dsshe did keep the turnpike gate,
And travilyers allowed her the most puttiest in our state,
But Peter for a livin he did foller the drovyer's life,
And Molly she did promise him she'd go and be his wife.
So Peter he to Molly goes as he cums through the gate,
And says, says he, oh! Molly, why do you make me wait,
I'm done a drovin hossis and come a courtin you,
Why do you sarve me so, as I'm your lovyer true?
Then Molly she toss'd up her nose and tuk the drovyer's toll,
But Pete he goes and hangs hisself that night unto a pole,
And Molly said, says she, I wish I'd been his wife,
And Pete he come and hanted her the rest of all her life.
The performance, rapturously encored ex animo by the
drivers and some cognate spirits within, but mischievously,
it is to be feared, by Mr. Carlton, Col. Wilmar and the
gentlemen of the party, was handsomely repeated and then
succeeded by other poems and tunes equally affecting, but
which we shall not record.
So passed that memorable night, till at long, very long
last we reached the suburbs of Harrisburgh. Here,
whether
the horses smelled oats, or the road was better, or
the driver would eradicate doubts about his team, expressed
by us every half mile lately, here we commenced going
not
like
thunder but certainly
in
thunder and earthquake,
till in a few moments the carriage stopped at the hotel.
And this was where the
stage
was to sleepbut, alas! it
lacked now only one hour of the time when we must
proceed
on our journey anew! The vehicle, however,
disgorged
its cramming over the pavement; and then, how
all the people, with countless bags, boxes, cloaks, sticks,
umbrellas, baskets, bandboxes, hatboxes, valises, &c., &c.,
had been or could be again stowed in that humming-bird's
nest of a stage, seemed to require a nice geometrical
calculation
.
Pack the inhabitants of our globe stage-fashion
by means of dishonest agents and greedy owners, and be
assured, a less number of acres would serve for our
accommodation
than is generally supposed.
It was arranged now that our two ladies should share
one bed at 25 cents, and take each 12 cents worth of
sleep in an hour, the gentlemen to snooze gratuitously on the
settees in the bar room; and it is wonderful how much
sleep can be accomplished in a short time if it be done by
the job! Oh! it seemed cruelty to summon us from that
deep repose to renew the journey; yet, as all our
innumerable
way passengers but one had swarmed off, we had more
room, and so were able to nurse the ladies during the day
into some uneasy slumbers and to sleep off hand ourselves,
or in other words, without a
rest
. Pshaw.
CHAPTER V.
'Tis distance lends enchantment to the view.
We
left Chambersburgh in good spirits after a
comfortable
night's rest, the sole occupants of the stage too;
and by a rare chance we remained sole occupants during
the remainder of our journey. And though
we
say it that
should'nt never was a more agreeable party in all respects
than oursthe present company, viz., the reader and the
author excepted. Among other excellencies, none of the
party chewed tobacco, smoked tobacco, spit tobacco, drank
alcoholic liquors, or used profane languageevils that may
be separated, but which still are often united. Of course
no one took snuff, all being then greatly too young for
powdered tobacco: that very appropriately belongs to the
sere and yellow leaf time.
Not long after sun-rise we were at the ascent of the grand
mountaina frowning rampart shutting by its rocky wall
from the east that world beyond! From the base to the
apex the road here ascends about four miles; which ascent
the gentlemen resolved to walk up:a feat usually achieved
at the first mountain, especially if the first one has ever seen.
To be sure people afterwards
will
walk when politely
requested
by a good natured driver, out of pity to the poor
brute horses: but(shame on his poetry and romance,)
Mr. Carlton having in subsequent years passed and
repassed
the mountains twenty-four times, used to remain in
the stage and
sleep
up the ascents! Yet not infrequently
would he be musing on the past, and recalling with smiles
and tears, that delightful party and that delightful walk on
that sweet morning, and all the glorious visions and castle
buildings of that entrancing day!gone, gone, like the
baseless fabric of a dream!
We soon left the stage behind us, and sometimes out of
sight and hearing. Then, under pretext of concern for the
ladies, but really I fear to have a pretext for resting, we
called a halt, where we could sit on a rock and blow, till
the noise of wheels and the sight of a bonnet peeping from
the stage gave us liberty to proceed; or rather took away the
excuse for sitting still. At the same time the bonnet would
disappear, lest it should be construed as a token of fear
robbery in those times not only of solitary travellers but of
whole stage companies often happening. However we had
a host in Col. Wilmar, and even thought with a peculiar
thrill of the poetry of an attack from bandits;although
when in after years we encountered the danger it was not
so poetical as romance writers make it, but simply a very
disagreeable affair better to read about than transact.
The time of the present journey was late in April, the
nights being often very cold, but the days only moderately
cool and sometimes even warm. Snow was yet in spots
near the summit of the mountains, although in places lying
towards the south and east vegetation was in rapid progress:
so that nothing could be more in unison with our feelings
than the renovated world amid the Alleghanies. Hope was
springing so fresh and green from the decayed hope of
boyhood
!
and nature so budding forth from the deadness of
winter! But alas! if buds and flowers burst forth, they die
again and soon! And renovated hope is renewed only for
blighting.
We stood now on the pinnacle of the great Cove
mountain
and were gazing on the mingled grandeur and beauty
of the scene. Few are unmoved by the view from that
top; as for myself I was ravished. Was I not on the
dividing
ridge between two worldsthe worn and faded
East, the new and magic West? And yet I now felt and
painfully felt, that we were bidding adieu to home and
entering
on the untried: still, hope was superior to fear, and
I was eager to pass those other peaks, some near as if they
might be touched and glorious with the new sunbeams, and
some sinking down away off till the dim outline of the
farthest
visible tops melted into blue and hazy distance!
Years after I stood on that pinnacle alone and the two
worlds were seen againbut no hopes swelled then into
visions of glory, at sight of the dim peaks; no consolations
awaited me in my native valleys of the East! Death had
made East and West alike to me a wilderness! Poor
Clarence! did he ever stand again, where I noticed him
standing that morning? How buoyant his heart! and so
melted with tender thoughts, so raptured with imaginings!
Could it be?after years of separationis he now
hastening
to one dearer to him than the whole world beside!
Will they know one another? Both have changed from
childhood to maturitybut why so speak? Our lovers
ever thought each the other unchanged in size, in look, in
voice; and when they did meet at last, they shed tears, for
while both were in all respects improved, both were altered,
and they were no more to love as boy and girl, but as man
and woman! Clarence saw no dark spectres in the bright
visions of that morning!
Upon Smith, long ago the scenes of that other life
opened; and doubtless they were of an undying glory,
for
But here comes the stage to hurry us onward; and so
the bustle of life interrupts serious meditations with the
whirl of cares and enterprises.
We were all once more seated in the vehicle, which
instantly darted upon the descent with a velocity alarming,
and yet exhilarating to persons unused to the style of a
mountain driver. The danger is with due care less,
indeed
,
than the appearance; yet the sight of places where
wagons and stages are said to have tumbled gigantic
somersets over miniature precipices, will force one
involuntarily
to say in a supplicatory tone to Jehu,Take
Vol. I.2
care driver, here's where that stage went over, and poor
Mr. Bounce was killed! To this caution Jehu replies
Oh! no dangerbesides he want killedhe only
smashed
his ribs 'gin that rock there, and got his arm broke;
and then to quiet our fears, he sends forth his endless
lash to play a curve or two around the ears of the
prancing
leaders, and with a pistol-like crack that kindles the
fire of the team to fury; and away they all bound making
the log crowning the rampart of wall tremble and start
from its place as the wheels spin round within eight
inches of the dreaded brink.
Thundering down thus, our stage dashed up the small
stones as if they leaped from a volcano, and awaked the
echoes of the grim rocks and the woody caverns: while
ill-stifled Oh! my's! and a tendency of the ladies to
counteract, by opposite motions, the natural bias of the
stage body for the sidewary declivity, were consoled with
the usual asseverationsO don't be afraidno danger
no danger! But when the horses, on approaching a
sudden turn of the road, seemed, in order to secure a good
offing, to shy off towards the deep valley, and nothing
could be seen over the tips of their erect and quivering
ears, save blue sky and points of tall trees, then the
ladies, spite of rebukes and consolations(and one at
least of the gentlemen)
would
stand tip-toeish, labouring,
indeed, to keep a kind of smile on the lips, but with an
irrepressible good graciousme! look out of the eyes.
And
But oh! what a beautiful village below us! How
neat and regular the houses! See! there's one spun and
wovenlike a Dutch woman's petticoat!yes, petticoat
is
the wordonly the stripes of the petticoat do not run
horizontally, and those of the house do. I declare if
there are not brick houses! and stone ones!and how
the smoke curls up to uswe can smell breakfast! What
noiseless streets! what green meadows! Did you ever
see any thing so picture likeso like patchwork! It
would be so pleasant to live in that nice, quiet, snug,
picturesque village! Mr. Smith, what place
is
it? Mr.
Smith smiling, repliedMcConnel'stown.
McConnel'stown
!
oh! what a beautythere it is hidno
therelook through therewhere?thereno 'tis gone!
We soon had reached the valley three miles below the
point of descent; and as Jehu said it was done at the rate
of twelve miles to the hour, the reader being skilled in the
modern knowledges, can calculate our time for himself.
There is the town, said Mr. Smith. Yes! there it was
sure enough, as it had never budged from its site since we
had first spied it; but
Quantum mutatus ab illo!
What a fall! was there! my countrymen!
Is that jumble of curious frame, brick, log, and stone
habitations our picturetown! Ay! truly, there is the
petticoat-house
,
with a petticoat as a curtain before the door,
and an old hat or so in the glassless sash, and fire light
gleaming between the logs. There! the door opens to
see us passjust see the childrenone, two, threenine
at least, and one in very deed at the breast!but how
dirty and uncombed! Did you ever see such a set as the
scamps lounging about that tavern?and one reeling off
drunk, the morning so fresh yet! See! that duck puddle
and swine wallow full of vile looking mud and water
certainly it must be sickly here, Driver, what noise is
that? Dogs fighting. Dreadful!Mr. Smith what
are you laughing at? Oh, nothingonly I should not
like to live here as well as some ladies and gentlemen.
And yet, reader, while a near view had dispelled the
illusion
of a distant prospect, good and excellent, and even
learned and talented people lived there, and yet live in
McConnel'stown.
At all events we shall have a good breakfast at this fine
looking stage-house. But whether we had arrived too
soon, or the folks usually began preparation after counting
the number of mouths, or the wood was green, or we most
vulgarly hungry and sharp set, very long was it, very long
indeed, before we were summoned. And then the
breakfast! Perhaps it was all accidental, but the coffee (?)
was a libel on diluted soot, made by nurses to cure a baby's
colic: the tea (?)for we had representatives of both
beverages
the
tea, was a perfect imitation of a decoction of
clover hay, with which in boyhood we nursed the tender
little calves, prematurely abstracted from the dams, the
silly innocents believing all the while that the finger in
the mouth was a teat! Eggs, too!it may have been
unlike Chesterfieldbut it certainly was not without
hazard
to put them in the mouth before putting them to the
nose:the oval delicacies mostly remained this morning
to feast such as prefer eggs ripe. Ay! but here comes a
monster of a sausage coiled up like a great greasy eel!
Such often in spite of being over-grown or over-stuffed are
yet palatable: this rascal, however, had rebelled against
the cook, and salamander-like, had passed the fiery ordeal
unscorched. Hot rolls came, a novelty then, but much like
biscuits in parts of the Far West, viz., a composition of
oak bark on the outside, and hot putty withinthe true
article for invalids and dyspeptics. We had also bread
and butter, and cold cabbage and potatoes, like oysters,
some fried and some in the shell; and green pickles so
bountifully supplied with salt as to have refused vinegar
and beetsand saltsellars in the shape of glass hatsand
a mustard pot like a salve-box, with a bone spoon glued in
by a potent cement of a red-brown-yellow colourand a
light-green bottle of vinegar dammed up by a strong twisted
wadding of brown paper.
Reader, what more could we wish?
Nothing.
Let us go then to a new chapter.
CHAPTER VI.
hair-breadth escapes in the imminent deadly breach
Is that a dagger that I see before me?
Fee! faw! fum! I smell the blood of an Englishman!
In
imitation of the ingenious Greek, with his specimen
brick, we have given
bits
of our roads, drivers and so forth,
to stand for the whole of such matters: but as the reader,
unless he skips, must have something to cheat him of the
tedium during the remaining journey, we shall here give
parts of conversations, after we had abandoned walks up
mountains and dreams on their summits.
I shall never forget that spot, said Col. Wilmar, one
day.
Why, Colonel?
I was so near shooting a fellow we mistook for a
highwayman
.
Indeed! why how was that?
My wife, proceeded the Colonel, in answer, is a
native
of the South. Directly after our marriage, we sailed
for Philadelphia, there spending some weeks prior to our
going home to Lexington. When the visit was over,
having
purchased a carriage, we prevailed on our cousin, the
sister of Miss Wilmar here, to go with us to the West:
and then set out, the two ladies and myself, with a hired
coachman. I need hardly say I then travelled with
weapons
,
and as we entered the mountainous country, a brace
of pistols was kept loaded usually in a pocket of the
carriage
.
Perhaps I may with propriety add, that we were
worth robbing and that our travelling `fixins' excited some
interest along the roadthe fact is, I was just married,
and you all know what young fellows do in the way of
extra then. Hence I do confess I felt more anxiety than
I chose to exhibit, and looked upon it as more than
possible
that we might light on disagreeable company.
The road was most execrable, except an occasional
section of the turnpike then making and partially
completed
.
We naturally, therefore, entered on any chance
section of this new road not only in good spirits from the
exchange, but with a kind of confidence as to our safety;
for I believe one looks out for bad fellows in bad roads
and places more than in the good ones. Well, just off
thereyou see where that old road ranthat deep narrow
gulleythere we emerged into a piece of superb turnpike;
or, in fact, we were compelled to take it, an impediment
being manifestly placed in the old road to turn travellers
into the new:and as I knew the turnpike would give
out in a mile or two, I ordered the coachman to go ahead
as fast as possible. This he did for about half a mile,
when suddenly a loud and gruff voice called out`Stop!'
which order was obeyed by our coachman in an instant.
With a hand instinctively on a pistol, I looked out of
the carriage-window,and there, fronting the horses stood
a stout fellow with a formidable sledge hammer, raised, as
in the very act of knocking down a horse;while several
other rough chaps advanced towards us with bludgeons
and axes from the side of the road!
Drawing the pistol from the pocket, as I spoke, I
demanded
`What
do you mean?'
`A dollar for trav'lin the new roadand buggur your
eyes if you'll git on till you payand blast my soul if
your man tries it, if I don't let drive at a horse's head.'
To lean outcock the pistol, and level straight at the
fellow's head, was the work of a momentand I then said
`Out of the road, you rascal!only shake that sledge
again, and I'll shoot you dead on the spot.'
The instant I spoke my wife threw an arm around my
neck, and my cousin hung on my other arm, and both
screamed outOh! colonel, don't kill himoh! don't!
and then to the fellowOh! do! do! do! go away!
he'll kill you!oh! go! How far the gang had
designed
to proceed, I was then doubtfulnor do I know, if
the ladies would not have destroyed the accuracy of my
aimyet, when that fellow caught sight of the muzzle
directed
at his head, and heard the frantic cries of the ladies,
he dropped the sledge hammer as if his arms were
para-lyzed
;
and the whole company suddenly, but quickly,
retreating, our driver went ahead. The ladies had
interfered
involuntarily from instinctive horror at seeing a
sudden and violent death, and partly for fear the leader's
fall would be the signal for our massacrebut then I had
you know, the other pistol; and beside I depended on a
stout dirk, worn under my vest, and some little on the alarm
of the gang and the assistance of the driver. That,
however
,
is the adventure.
Had you made no resistance, observed Mr. Smith,
you would at least have paid a dollar and perhaps have
been insulted with foul language: but the fellows were
not robbers in the worst sense. A number of workmen, it
was said, had been defrauded of their wages, and to make
up the losses, they decoyed passengers into the turnpike
and then exacted toll. Your affair, by the way, colonel,
reminds me of a narrow escape I once made in returning
from New Orleans
Ay!what was it?
I had gone, resumed Mr. Smith, down the river with
a load of produce, and having turned both cargo and boat
into bills and cash, I was obliged to venture back alone.
Accordingly, I bought a fine horse, provided weapons, and
stowed my money and a few articles of apparel into my
saddle-bags, which at night were put under my head and
made fast round my person with a strap. One day,
when I had nearly reached the state of Tennessee, I
found myself at sunset, by some miscalculation or wrong
direction, about fifteen miles from the intended
halting-place
,
but was prevented from camping out by coming
unexpectedly
on a two story log-house lately built, and of
course, for a tavern. The landlord took my saddle-bags
and led the way into the house, where a couple of
suspicious-looking
men were standing near the fire. I called for
something to eat, and pretty quick after supper I took up
my plunder, under pretence of being very sleepy, and went
up to a small room furnished with only one bed; but I did
not really intend to go to bed, for the conviction kept
haunting
me, that some attempt would be made on my property
may be on my life. Of course, I barricaded the door as
well as possible, and, without noise, examined my pistols
and got out my dirkand after a while blew out the light
and made a noise as if getting into bedbut I only sat on
the edge and waited the result.
Between one and two hours after, I heard other
persons
enter the house below; and then, amidst a sort of
premeditated
bustle, I could plain enough distinguish a lower
tone, a gentler stepping up and down, and once or twice a
very cautious attempt or two to open my door, till at last
the landlord came up and hailed me
`Hullow! stranger in thare?'
`Well! hullow!what's wanting?'
`Won't you take in another traveller?all's full but
you.'
`Nothere's only one bed in here, and that's a
plaguy narrow one.'
The landlord, after some unavailing entreaty, went
away, but soon returned with the pretended traveller; and
although they meant I should believe only two persons
were outside, I knew from the whispering there were
more, and that confirmed me in my suspicions of mischief.
The traveller, however, now opened the conference:
`Hullow! I say, mister, in thare, won't you
'commodate
?'
`Gentlemen,' said I, in a decided tone, `nobody can
come into this room to-night with my consent.'
`Well, dn me, then, if I won't come in whether you
like it or no:I've as much right to half a bed as you or
any other man.'
`If you attempt it, stranger, you may take what comes.'
The only answer was a long strain at the doortill at
last the door was forced a little open, and the rascal got his
whole hand in and would soon have worked in all his arm;
when, with a single thrust, I dashed my dirk right through
his hand and pinned him that way to the door-cheek.
He screamed out, you may be sure, in agony; but it
was in vain, I held him fixed as fate: and when the others
found it impossible either to relieve him or get at me, they
willingly agreed and with the most solemn and energetic
promises to let me alone if I would release their comrade.
I took them at their word and drew out the dirk, and strange
as it may seem, the fellows kept their promiseand
although
,
for a day or two I travelled in fear of an
ambuscade
,
I was never molested, and by the Divine favour,
reached home not long after in safety.
Mr. Clarence, said Miss Wilmar, I have heard that
you had some alarming adventures in the South, and as we
are quite in the robber vein to-day, may we not hear a story
from you?
It would be difficult, Miss Wilmar, replied Clarence,
to refuse after such an invitation: but only one part of
the story to which you probably allude is certainly true
that I was pretty well scared; when possibly there was
2*
no good reason for alarm. However, here is the
adventure
,
and you can judge of probabilities for yourselves.
On my last visit to South Carolina, being
sick
of
sea-sickness
,
I determined, winter as it was and contrary to
advice, to return to Philadelphia by land:in which mode
of travelling, however, if the endless and deep lagoons, and
bayous, and swamps of the lower or coast-road, are
considered
,
there was nearly as much of navigation and hazard
of wrecking and drowning as in the other way, by sea.
Indeed, more than once our narrow triangular stage, with
its two horses, harnessed tandem, did really float a
moment
:and
by night as by day, did we ford the middle of
submerged roads between drains and ditches, where the
water must have been four or five feet deep.
From Charleston we had not only a
new
but a new
order
of stage, which though crowded at starting, lost, by
the time we reached Georgetown, all the passengers but
myself and two others. These unfortunately were
slave-dealers
,
and of that very sort that John Randolph, or my
friend here the colonel, would not have greatly scrupled
to shoot down like any other blood-thirsty brutes. Their
diversion often was, to entice dogs near the stage and then
to fire pistol-balls at themusually, however, without effect,
owing to the motion of the stage and the sagacity of the
dogs. Of all wretches, these were superlatively
pre-eminent
in profanity: and this I once had the temerity to tell
them, but with no good result. Had the ancient
persecutors
chained Christians to such reprobates, the torture to a
good and pious man would have been the most exquisitely
fiendishif the tormenters could have cursed all the time
like these demons.
Just before leaving Georgetown, I was not a little
alarmed, on their learning that I was going North, by an
abrupt query if I had not Philadelphia or New-York
money: and then, as this could not be denied nor even
evaded, by their immediate offer to give me Virginia paper
for it all and at an enormous premium in my favour. From
their whole manner I conjectured their Virginia notes were
counterfeit; which, added to their open and reckless
wickedness
,
rendered me uneasy and disposed to interpret their
subsequent conduct in accordance with my fears.
Late at night in a violent storm of snow and sleet we
left Georgetown. The driver, pretending it was solely for
our comfort, had, in order to carry food for his horses,
crowded the stage body even above the seats with
corn-blades
,
like a farm-wagon with a load of fodder. I,
slender
and powerless, of course kept still, but the two did not
hush down to their muttering state of quiescence till after
the usual tempest of raving curses; and then we all three
crawled in and mixed ourselves with the fodder as we best
could. Within an hour the driver lay back, and with the
reins somehow secured in his hands went to sleepat all
events, his hat was over his eyes and he snored. And
then the men-stealers, supposing me to be asleep also,
began
a whispering and rather inarticulate colloquy, in which
I at length clearly distinguished the ominous words
`Cut his throat!'
Good gracious! Mr. Clarence, and were you not
greatly terrified?
Yes, greatly at first; but keeping wide awake and
listening
with my mouth open, I ascertained that the
scoundrels
did verily intend to cut a throat, although not mine:
it was the throat of a poor slave that had just given them
the slip. Yet dreading lest men who could coolly resolve
to cut one throat for revenge, might cut another for money,
I squeezed nearer the driver, and whenever he snored, I
nestled and moved about in the fodder till it waked him. So
passed most of the night, till shortly before day-break, we
halted on the edge of a riverperhaps the Pedeewhere
the driver said our journey was at an end till to-morrow;
as the
other
contractor had failed to be there with his
stage! At the same time he pointed to a miserable and
solitary hut on the bank, where we should be well
accommodated
till the stage arrived! And so I had before me a
very agreeable prospecttwenty-four hours with my
precious
associatesalmost alonein the woodsand on the
bank of a deep and rapid stream! But the fury of these
fellows, when the driver's meaning was fully
comprehended
!(who
had, at first, uttered himself in a saucy and
indistinct
mutter, as he untackled his team and we crawled
out of the hay-mow)it baffles description! And yet,
even in the very tempest height and rage of their godless
words, up stepped my imperturbable man of the whip, and
with the most invincible gravity and assurance demanded,
with outstretched and open palm, twenty-five cents each!
`
Twenty-five damnations!what for?
'roared one of
them in unaffected surprise.
`
What for?
'echoed and mimicked the driver, as if
amazed at a silly question`
What for!!'why, the nice
bed I made you last night out of that 'are fodder thare!
This matchless impudence, fun or earnestit was in
fact a little of bothwas so preposterously ridiculous to me
at least, that I laughed fairly out in spite of fear and
chagrin
;
nor was the laughter abated by the attitude and
amazement of the two slavers. Figure them accosted by
the driver with his demand in the very midst of outrageous
cursings and frantic gesturesthe pausethe call for
explanation
it
given;and there the wretches standing a
few seconds speechless, not from fear, but dumb with a
madness that was really unutterable! But then, when
they could speak, out came the unholy torrent as if the
prince of darkness had become incarnate and was spouting
forth brimstone and blasphemy? And all this time my
wonderful driver, cool, grave, unflinching(on his guard
evidently, and he was a very athletic fellow)kept at
suitable
intervals repeating the demand for twenty-five cents
each for the fodder bed! till our heroes closed their
proane
exhibition, by consigning driverstagehorses
fodder
contractorsand
all the Carolinas and the whole pine
barren world to the swearer's own diabolical father, and his
red-hot furnaces, and finally hoping and praying that they
themselves might be dammed three or four times over
`
if ever they travelled that road again!
' To all this
Satanic
rhetoric my nonpareil of impudence only replied, and
with the most astonishing coolness`
We never expect
nobody to travel this way but once!
'
This ended the affairour heroes were used up.
At the hut however we found a man who gave us a few
sweet potatoes and some rice, and then offered to take us
over the river in a scow, that we might get to the
stage-house
about two miles across the opposite forest. Here
then was a situation any thing but pleasant: and the
behaviour
of the chaps, after we were left alone in the woods,
did not render it any more so. Among other things, they
lagged behind togetherseemingly engaged, whenever I
looked around, in an earnest and low conversation, their
eyes occasionally on methen they would come up on
each side of meone going ahead as if to reconnoitre
till at last they evidently had resolved on something of
which I suspected I was the subject, and advanced to
execute
itwhen, unexpectedly to my great relief, a negro
man, the first and the only person we met that morning,
came in sight, driving a horse and cart! I hurried up to
the poor negro, and learned that a plantation was on our
left, and that the stage-tavern was scarcely half-a-mile
distant
.
After this the slavers' conduct was less alarming
towards me; yet I never felt at ease till we reached
Fayetteville, where they took another road into Virginia
and left me sole occupant of the stage.
This, Miss Wilmar, is, I confess, continued Clarence,
not a very tragic conclusionbut I had rather be here to
tell the story as it was, than to have Carlton here to tell it in
a book as it might have been; and yet perhaps the rascals
only meant to terrify me as did the wag, on meeting a
traveller
How was that, Mr. Clarence?
Before Clarence could reply, Mr. Brown exclaimed
Look there!look there! and below us, in the meadows
bordering the Juniatta, was a hunted deer bounding away
for life! The timid creature ere long leaped into the water,
swam some hundred feet down the stream, and emerging
speeded away to the mountain. No pursuers were in sight,
and from appearances the poor creature escaped for that
time: it certainly had our wishes in its favour. This
incident
naturally introduced stories about hunting and Indians,
with numberless episodial remarks on dogs, rifles, shot-guns,
tomahawks and the like; so that when the shadows of the
mountain began at the decline of day to darken the valleys,
and silence and thoughtfulness pervaded the party, fancy
easily brought back the red-man to his ancient haunts and
made robbers crouch in ambush in every thicket and behind
every tree. Yet we reached our lodging place in safety,
where, late at night, we severally retired to bed; and then,
if the day had brought Mr. Carlton and his amiable wife no
danger, they were destined to find a somewhat curious
adventure
at night. And this we shall contribute to the chapter
as our share of its accidents.
Our sleeping room was on the first floor, and opened by
three windows into a piazza; which circumstances, together
with the stories just narrated to the reader and other matters
of the sort, inclined us to examine the fastenings before
going to bed. The bolts were faultless, but the shutters or
slappers were so warped and swollen that no efforts could
induce them to come together and be bolted; hence, our
only course was to jump into bed, and if any thing happened,
to do like childrenput our heads under the covers. In
about an hour I was cautiously awakened by Mrs. Carlton,
who whispered in a low and agitated voice
Oh! my dear!what's that?listen!
Instead of pulling up the bed-clothes, I sat up to listen;
and strangea solemn and peculiar and thrilling note was
filling the room, swelling and dying away, and changing now
to one spot and then to another! What
could
it be? The
sound resembled nothing I had ever heard except once, and
that was in a theatrical scene, in which a huge iron wheel
turned at the touch of a magician and slowly raised the
heavy trap door of an enchanted cavern. I sprang out of
bed and began a searchyet all in vainI felt along the
walls, crawled under the bed, poked my head up the chimney,
and even ventured into the closetsand all the while that
mysterious noise playing as wild and frightful as ever! At
last I pushed open the shutters and looked into the piazza;
still nothing was visible either there or within the room,
while the strange tones swelled louder than ever!
Puzzled, but less alarmed, we at last retreated to bedI
say we, for Mrs. C. had been trotting after me during the
whole search, being too cowardly to stay in bed alone even
with the covers over her head,we retreated to bed, and
after a while I, at least, fell asleep; but soon I was suddenly
and violently awakened by my good lady, who in attempting
to leap away from something on her side, had in extra
activity accomplished too much, and landed clear over me
and out of bed entirely on the floor!
Why, Eliza!Eliza!what?what
is
the matter?!
Oh! Robert!listen! said my wife; in bed again,
however, and be assured, on the safe side.
A basin of water we knew stood near Mrs. Carlton's side
of the bed, and on a small table:and now into that basin,
drop by drop, something was trickling!
Could
it be blood
from some crack in the floor over us! With Mrs. C. clinging
to me, I went to the table, and seizing the basin, carried it
hastily to a window, and pushing open its shutter, we plainly
perceived by the dim light that blood it really wasnot
Well, what
was
it, then?
Reader! it was a little mouse dead enough now, but
which, having by accident tumbled into the water, had, by its
struggles for life, caused what to us then seemed like the
trickling down of some liquid or fluid substance.
Day now dawning, and Mrs. C. being willing to stay
alone, I went into the yard to discover the cause of the
mysterious music, satisfied that it lay there somewhere;
and no sooner did I reach the corner of the house than I
was fortunate enough to catch the very ghost in the act of
performing on the extraordinary instrument that had puzzled
us with its strange noise. Against the house had been
nailed part of an iron hoop to support a wooden spout; but
the spout had rotted away and fallen down, and the
projecting
hoop was alone. This iron had on it some saline
substance
pleasant to the taste of a quiet old cow; and there
stood the matron-like quadruped licking away with very
correct time at the hoop, and whenever her tongue finished
a stroke, and according to its intensity, the instrument
vibrated
,
and thus discoursed the wondrous music of the
enchanter's wheel and trap! Indeed, I even tried the
performance
myself(not with my tongue)and succeeded,
my wife says, and she is a judge of music, succeeded as
well as the cow herself. And so, dear reader, if this is
not a cock and bull storyit most certainly isa mouse
and a cow one.
Adventures, like misfortunes, are sometimes in clusters.
The next morning after the descent from some mountain,
as our stage was entering a small village, we were met by
a noble-looking young man, mounted on a spirited horse,
scarcely broken, and certainly not bridle-wiseand met
exactly on the middle of a bridge. This bridge crossed a
stream not ordinarily wide or deep, but swollen by melting
snows it now was foaming and thundering along almost a
river: it was truly formidable.
The horse, as we met, stopped, and with ears erect and
pointed, with nostrils dilated, and eyes fierce and staring,
he answered every effort to urge him forward only with
trembling and fitful starting; while the horseman himself
sat indifferent to consequences, and with ease and grace.
The man and horse were one. At length the rider unable
to compel the creature to pass us, attempted to wheelwhen,
instead of obeying the bridle, the spirited animal reared,
and at one superb bound cleared the barrier of the bridge,
and both rider and horse in an instant disappeared under
the foaming waters. But scarcely had fright among us
uttered its exclamations, when up rose that horse, and up
rose, too, seated on his back, that rider,ayseated as
though he had never moved and the whole performance had
been done expressly for exhibition! In a few moments the
horseman landed below the bridge, then galloping across
the meadow he passed the fence at a flying leap, and
advancing
to the stage now over the bridge, this matchless
rider taking off his hat and bowing to the party, asked, as
if the affair had not been purely accidental:
Gentlemen! which of you can do that?
We most heartily congratulated him on his miraculous
preservation, and, as he rode gallantly off, gave him three
loud cheers for his unsurpassed coolness and intrepidity.
Reader! it is yet a long way to Pittsburgh, and I cannot
get you properly there without telling my own robber story
a pet adventure;or without we skipbut I
should
like to
tell the story
Well, Mr. Carlton, we should very much like to hear
the storybut, perhaps, just now we had betterskip.
Skip it is, then, and all the way to
Pittsburgh
.
CHAPTER VII.
Frrum exercebant vasto Cyclopes in antro
Brontesque Steropesque et nudus membra Pyracmon.
* * alii ventosis follibus auras.
Accipiunt redduntque: alii stridentio tingunt
Aera lacu: gemit impositis incudibus antrum.
Illi inter sese mult vi brachia tollunt
In numerum, versantque tenaci forcipe massam.
And be assured, reader, it is not all smoke you now
seethere is some fire here too. This black place reminds
us of the iron-ageof Jupiter too, and Vulcan and Mount
tna. Virgil would here have found Cyclops and pounders
of red-hot thunderbolts sonorous enough to set at work in
his musical hexameters. And some here make tubes of
iron, with alternate and spiral lands and furrows, better
by far to shoot than Milton's grand and unpatent
blunderbusses
;
into which his heroic devils put unscientifically
more powder than probably all burnedbut that was before
the Lyceum age.
Whenever that soot-cloud is driven before a wind, long
streets are revealed lined with well-built and commodious
dwellings, with here and there a stately mansion, and even
the dusky palace belonging to some lord of coal-pits and
ore-beds.
Hark! how enterprise and industry are raging away!
while steam and water-power shake the hills to their very
foundation!and every spot is in a ferment with
innumerable
workmen as busy, and as dingy too, as the pragmatical
insects in Virgil's poetic ant-hill! Every breeze is redolent
with nameless odours of factories and work-shops; and the
ear is stunned by the ceaseless uproar from clatter and clang
of cog and wheelthe harsh grating of countless rasps and
filesthe ringing of a thousand anvilsthe spiteful
clickings
of enormous shears biting rods of iron into nailsthe
sissing of hot-tongs in waterand the deep earthquaking
bass of forge-hammers teaching rude masses how to assume
the first forms of organic and civilized metal!
Mr. Brown said he was not yet fully awake, but that he
was in a dream amid scenes of Birmingham and Sheffield;
and that instead of astonishing the natives, the natives had
surprised and astonished him.
Why do some speak disparagingly of Pittsburgh
complexion
?
Is
it ordinarily seen? The citizens move
enveloped
in cloudlike neas entering Carthageand
hence are known rather by their voice than their face.
Their voice is immutable, but their face changes hourly:
hence if the people here are loud talkers, it arises from
the fact just alluded to, and because loud talking is
necessary
to cry down the din of a myriad mingled noises.
In
very
civilized districts, ladies owe their sweet looks
to what is
put on
their faces; in this Cyclopean city, sweet
looks are owing to what is
taken off
their faces. Instead,
therefore, of advising bachelors before popping the
question
,
to catch the inamorata in the suds, we advise to
catch her in the soot. If beautiful, then let Clebs bless
himself, for he has a gem which water, unlike its baleful
effect on some faces, will only wash brighter and brighter.
As to hearts and manners, if our Mr. Smith be a correct
specimen, go reader, live in Pittsburgh. He was a
Christian
gentleman: and in those two words is condensed all
praise. When, as was necessary, our party proceeded on
the voyage without this friend, so great was the vacancy,
we seemed alonealas! he is no more!
THE VOYAGE.
CHAPTER VIII.
facilis descensus Averni, sed revocare gradum
Easy is it to float down the Ohiotry to float up once!
At
the time of the voyage, a steamboat was a very
rara
vis
on the Ohio river; at least such a smoke-belcher and
spit-fire could not be found at any hour of the day and night
ready to walk off with passengers like the thing of life.
The usual mode then of
going down
(
getting up
again
was quite another affair)was in arks, broad-horns,
keelboats
,
batteaux, canoes and rafts. Col. Wilmar, who knew
the way of doing business in these great waters, decided in
favour of the ark; and into the ark, therefore, we went:
viz. Col. Wilmar and his cousin, Mr. Clarence and Mr.
Brown, and Mr. and Mrs. Carlton, and also the two owners
eight souls. Noah's stock of live animals went in to be
fed
, ours went in to be
eaten
and we had also
smoked
hamsso that the likeness between us and that
remarkable
navigator principally failed after the number of the
sailors was compared.
Our captain and mate being gone after their own stores,
let us in the mean while examine the mechanique of our
ark. And first, its
foundation
,for the structure is rather
a house than a boat,its foundation. This is rectangular
and formed of timbers each fifteen cubits long, tied by
others each eight cubits long; the timbers being from
three to four hands-breadths thick. The side beams
are united by sleepers, on which is a floor pinned
down, and as tight as possible, so that when swollen by
the water, water itself could not get inexcept at the
cracks, and then it could not be got out without the aid of
science. Above the first flooring, at an interval of a foot,
was laid on other joist (
jice
)a second floor. Hence
by virtue of a primitive pump peculiar to the raft and ark
era, our hold(and it held water to admiration)could,
when necessary, be freed.
Scantling of uncertain and unequal lengths rose almost
perpendicular around the rectangle, being morticed into
the foundation; and so when, from without, planks were
pinned as high as necessary against these uprights, the
ark had nearly all its shape, and all its room.
This room or space was portioned into cabin and
kitchen; the latter intended by the architect to take the
lead in the actual navigation, but which in a struggle for
pre-eminence would often technically
slue round
, and
yield that honour to the cabin.
Next the kitchen. In one part was a hearth of brick
and sand, and furnished with three iron bars that straddled
their lower extremities to the edges of the hearth, and
united their upper ones over its centre or thereabouts.
And this contrivance was to sustain in their turn our
hem!culinary utensils?ayyesculinary utensils.
Forwards were the fin-holes, and behind these and
projecting
towards the cabin, were boxes as berths for the
captain and mate. The
fins
(improperly by some called
horns)
where rude oars, which passing out of the
opposite
fin-holes just named, used when moved to flap and
and splash each side the kitchen; and by these the ark
was steered, kept kitchen end foremost, brought to land
and kept out of harm's waythe last requiring pretty
desperate pulling, unless we began half an hour before
encountering
an impediment, or escaping a raft. The fins
would, indeed, sometimes play in a heavy sort of frolic
to get us along faster; but usually they were idle, and we
were left to float with the stream from three to four miles
in an hour.
The cabin, like other aristocrats, had the large space,
and was planked two cubits higher than the other places,
and covered with an arched roof of thin boards to ward off
sun, direct and perpendicular rain. Against sun and rain
oblique, it was often no barrier. The cabin was also
subdivided
into parlour and state room. The latter was for
the ladies' sole use, being sumptuously furnished with a
double box or berth, a toilette made of an upturned flour
barrel, and similar elegancies and conveniences, and a
window looking up-stream; which window was a cubit
square and had a flapper or slapper hung with leathern
hinges and fastened with a pin or wooden bolt. The
parlour
contained the male boxes or sleeperies; and was the
place where we all
boarded
but here comes the
captain
and his mate, and we shall be off in what they call
a jiffeyi. e. in a moment or two. Among other articles,
these persons brought a coffee-mill, a saw, about half a
bushel of sausages, and above all, a five gallon keg, which
the captain himself hugged up under his arm next the
heart. What was in it I do not exactly knowit could
not have been water, not having a watery smell, and beside
we all drank river waterit must then remain a secret.
Reader! all is ready! Oh! how soft the
blossom-scented
balmy air is breathing! See! the sun light dancing
from one sparkling ripple to another! A most delicious
April morning is inviting us with the blandest smiles to
come and float on the beauteous river far, far away to the
boundless prairies and the endless forests of the New
World! Yes! yes! here is a vision realand in the
midst of fragrance, and flowers, and sunshine, and with
those we love for comrades, and those we love awaiting
us, we are entering the land, the glorious land of sunsets!
Ah! ClarenceI wonder not at that tear
Bill! slue round your 'are side there and we're off,
interrupted the captain, addressing his mate. Bill, of
course, performed that curious manuvre with great
nautical
skill, and off we were: first one end struggling for
the precedence and then the other, with alternate fins
dipping and splashing, till the ark reached the confluence
of the Alleghany and Monongehala; and then one grand
circular movement accomplished that forced the lordly
cabin to the rear, away, away we floated, kitchen in the
van down on the current of the noble, beauteous, glorious
Ohio!
Farewell! Pittsburgh, last city of the cast! Long may
the din and the smoke of thy honest enterprise be heard
and seen by the voyager far down the flood! Farewell!
the earth-born clouds are veiling thee even now!
There! I see thee again!Oh! the flash of that tall spire
sending back the sunbeam, like gleams of lightning
from a thunder cloud;it gleams againwe change our
courseand all is dark!Pittsburgh! Farewell.
Ladies and gentlemen said the Colonel, after we were
fairly under weigh, suppose we proceed to arrange our
domestic establishment, each agreeing to perform his part
either assumed by himself, or imposed on him by vote
(
he, his, him
were used in the sense of
homo
and were so
understood by the ladies although unacquainted with Latin
and lectures)and so suppose we have a regular
assembly
I move Col. Wilmar take the chair,said Mr. Brown.
And this being seconded by Mrs. Carlton, the Colonel
took the chair the best way he could; and that was only
metaphorically by moving off a little from the common
members and leaning against a berth. Miss Wilmar was
next elected Secretary, and accommodated with a trunk
for a seat, and using her lap as a table, she prepared to
record in her pocket book the resolutions of the household
house.
Mr. Brown then was nominated as cook; but as he
insisted that he could cook never a bit of a male but
only roast potatoes, and we had unluckily no potatoes
stored, the important office was after due deliberation
bestowed
on the chairman himself. This was, indeed, very
humbly declined by the Colonel, who left the chair (
calling
thither for the time Mr. Clarence,) to exhibit in a very
handsome speech his unworthiness; yet it was at last
unanimously
decided in his favour, and mainly on the
argument
of Mr. Carlton, that the Colonel had doubtless learned
cooking in his campaigns and when hunting. From some
inaccuracy in wording the resolutions, however, the
business
after all only amounted to the cook's having to carry
the victuals to and from the kitchenlift the culinary
articles aboutand poke the fire at the order of the ladies.
Next came a resolution that the ladies should prepare
the cookablesi. e. stuff the chickens with fillingbeat
eggs for puddings, and the like. Then it was ordered that
Clarence, Brown and Carlton should in turn set the table
clean plates, &c,or in a wordbe scullions. The
dignity
of history forbids me to conceal, that spite of all our
scouring, and wiping and washing, the cleaned articles
retained an unctuous touch, and looked so streaked, that at
meals the ladies deemed a polish extra necessary. But
non possumus onnia
, you know, reader--i. e.
we cannot all
clean dishes
, as the Latins say.
There were also other resolutions, such as, that the
gentlemen rise betimes and make their beds before the
appearance of the ladies; that two by two they should
take the skiff and go to market, i. e. buy at the cabins on
the banks whatever they had for sale that was eatable,
viz. milk, butter, cheese, eggs, chickens, ducks, venison
hams cured, and fresh venison, &c. &c. The stores laid
in at Pittsburgh were smoked meats, sausages, flour,
cornmeal
,
tea, coffee, sugar, salt, spices, sweatmeats, some
fruits, and many other things unknown to Noah. We had
also our own plates, knives, lead spoons, and a superb
Dutch-looking set of Pittsburgh Liverpool ware for tea and
breakfast service. For a consideration the captain
allowed us the use of his big pot, skillet, and Dutch oven;
we had our own coffee-pot and other tins.
From our nicnacries we often supplied the captain's
table with a desert; and finally, when about six hundred
miles down the river, these extemporaneous sailors
received
the $16 paid for our passage, they became residuary
heirs to all our unbroken crockery and hardware, and to
the remnant of our flour and smoked meats. The
goodies
had disappeared two hundred miles higher.
After the adjournment of our assembly, we proceeded to
arrange the cabin as described, spending the whole day in
fixing; an Americanism extended to unfixing, removing,
and deranging, as well as to placing and rendering
permanent
.
But at ten o'clock, P.M., the pitchy darkness
rendered
longer floating hazardous, and we accordingly came,
not to anchor, but to a tie, i. e. working the ark to the
nearest
bank, we tied
her
(an ark
contains
, if it does not
breed
)
tied her to a tree, and in the very way formerly done by
the pious neas and his wandering Trojans. Yet we did
not, as those heroes, sleep on the sand or the grass, but
retired
to our berths or boxes, setting a watch, however, to
guard against two dangers of diametrically opposite
characters
.
First, it was necessary to take care that the
tie-rope
neither got loose nor broke, when we should float off
into the perils of a dark riverthat is, find
too much
water;
and, secondly, we must watch the subsidence of the river,
lest she (the ark) be left grounded some two or three feet
from her natural elementthat is, lest we find
too little
water: a bad fix in English-English as in
American-English
.
It is very delightful when travellers go to sleep
confident
in being one hundred miles advanced in their journey
by the time they are called to breakfast; but not so with
Vol. I3
the partywe went to bed of necessity and slept on
system
.
True, we awoke, and got up, and ate breakfast and
dinner, and even tea and supper, and played away the
intervals
at checkers with white and red corns, and then
tried push-pin and tee-totumand tried to read, and
wished
for fishing-lines and gunsand walked up the bank
and then walked down again, whistling every now and
then most devoutly, not
for
wind, but
against
it: but alas!
the wind would not be whistled against,it continued to
blow all day long dead ahead up stream, as if it had never
heard us; and there we were all day, all the evening, and
part of the night, in the self-same identical spot where we
came to a tie at ten o'clock, P.M., the night before! And
that was deservedly called a pretty considerable of a fix.
This happened often enough, however, on other occasions,
to practice and improve our patience.
One day, when thus wind-bound about two hundred
miles below the first fix, all the common expedients of
beguilement
being tried and exhausted, Colonel Wilmar
proposed
marblesof which he had made a large purchase
for his little sons. And at it we went with the zest of
boyhood. Happy day! how the blue-coloured gentry, that
haunt the inactive, took wing at the sound of our merry and
innocent shouts and laughter! No human habitation was
in sight; and forests that told their age by centuries
stretched their giant-arms over our ring; and from their
venerable depths Echo, for the first time since the creation,
called back, in amazement, the words of our game, to her
more incomprehensible than the heathenish terms of the
native Indians! Oh! how she reiterated man-lay!
clearings!  'fen!  knuckle-down!  toy bone!go to
baste!(?)  fat!  histings! comins about!hit black
alley!knock his nicker!'tan't fair!you cheat!my
first!cum multis aliis! These terms are spelled
according
to natureindeed, my soul becomes indignant when
I find printed, instead of that spirit-stirring, frank-hearted
Hurraw! that pitiful, sneaking, soulless, civilized,
Huzza! Dare any man say
that
sounds like the thing?
No more than it looks like it. Freemen! let nice, pretty,
mincing, lady-like dandies huzzay by notedo you ever
cry out Hurraw! ex tempore.
But at length we waked something more substantial than
that bodiless nounEcho; for lo! on a sudden came
answers
,
very near and very distinct, if not very melodious,
and from the top of the identical bank beneath which we
were playing. We looked up, and there stood two hunters,
long silent spectators of the strange game, but who having
imbibed the fun of the thing, were now laughing and
roaring
away as merry as our party!
After the wind had blown out, we weighed anchor, that
is, untied ark, and floated away till after midnight, when
some clouds so increased the darkness as to prevent our
seeing snags, sawyers and planters, and also the ripples
indicative of shallows, and we tied again. Perhaps it
may be proper here to say a word relative to the above
named impediments in the Western waters.
A
planter
is the trunk of a tree, perpendicular or
inclined
,
with one end fixed or planted immoveable in the
bottom
of the river, and the other above or below the surface,
according to the state of the water. A
snag
is a miniature
or youthful planter, or sometimes it is made by an upright
branch of a large tree itself imbedded horizontally in the
bottom. A
sawyer
is either a long trunk, or more
commonly
an entire tree, so fixed that its top plays up and down
with the current and the wind, and is therefore periodically
perilous to the navigator.
Ripples
are often indices of an
ascending sawyer, and also of shoals, as one approaches
islands wholly or partially submerged. Large and heavy
rafts frequently go against and over most of the smaller
obstacles with impunity, but arks like ours would have been
staved; so our night floating especially was never free from
jeopardy.
I shall not inflict our whole log-book on the reader and
his friends:how often we tied and untiedwent ashore
after butter and eggs and the cum multisnor how it was
once my lot to be with Mr. Brown in the skiff when he
could not, owing to his extreme longitude, trim boat, and
how the vixen of a boat threatened to upset, and I had to
pull both oars till, weary and long after dark, we overtook
our ark, where fears began to be entertained about us. No,
no,why should we trespass on patience with the account
of our cookery; our batter cakes, eggs and ham, biscuit
and loaf, johnny cakes, steaks, filled chickens, plum
puddings
,
and the curious dish of what-nots? And yet it was
really marvellous that our endless varieties could all be
turned out of four utensils: viz. a tea-kettle and a dutch
oven, and a big pot, and a little skillet. Mrs. Goodfellow
did well enough with all her fixturesbut it was reserved
for our ladies to cook, what most cooks and confectioners
knew nothing aboutthe multum in parvo. Let me, then,
in place of the whole log, introduce a new friend.
In the third day of the descent we began to overhaul an
ark, a size (?) less than ours; but this ark, instead of
getting
out of the way, was evidently striving to get into it;
and so, arrived within speaking distance, we were hailed
from the strange float with a proposition to link arks.
Longing for something new, and apprised that combined
arks floated better than single ones, our assent was instantly
given, and then our arks were soon amicably united and
floating side by side. And what would you imagine the
neighbour ark contained? A solitary male Yankee! Ay,
and such a merry, facetious, fearless, handy, 'cute
specimen
of the genus as, I
guess
, was never encountered.
This wonderful biped had left the land of deacons, hard
cider, and other steady habits, in imitation of Jack in the
good old-fashioned story-bookto seek his fortune; and
now, after trying his luck in twenty different places, and
in as many different and even opposite ways, behold!
here was
Do-tell-I-want-to-know
, lord of a whole ark, a
solitary Noah, floating to a new world at the far end of a
flood, if not beyond one! He had cast off at Pittsburgh some
hours before ourselves, and had sung, whistled, rowed and
eaten his way alone, till we overtook him, when he had
hailed
us in a very jocose and half-singing style, and then
brought up his ark with a laugh and a tune. He was
tired, he said, of his company, and had ought to get into
better society,and seeing we were in a tarnation tearing
hurry, he had ought to tow us down to what-d'-ye-call-the
place?and as he didn't intend taking advantage of our
weakness, he wouldn't ask any thing for his helpexcept
his boarding and a dollar a day.
What-say
, however, was very far from vulgarity, and
towards
ladies, very respectful; still, he was a choice
specimen
of the universal nation, and Mr. Brown looked on him
with astonishment for his peculiarities, but with respect for
his independence and enterprise. Our hero's name was,
oddly enough, Smith. And as he was always called among
us by his surname, I forget whether he told that his
Christian
name was Thankful or Preservedhis cognomen,
however, was destined to be a proper noun, for our Yankee
was, par excellence, the Smith.
Notwithstanding his demand for boarding, we could not
induce him to eat with us, anxious as we were to pay, if
not for towing services, yet for fun. True, he could apply
soft sawder very judiciously, and indeed, even
sometimes
out-general Mr. Brown: who, to tell the truth, could
do the nate thing with the blarney himself. I shall
make no attempt to record their quirks, and quizzes, and
repartees, and punsgood things of the sort, like
soda-water
,
had better be taken at the fountain. What became
of Smith when we parted at Limestone, I never learned.
But never do I hear of a Smith pre-eminent in handicraft,
from simple clock-making all the way up to patent nutmeg
making; or in the give-and-take line, from limited auction.
eering to enlarged, and liberal, and locomotive peddling of
notions; or in modern literature, from magazine writing
clean up to magnetisms and lyceums that Noah Smith of
the little ark comes not in remembrance. Verily, if not
really metamorphosed, as I sometimes guess, into Sam
Slick or Jonathan his brother, he certainly is, if living--a
very Slick Feller.
The twin arks, as our sailors became bolder and more
skilful or rash, were allowed at last, the wind permitting,
to float all night. One night Smith, then our Palinurus,
suddenly beat to quarters, by drumming his heels against
the partition and ringing his skillet with the only weapon
he carried,an oyster knife worn usually in his bosom
like a dirk, and with its handle exposed. At the same time,
as accompaniment, he whistled Yankee doodle in
superb
style, and then exchanged his whistling to the singing
of this extemporaneous lyric:
Get up, good sirs, get up I say,
And rouse ye, all ye sleepers;
See! down upon us comes a thing
To make us use our peepers.
Yankee doodle, &c.
Yet what it is, I cannot tell
But 'tis as big as thunder;
Ah! if it hits our loving arks,
We'll soon be split asunder.
Yankee doodle, &c.
Roused we were, yet, misled by the manner of our pilot,
not as fast as the case really demanded: for just then the
ladies looking from their little window up the river, cried
out in great alarm, Col. Wilmar!Mr. Carlton!make
haste!something is coming down like an island broke
loose!it is almost on us! Of course the fins were soon
manned, and flapped and splashed with very commendable
activity, and just in time to escape the end of an immense
raft now sweeping past and within a very few inches of
Smith's side; while four or five men on the raft were
labouring
away at their sweeping oars, showing that our
escape was due to their exertions, and not our own.
Smith, however, who had, it seems, made his calculation,
as soon as he perceived the raft likely to pass very near,
now leaped upon it with a rope in his hand; and with the
permission of the men, and indeed with their assistance too,
held on till he gained the far end of the great float, when,
our arks made fast behind it, we began to go a-head in
earnest.
Safe now from all attacks in the rearfor nothing could
outfloat usand bidding defiance to planter, snag, and
sawyer, we boxed ourselves up for the remainder of the
night and enjoyed a profound sleep, awaking in due season
to the full reality of our improved condition. And here,
writing in the very noon of gas and steam, I do deliberately
say, after all my experience of cars and boats, that for a
private party of the proper sort nothing is so delightful, so
exhilarating, so truly bewitching to travel in, as twin-arks
towed along by an almost endless raft. To say nothing
of our state room for ladies, parlour for company, kitchen
for cookery, and Smith's whole ark extra for dining and
sittingthere was our grand promenade deck on the raft,
a deck, full three hundred feet long and fifty broad!
What cared we for bursting boilers?what for snag
and sawyer? And if any serious injury happened to one
of the trio, or even two, the third unharmed afforded retreat
and shelter. In comfort, convenience, and freedom, two
arks and a long raft carry away the palm.
Indeed, our flotilla was truly poetic and romantic. And
never before, certainly never since, was there or has there
been such a season; it was an old-fashioned April, and of
the most delicious sort. Spring her very self was enticed
by it from her southern retreats, and came to meet and
conduct
us to her beauteous domains. How bright and warm
and soft the sunlight of that season! encouraging flower
and leaf to unfold their modest glories to the genial rays!
Did a bank of clouds rest on the horizon? That was no
portent of storm: it was only that a single cloud might be
detached to sprinkle river and hill with the sunshiny
shower that won't last an hour! Oh, the joy! then, to
watch the contest between the rainbow tinted drops and
misty sunshine,the contest for victory! And how the
fish leaped out to catch a pure crystal drop before it fell
and mingled with the flood of turbid waters! And the birds!
they plunged into the shower of liquid light, bathing their
plumage of gold and scarlet and purple, till it seemed
burnished
still brighter in such a bath!
But the sunsets, and the twilight! The witchery then
entranced the very soul! All of poetry, and of shadowy
forms, and of sinless elysium,all of magic in musings
and dreamsall was embodied there! The etherial floated
on the river's bosom, while its now unruffled waters floated
our rude vessels. It dwelt in the dark mirror, where
shadows of cliff and forest pointed to a depth down, down
away, far beyond the sounding-line. It was melting in the
blazing river, whence farewell rays were reflected as the
sun hid behind some tall and precipitous headland. Ay!
we heard the unearthly in the whispers of eddying waters
sporting around us; and in the sweet and thrilling evening
songs of happy birds! We saw it, till the soul was
phrenzied
,
as gliding past one island, another in front arose to
intercept, and we were seemingly shut within a fairy lake,
never to find an egress! And here when the breath of
day was done, and the songs of the birds hushed, and
Wilmar
or Clarence was seated on the raft and with a flute
oh! the pure, sweet, plaintive, joyous, wild, ravishing cries
of the echoes.
If one would hear the magic flute, it must be as then
and there. The Muses haunted then the forest-clad banks
and cliffs; and startled and pleased with the melody of a
strange instrument, they caught its strainsand called to
one another, imitating its tones, till they died away in
the distance. Years after I passed up and down that same
river in steamboatsbut in vain did I look for the visions
and listen for the strains of the by-gone evenings. Alas!
April had such showers no more! The noise and fierce
and fiery spirit of the steamers had driven away the gentle
birds and heavenly echoesand with an oppressed and
melancholy heart I heard, returning from the banks, only
the angry roar of deserted and sullen and indignant forests!
The seventh day was at its close, when we deemed
ourselves
so near Limestone, (the modern Maysville,) that it
was determined to send the colonel and the author in the
skiff to that place, in order to have arrangements made
before
the arrival of the grand flotilla;for there the raft
was to be broken up and scattered, and so was our party.
Accordingly, before day-break on the eighth morning, we
set off with the skiff, agreeing to row and steer alternately,
each a mile, as near as could be guessed at: and this
agreeable alternation was calledspelling one another. At
the end of nine spells, we discovered on a bank, just about
sunup, a full grown male Buckeye, a little in advance
of his cabin, watching our progresswe hailed:
Hallow!how far to Limestone?
Ten miles.
Ten miles!we had thought it now about a milebut
the recitation in rowing was not yet ended; and so we went
to spelling it ten times more. We were, of course, perfect
by the time we did reach Limestone; at all events, I was
3*
so pleased with my improvement, that from that hour I
have never touched an oar! In about an hour after the
colonel and Mr. Carlton arrived at port, the raft, its
caboose
in the centre, and our arks in its rear, hove in sight;
and we hurried to the landing with separate conveyances
hired for our separate journeys.
Reader! which way will
you
go? With the gallant
colonel and the lovely Miss Wilmar, and the faithful Mr.
Clarence to Lexington? or will you stay with Mr. Brown
and Mr. Smith at Limestone? or will you
not
accompany
Mr. and Mrs. Carlton to the New Purchase? Perhaps you
prefer to shake hands with all:
we
, however, of the party
found that no easy task. Many were our pretexts for
lingeringtill at last all pretences exhaustedwith
emotion
,
ay, with tears that
would
come, hands were grasped
good wishes exchangedand we uttered with tremulous
voicesFarewell!
THE SEARCHING.
CHAPTER IX.
In medias res
Floundering into mud holes
Who
could
have dreamed, my dear, said Mrs. C. to
her husband, these forests so picturesque when seen
from the Ohio, concealed such roads?
Mr. C. made no reply; although the phenomenon was
certainly very remarkable;in fact, his idea about the
Muses was passing in reviewand he thought, maybe after
all, it was something else that had echoed the flute notes.
The lady's query, however, and the gentleman's silence
occurred
about thirty miles due north of the Ohio River, in a
very new State of the far west. They were seated in a
two-horse Yankee cart,a kind of mongrel dearborne
amid what was now called their plunderwith a hired
driver on the front seat, and intending to find, if possible, a
certain spot in a very uncertain part of the New Purchase
about one hundred and twenty honest miles in the
interior
,
and beyond Shining River. This was the second day
of practice in the elementary lessons of forest travelling; in
which, however, they had been sufficiently fortunate as to
get a taste of buttermilk land,spouty land,and
to learn the nature of mash landrooty and snaggy
landof mud holes, ordinary and extraordinaryof quick
sandsand corduroys woven single and double twill
and even fords with and without bottom.
The autumn is decidedly preferable for travelling on the
virgin soil of native forests. One may go then mostly by
land and find the roads fewer and shorter; but in the
early spring, branches(small creeks)are brim full, and
they hold a great deal; concealed fountains bubble up in a
thousand places where none were supposed to lurk; creeks
turn to rivers, and rivers to lakes, and lakes to bigger ones;
and as if this was too little water, out come the mole
rivers that have burrowed all this time under the earth, and
which, when so unexpectedly found are styled out there
lost rivers! And every district of a dozen miles square
has a lost river. Travelling by land becomes of course
travelling by water, or by both: viz., mud and water. Nor
is it possible if one would avoid drowning or suffocation to
keep the law and follow the blazed road; but he taks first
to the right and then to the left, often making both losing
tacks; and all this, not to find a road but a place where
there is no road,untouched mud thick enough to bear, or
that has at least some bottom.
Genuine Hoosiers, Corn-crackers, et id omne genus
(viz.all that sort of geniuses)lose comparatively little time
in this species of navigation; for such know instinctively
where it is proper to quit the submerged road of the
legislature
,
and where they are likely to fulfil the proverb out of
the frying pan into the fire. And so we, at last, in utter
despair of finding a royal road to the New Purchase, did
enter souse into the most-ill-looking, dark-coloured morasses,
enlivened by steams of purer mud crossing at right angles,
and usually much deeper than we cared to discover.
The first night we had stayed at a public; yet while
the tavern was of brick, candour forces me to record that
affairs so much resembled the hardware and crockery in
their streaked and greasy state after Messrs. Brown & Co.
had cleaned them, that we were rejoicedprematurely
howeverwhen morning allowed us half-refreshed to
resume our land tacking. But more than once
afterwards
did we sigh even for the comforts of the Brick
Tavern, with its splendid sign of the sun rising and setting
between two partitions of paint intended for hills; and
which sun looked so much like spreading rays, that a friend
soberly asked us afterwardsIf we didn't put up the first
night at the sign of the Fan?
It was now after sunset on our second day, that we
inquired
with much anxiety at a miserable cabin, how far it
was to the next tavern, and were answeredA smart bit
yetmaybe more nor three miles by the blazebut the
most powerfullest road! Since early morning we had,
with incessant driving, done nearly twenty miles; if then we
had, in a bad road, done by daylight about one and a half
miles per hour, how were we likely to do three miles in
the dark, and over what a native styledthe most
powerfullest
road? Hence, as the lady of the cabin seemed
kind, and more than once expressed compassion for my
womin body(so she called Mrs. C.) and as she
allowed
we had better stop where we were, with a sudden and
very respectful remembrance of the Rising or Setting Fan
Tavern, we agreed to halt. And so!at long lastwe
were going really and actually to pass a night in a veritable,
rite-dite, cabin!in a vast forest too!and far enough
from all the incumbrances of eastern civilization!
And did you not thrill Mr. Carlton?
I rather think, dear reader,I did;at least I felt
some sort of a shiver; especially as the gloom of the
frightful shades increased; and the deafening clangour of
innumerable rude frogs in the mires and on the trees arose;
and the whirl and hum and buzz of strange, savage insects
and reptiles, and of winged and unwinged bugs, began and
increased and grew still louder; and vapours damp, chilly
and ftid ascended and came down; and the only field in
sight was a few yards of clearing, stuck with trunks of
deadened trees and great stumps blackened with the
fires! And I think the thrill, or whatever it was, grew more
and more intense on turning towards the onward road, and
finding a suspicion in my mind that it only led to the endless
repetition of the agreeable night scene around usah! ha!
maybe toand then came retrospective visions of
friends in the
far
East nowtillwhat?I hardly know
whattill something, however, like a wish came, that it
were as easy to float
up
the Ohio as down. Heyho!
Nor was the cabin a fac simile of those built in dreams
and novels and magazines. Mine were of bark, and as
neat as a little girl's baby house! This had, indeed, bark
enough about, but still not put up right. It was in truth a
barbarous rectangle of unhewed and unbarked logs, and
bound together by a gigantic dove-tailing called notching.
The roof was thick ricketty shingles, called clapboards;
which when
clapped
on were held down by longitudinal
poles kept apart by shorter pieces placed between them
perpendicularly. The interstices of the log-wall were
chinkedthe chinking being large chips and small
slabs dipping like strata of rocks in geology; and then on
the chinking was the daubingviz. a quant. suff. of
yellow clay ferociously splashed in soft by the hand of the
architect, and then left to harden at its leisure. Rain and
frost had here, however, caused mud daubing to disappear;
so that from without could be clearly discerned through the
wall, the light of fire and candle, and from within, the light
of sun, moon and starsa very fair and harmless tit for tat.
The chimney was outside the cabin and a short distance
from it. This article was built, as chaps, in raining weather,
make on the kitchen hearth stick houses of light wood,
it consisted of layers of little logs reposing on one another
at their corners and topped off when high enough with flag
stones:it was, moreover, daubed, and so admirably as to
look like a mud stack! That, however, was, as I
afterwards
found inartisticalthe daubing of chimneys correctly
being a very
nice
task, although just as dirty as even
political
daubing.
The inside cabin was one room below and one loft above
to which, however, was no visible ascent.I think the
folks climbed up at the corner. The room contained
principally
beds, the other furniture being a table, stick
chairs, and some stools with from two to three legs apiece.
Crockery and calabashes shared the mantel with two
dangerous
looking rifles and their powder horns. The iron ware
shifted for itself about the fire place, where awkward feet
feeling for the fire or to escape it, pushed kettle against pot
and skillet against dutch oven.
What French cook committed suicide because something
was not done to a turn? Ample poetic justice may be
done to his wicked ghost by some smart writer, in
chaining
him with an imabie or two to the jamb of that cabin
hearththere for ever to be a witness of its cookery.
Here came first the pettish outcries of two matron hens
dangled along to a hasty execution; then notes of preparation
sung out by the tea-kettle; then was jerked into position
the dutch oven straddling with three short legs over the
burning
coals; and lastly the skillet began sputtering forth its
boiling lard, or grease of some description. The instruments
ready, the hostess aided by a little barefooted daughter, and
whose white hair was whisped at the top of the head with a
string and horn comb, the hostess put into the oven, balls of
wet corn meal, and then slapped on the lid red hot and
covered
with coals, with a look and motion equal to this
sentence
Get
out of that, till you're done. Then the two
fowls, but a moment since kicking and screeching at being
killed, were doused into the skillet into hot oil, where they
moved around dismembered, as if indignant now at being
fried.
We travellers shifted quarters repeatedly during these
solemn operations, sometimes to get less heat, sometimes
more, and sometimes to escape the fumes direct; but
usually
,
to get out of the way. That, however, being
impracticable
,
we at length sat extempore, and were kicked and
jostled accordingly. In the meanwhile our landlady, in
whom was much curiosity, a little reverence, and a misty
idea that her guests were great folks, and towards whom as
aristocrats it was republican to feel enmity, our landlady
maintained at intervals a very lively talk, as for example:
From Loo'ville, I allow!
Nofrom Philadelphia.
A sudden pausea turn to look at us more narrowly,
while she still affectionately patted some wet meal into
shape for the oven.
Well!now!I wonder!hem!Come to enter land,
'sposepowerful bottom on the Shiningheavy timber,
though. He's your old man, mam?
Mrs. C. assented. The hostess then stooped to deposit
the perfect hall, and continued:
Our wooden country's mighty rough, I allow, for some
folksright hard to git gals here, mamfolks has to be
their own niggurs, mamwhat mought your name be?
Mrs. C. told the lady, and then in a timid and piteous sort
of tone inquired if girls could not be hired by the year?
To this the landlady replied at first with a starethen with
a smileand then added:
Well! sort a allow notmost time, mam, you'll have
to work your own ash hopper(viz. a lie-cask, or, rather,
an inverted pyramidical box to contain ashes, resembling a
hopper in a mill)Nan(name of little flax head)
Nan, sort a turn them thare chickins.
And thus the cabin lady kept on doing up her small stock
of English into Hoosierisms and other figures; now, with
the question directnow, the question implied; then, with
a soliloquythen, an apostrophe: and all the time cleaning
and cutting up chickens, making pones, and working and
wriggling among pots, skillets and people's limbs (?) and
feet, with an adroitness and grace gained by practice only;
and all this, without upsetting any thing, scalding any body,
or even spilling any foodexcepting, maybe, a little grease,
flour and salt. Nor did she lose time by dropping down
curtsey fashion to inspect the progress of things baked or
fried: but she bent over as if she had hinges in the hips,
according to nature doubtless, but contrary to the Lady's
Book; although the necessary backward motion to balance
the head projected beyond the base, did render garments
short by nature still shorter, as grammarians would say, by
position.
Corn-bread takes its own time to bake; and therefore it
was late when the good woman, having placed the chicken
fixins on a large dinner-plate, and poured over them the
last drop of unabsorbed and unevaporated oil, set all on the
table, and then, giving her heated and perspiring face a last
wipe with the corner of her tow-linen apron, and also giving
her thumb and finger a rub on the same cleanser, she sung
out the ordinary summons:
Well! come, sit up.
This sit-up we instantly performedas well, at least, as
we couldwhile she stood up to pour out the tea,
complimenting
all the time its quality, saying'Tisn't nun of your
spice-wood or yarb stuff, but the rele gineine
slore
tea.
Nanny remained near the dutch oven to keep us supplied
with red-hot pones, or corn-ballsand hard enough by the
way, to do execution from cannon. The teacups used, held
a scant pint; and to do exact justice to each cup, the
mistress
held the teapot in one hand and the water-pot in the
other, pouring from both at once till the cup was brim-full
of the mixture:an admirable system of impartiality, and
if the pots have spouts of equal diameters, the very way to
make precisely half and half. But sorry am I to say, that
on the present occasion, the water-pot had the best and
easiest delivery.
And
could
you eat, Mr. Carlton?
How could we avoid it, Mr. Nice? Besides, we were
most vulgarly hungry. And the consequence was, that, at
the arrival of the woodman and his two sons, other
cornbread
was baked, and, for want of chicken, bacon was fried.
But how
did
you do about retiring?
We men-folks, my dear Miss, went out to see what sort
of weather we were likely to have; and on coming in again,
the ladies were very modestly covered up in bedand then
wegot into bedin the usual way. I have no doubt Mr.
Carlton managed a little awkwardly: but I fear the reader
will discover, that in his attempts at doing as Rome does,
and so forth, Mr. Carlton departed finally from the native
sweetness and simplicity of eastern and fashionable life;
still we seemed to leave rather an unfavourable impression
at the cabin, since, just before our setting out in the
morning
,
the landlady told the driver privatelyWell! I allow
the stranger and his woman-body thinks themselves mighty
big-bugsbut maybe they aint got more silver than Squire
Snoddy across Big Bean creek; and
his
wife don't think
nuthin on slinging round like her galbut never mind, maybe
Mrs. Callten or Crawltin, or somethin or nuther, will larn
how too.
CHAPTER X.
The voice of one crying in the wilderness.
Really
, Mr. Carlton, unless you tell us whither you are
travelling we will proceed no further.
And really I could not blame you, friends, since, had it
not been for very shame and impracticability, we ourselves,
on the third morning, would have imitated Sawney of
apple-orchard
memory, and crawled back again. But I am on
the very point of telling as distinctly as possible about our
destinationand as you have got thus far, and have
paid
[2]
[2]
Persons that
borrow
this work, and all who
rent
it of some second
rate book-establishment at a fippenny-bit a volume, will of course read
it through.
(?) for the book, you may as well finish it.
We are proceeding as
slowly
as we can in search of the
Glenville Settlement, a place somewhere in the New
Purchase
.
Among other persons we hope to find there, my
wife's mother, my wife's aunt, my wife's uncle, and her
sisters and her brother, John Glenville. One of my purposes
is to become Mr. Glenville's partner in certain land
speculations
,
and with him to establish a store and also a tannery.
Of the New Purchase itself we will speak at large when
we reach that famous countryfamous in itself out there
and to become so elsewhere when its history is published.
As to Glenville Settlement itself, lofty opinions of its
elegancies
began to fall, and misgivings began to be felt, that
its houses would be found no better than they ought to be:
and in these we were not disappointed, as the reader may
in time discover.
The third night of the Searching now approached; and
we had come to a very miserable hut, a ferry-house, on the
top of a high bluff, and fully a quarter of a mile from the
creek below. An ill-natured young girl was apparently the
sole occupant; and she, for some reason, refused to ferry
us over the water, stating, indeed, that the creek could
as yet
be forded, but giving us no satisfactory directions how to
find or keep the ford. Judge our feelings, then, on getting
to the bank, to find a black, sullen and swollen river, twenty
yards widea scow tied at the end of the roadand that
road seeming to enter upon the ford, if, indeed, any ford
was there! I stepped into the boat and, with its
setting-pole
,
felt for the ford; and happily succeeded in finding the
bottom when the pole was let down a little beyond six feet!
No house, except the ferry-hut on the bluff above, was on
this side the water for many a long and weary mile back; and
beyond the water was a low, marshy and, at present, a truly
terrific beech-wood, and, from its nature, known to be
necessarily
uninhabited: so that, unless we could help ourselves,
nobody else was likely to help. With great difficulty, there
fore, and no small danger from our want of skill and hands
enough, we set ourselves over in the scow: and when
safely landed in the mud beyond, we at first determined to
let the boat go adrift as a small punishment to the villany of
the ferry people; but reflecting that possibly some benighted
persons might suffer by this vengeance, we tied the scow
(but of course on the wrong side the river)and splattered
on. In half a mile, strange enough, we met a large party
of women and children, to whom we told what had happened
and what had been done with the scow: on which they
cordially thanked us, it being necessary for them to cross
the river, and in return assured us of a better road not very
far forward, and which led to a preacher's house, where
we should find a comfortable home and a welcome for the
night.
What the oasis of
dry
deserts is, all know; but the oasis
of waste woods and waters isa clearing with its dry land
and sunlit opening. Such was now before us, not indeed
sunlit,for the sun was long since setsuch was before
us; and in the midst of a very extensive clearing was not
a cabin, but a veritable two-story house of hewn and squared
timbers, with a shingle roof, and smoke curling gracefully
upward from its stone chimney! Yes, and there were
corn-cribs
,
and smoke-house, and barn and out-houses of all sorts:
and removed some distance from all, was the venerable cabin
in a decline,the rude shell of the family in its former
chrysalis state!
But our reception!it was a balm and a cordial. We
found, not indeed the parade and elegant variety of the East,
but neat apartments, refreshing fire after the chill damps of
the forest, a parlour separate from the kitchen, and
bedrooms
separate from both and from one another. There,
too, if memory serves right, were six pretty, innocent girls
(no sons belonged to the family)coarsely but properly
dressed; and who were all modest and respectful to their
elders and superiorsa very rare thing in the New
Purchases
,
and, since the reign of Intellect, a rarer thing than
formerly in most Old Purchase countries. The mere
diffusion
of knowledges, without
discipline
of mind in their
attainment, is not so favourable to virtue and good manners
as Lyceum men think. Our six little girls were mainly
educated on Bible principlesliving fortunately in that dark
age when every body's education was not managed by
legislatures
and taxes. The law administered by irreligious
or infidel statesmen, or by selfish and sullen demagogues,
is
always
opposed to the Gospel.
No pains were spared by the whole family in our
entertainment
:
and all was done from benevolence, as if we
were children and relatives. The Rev. William Parsons
and his lady, our hosts, had never been in the East, or in
any other school of the Humanities; and yet with
exceptions
of some prejudices, rather
in favour
, however, of the
West than
against
the East, this gentleman and lady both
beautifully exemplified the innate power of Christian
principles
to make men not only kind and generous, but
courteous
and polite.
In my dreams no oasis of this kind had appearedyet
none is so truly lovely as that where religion makes the
desert and the wilderness blossom as the rose. I have
been much in the company of clergy and laity both, and in
many parts of the Union, and my settled belief in
consequence
is, that the true ministers of the Gospel, in spite
of supposed characteristical faults and defects, and
prejudiees
,
are, as a class, decidedly the very best and noblest
of men.
We discovered that Mr. Parsons, like most
located
and
permanent
pastors of a wooden country, received almost
literally nothing for ecclesiastical services. Nay, Mrs.
Parsons incidentally remarked to Mrs. C. that for seven
entire years she had never seen together ten dollars either
in notes or silver! Hence, although suspecting he would
refuse, and fearing that the offer might even distress him, I
could not but sincerely wish Mr. P. would accept pay for
our entertainment: and the offer was at last made in the
least awkward way possible. But in vain was every
argument
employed by me, that decorum would allow, to
induce his acceptancehe utterly refused, only saying:
My dear young friend, pay it to some preacher of the
Gospel, and in the same way and spirit the present service
is rendered to you. And here, in justice to ourselves,
we must be permitted to record that we did most gladly,
and on many more occasions than one, repay our debt to
Mr. Parsons in the way enjoined.
Formerly it was indeed rare, that any one in the Far
West, however poor, a ferryman or a tavern keeper, would
ask or take if offered, a cent for his services from any
man known as a preacher. True, the immunity existed
in a few places under a belief that preachers ought not to
expect or receive the smallest salary; and sometimes a
preacher was actually questioned on that point, and treated
according to his answer: but still in the primitive times,
especially of the New Purehase, the vast majority of
woodsmen would have indignantly scouted the thought of
demanding pay from a preacher, and that whether he
received
a
small
stipend for his own services, or as was the
common case, nothing. Once a clerical friend of the
author's travelled nearly one thousand miles in woods and
prairies, and brought back in his
inexpressibles
-pocket, the
identical
pecunia
carried with him for expensesviz.
Fifty-Cents
!
That, on leaving home, he had supposed would
be enough;it proved too much!
During my Western sojourn, I was powerfully impressed
with the importance and necessity of forming a new
Society
;
nor has the notion been abandoned since leaving that
country. I have been indeed always deterred from making
the attempt, from its internal difficulty, from its entire
novelty
,
and a deep settled conviction of its great
unpopularity
the moment it is announced. Indeed, I fear the thing
is wholly impracticable in an age when all kinds of public
instruction is gratuitousand it is deemed enough to be
honoured with a hearing in public, and to hear the
criticisms
of audiences that all know all things, and even
something to boot, as well and maybe a little better than
the literati themselves; but so much would my scheme, if
adopted, do to alleviate the great distresses, anxieties and
privations of many very worthy clergymen, that I will
venture to give a hint of the plan, even though I may deemed
a visionary. The Society I propose is to bear this title:
The-make-congregations-PAY-what-they-voluntarily-PROMISE-Society
.
For which I shall only now name one
reasonviz that most clergymen
do
perform all they ever
promiseand often a very great deal more. If the Society
is now ever formed by others, I must here once for all,
however, positively decline the honour of being one of the
travelling agentsI can stand some storms, but not all.
Certain wits sneer here, and reversing the Indian's
remark
,
say poor preachpoor pay; and please
themselves
with drawing contrasts between the Western and
the Eastern styles of preaching. But take away libraries
from our preachers, take away the sympathy and the
applause;
make such work, not with small and very often
incompetent stipends as is the case pretty generally here,
but with
no
salary whatever; make them work, chop wood,
plough, ride day after day, and night after night in dim,
perilous, endless wilds; bid them preach in the open air
or between two cabins, or in an open barn, or even
barroom
,
without notes or preparation, and all this weary,
sick, jaded; smoke and suffocate them in a cold, cheerless
day, with a fire not
within
but
without
the house, to which
the congregation repair during the sermon in committees
both for heat and gossipdo all this and we shall hear no
more of the contrast. And yet within those grand old
woods you shall often hear bursts of eloquencestirring
appealsstrains of lofty poetryay, the thunderings of
resistless speech, that would move and entrance through all
their length and breadth the cushioned seats of our
bedizzened
churches! True, as a whole, even such discourses
may not do to print. What then? Is a sermon the best
adapted to be spoken,
always
the best to be printed? Does
not the patent steam press squeeze the very life and soul
out of most sermons? Granted that the
notes
of a preacher
may be printed as the
notes
of a musicianstill that
preacher himself must be present to make his notes speak
forth the latent senseand if he find not the sense and
spirit there he expectedto put them there at the impulse
of the moment. The very Reverend Lord Bishop
Baltimore
Mr. Carlton!we are impatient to continue the search
for Glenville.
Oh! yestruetrue!advance we then to a new
chapter.
CHAPTER XI.
Cum subito  sylvis, macie confecta suprema
Ignoti nova forma viri, miserandaque cultu.
Respicimus: dira illuvies, immissaque barba,
Consertum tegmen spinis.
On
the morning of the fourth day, about ten o'clock, A.
M., we emerged from the forest upon a clearing one mile in
length, and a half a mile in breadth: and nearly in its
centre stood Woodville, the capital of the New Purchase
a village just hewed and hacked out of the woods, fresh,
rough and green. And this identical town, reader, is, we
are informed, somewhere about twenty miles from
Glenville
unless
in the contraction of the roads in dry seasons,
when the distance is variously estimated at from sixteen to
nineteen miles. And as we have a letter of introduction
to Dr. Sylvan of the capital, and shall remain here an
hour, it seems the very time to describe Woodville, in and
about which, as the centre of our orbit, we moved for nearly
eight years.
Woodville was now almost three years old; large,
however
,
for its age, and dirty as an undisciplined, neglected
urchin of the same years, and rough as a motherless cub.
It was the destined seat of a University: hence when Mind
whose remarkable tramp was now
being
(hem!)heard,
halted here in its march some years after, in the shape of
sundry learned and great men, we were all righted up,
licked into shape and clarified. But to day, never were
strange animals so stared at, walked around and remarked
upon near at hand by the brave, and peeped at by the
modest
and timid, from chinks and openings, as were we, tame
and civilized bipeds, Mr. and Mrs. C., by our
fellow-creatures
of Woodville. Why, we could not then conjecture
unless because Mr. C. wore a coat and was shavedor
because Mrs. C. had on no cap, and a cap there was worn
by all wives old and younga sign in fact of the conjugal
relationand so it was suspicioned if Mrs. C. was not
my wife, she ought to be. N. B. The caps most in vogue
then were made of dark, coarse, knotted twine, like a
cabbage
netand were worn expressly as the wives
themselves
saidto save slicking up every day, and to hide
dirt!
But here comes Dr. Sylvan, and we must introduce him.
First, however, be it understood that Woodville even then,
had two classes, the superior and the inferior; the former
shaved
once a week, the latter once in
two
weeks, or
thereabouts
.
At our first meeting, which was accidental, I was
at a loss where to class my friend; and had we not already
acquired some art in decyphering character by studying the
countenance and the mien, and not by looking at the dress,
or rather the want of it, we should have fallen into a great
mistake about this true Christian and gentleman.
Shoes he wore, it is truebut one a coarse cow-hide
laced boot, the other a calf-skin Jefferson, or some other
presidential name. And this latter was well blacked,
though not shiney; but the cow-hide had been two stiff,
stubborn and greasy, to receive its portion. Above the
Vol. I.4
Jefferson was a stockingless anclepresumptive, and even
fortiori
evidence that the ancle in the boot was in a
natural
condition. Coat he wore none; but he had on a
Kentucky-jean vest, open to its lowest button, and allowing
the display of a reddish-yellow flannel shirt bosom, his
arms being encased in sleeves of thick cotton something,
and all unembroidered. As a rare extravagance, and which
placed him in the aristocratic class of democrats, the
Doctor
wore
, not
carried
, a pocket-handkerchief; and he
wore it circumambient,the cotton bandana going over
one shoulder, and under the opposite arm, and then both
ends met and were tied just above his
os femoris
. This
luxury, however, was used only as a sweat rag, and
not as a nose-cloth,delicate names applied
appropriately
to a handkerchief, as it was employed to wipe off
perspiration or to blow the nose. As to the Doctor's nose,
it was, in its necessities, most cruelly pinched and twisted
between his finger and thumb; and these were then wiped
on the rag just mentionedon the plan of the man that
topped the candle with his fingers, and then deposited the
burnt wick in the snuffers. The operation was certainly
performed with great skill, yet it seemed unnatural at the
time; and it was not till I had seen the governor himself
in a stump speech, and the judge on the bench, perform
the same instinctively and involuntarily, that I came to
regard the affair as natural, and to conclude that, after all,
handkerchiefs were nothing more than civil conveniences.
Such was the leaden casketthe outer man; but
reader
,
within was a rare jewel. With a little fixing, this
gentleman
would easily have adorned and delighted the best
company in the best places. He was a brave soldier, an
able statesman, and a skilful physician; and if not
learned
,
he was extensively and even profoundly read in his
favourite studies, medicine and politics. His person,
disfigured
even by his dress, was uncommonly fine, his
countenance
prepossessing, and his conversation easy,
pleasant
,
and instructive. In the legislative assemblies he
was highly respected, and often his influence there was
unbounded; and happily that influence was usually well
directed. The Doctor, in short, would have graced the
halls at Washington. As a husband and a father, no man
was ever more affectionate; and as a physician, none
more kind, tender, and anxiousindeed he not only
prescribed
for a patient, but, as far as possible, nursed him.
A little more
moral
courage would have made Dr. Sylvan
a still more valuable friend. It was strange, however, that
so brave a man in the field, should have been occasionally
cowed in the presence of political foesbut so it was; and
this was the only material blemish in a man otherwise
good, noble, and generous.
Other citizens may be introduced hereafter; at present,
we shall speak of Woodville itself. This was, as has been
stated, the capital of the New Purchasethe name of a
tract of land very lately bought from the Indians, or the
Abor'rejines, as the Ohio statesman had just then named
them, in his celebrated speech in the legislature:Yes,
Mr. Speaker, yes sir, said he, I'd a powerful sight
sooner go into retiracy among the red, wild, Abor'rejines
of our wooden country, nor consent to that bill. The
territory lay between the north and south Shining Rivers
called sometimes the Shinings, sometimes the Shineys,
from the purity of the waters and the brightness of the
sandsand it contained fine land, well timbered and
rolling
.
The white population was very sparse, and mainly
very poor persons, very illiterate, and very prejudiced,
with all the virtues and vices belonging to woodsmen.
Among them were very few, indeed scarcely any, persons
born east of the mountains; and our community was a
pure Western onemen of the remote West being by far
the majority of the settlers.
As a tribe, the Indians had themselves gone into
retiracy
,
away beyond the great father of waters; yet many
lingered in their favourite hunting-grounds and around the
graves of warriors and chieftains; and we often met them
in the lonely parts of the wilderness, seemingly dejected;
and now and then they came gliding like sad spectres into
Woodville. The town itself stood on the site of their own
wigwam village. Here they spent hour after hour, with
unerring arrows splitting apples and knocking off
six-pences
some fifty or eighty yards distant; and once when
taunted for want of skill, on assurance of immunity,
they gratified and surprised us by sending two arrows
against the ball of the court-house steeple, full seventy
feet high, and with force enough to leave two holes in its
gilt sidesand these, the Doctor writes me, remain to this
day.
The grand building
then
was this very court-house. Its
order of architecture I never ascertainedit was,
however
,
most certainly a pile. The material was brick of a
fever-colour; the building being kept under and down by
the steeple just named, which topped off with its gilded
ball and spire, straddled the roof, determined to keep the
ascendency. The vane was an uncommonly wise one,
utterly refusing, like earthly weathercocks and demagogues,
to turn about by every wind; and yet when in the humour
it whirled about just as it pleased, and without any wind
emblem of our hunters and woodsmen, who seemed to like
the vane for its very inconsistency and independence.
From the road or street a double door opened immediately
into the court-room. This was paved all over with brick,
to cool the bare feet in summer, and in winter to bear the
incessant stamping of feet shod with bull-skin boots armed
to the centre of the sole with enormous heels, and with
the sole and all fortified with rows of shingle nails:four
such feet were equal to one rough-shod horse. The
pave
was, of course, dust sometimes, sometimes mortar. Each
side the door and within the room were stairs. These
were deflected from a perpendicular just enough to rest at
the top like a ladder to a new building in a city; so that
we climbed, ladder-like, to our second story, where several
rooms were found well finished and convenient for their
usesthe sole excellency in the structure.
West from this citadel of justice was the guardian of
libertythe jail; the close vicinity of the two reminding
one forcibly of a doctor's shop adjoining a grave-yard.
This keep, in its construction, was in imitation of a
conjuror's
series of box within box; for first was an exterior
brick house, and then within it another house of hewed
logs. No wall, however, surrounded the prison; hence,
from its only cell prisoners used, through a little grated
window open to the public square, to converse unrestrained
with their friends or attorneys. The consequence
uniformly
was a very magical trick, the exact reverse of what
happened with the wizard boxes: for while the piece of
silver conjured from your fingers would most miraculously
be found in the very last of the indwelling series, the
condemned
thief or murderer safely caged in our interior cell,
at the very moment the officers wished him to come and be
hung, or some such exaltation, lo! and behold! then and
therethe criminal was not! And at every renewal of this
curious trick, which was two or three times a year, we
were as much amazed as ever!
Getting out was still a little troublesome, more so at least
than not getting in; and so a rowdy school-master of the
Purchase, against whom were charges of assault and
battery
,
used this preventive. He had given bail for his
appearance
,
but the day before the trial the following was
inserted in our Woodville paperthe Great Western
Republican Democrat:
Melancholy.The body corporate of Mr. Patrick Erin,
school-master of Harman's Bottom, was found lodged in
some brush below the log across Shelmire's Creek. It
is known he left town yesterday in a state of intoxicated
inebriety, and with a jug of the creature, so that as he
tried to cross in the great fresh he slipped off and was
drowned.
Accounts, indictments, charges, and so on, were all
quashedand then the day after Mr. Patrick Erin, that
was lately drowned, or somebody exactly like him, was
reeling about the court-yard, pretty well corned, to the
amazement of us all, judge, grand jury, and citizens. The
scamp had written the Melancholy for the paper
himself
,and
for that time escaped all prosecutions.
Churches at the era of the Searching, if by a church be
meant according to certain syllogisms in school logic, a
building of stone, did not grace our capital. But if by
church we understand a congregation, then churches
were about as plenty as private houses. We numbered
five hundred citizens, and these all belonged to some one or
more of our Ten Religious Sectshence almost every
house-keeper had a meeting of his own and in his own
dwelling. I fear we were in all things too superstitious,
and that some of us worshipped an unknown God.
Indeed
most that was done at most of our meetings, was to
revile others and glorify ourselves. Judge, however,
reader
,
of the nature of our fanaticism by an instance or two
that occurred when I resided afterwards in Woodville.
I had a neighbour who conducted
private
prayer, not by
entering his closet and shutting the door, but by opening
his doors and windows, and praying so awfully loud, that
we could distinctly hear and see him too, from our house
distant from his a full half-furlong! But again, some
extra
saints, wishing to worship on a high place, used to
resort to the top of the court-house steeple! A peculiar
grumble repeatedly heard thence several evenings in
succession
,
just after sunset, induced several profane persons
to clamber up to ascertain the causeand there, sure
enough, were the steeple saints away up towards heaven,
at their devotions!pity they ever came down to earth
againthey fell away from grace afterwards, and died, I
fear, and made no sign!
Household churches are sometimes very unfavourable
to devotion and elocution, especially if children belong to
the establishment. If such, indeed, are of the class
mammilla, they
may
be nursed into order: but no apples,
cookies, maple-sugar, little tin cups and hardware mugs of
milk or spring water, can keep quiescent those that are
independent of the milky way. True, they are at last
captured
,
after eluding a dozen hands, and laughing at nods,
frowns, and twisted faces, and are then hurried out,
kicking
away at the air and knocking off a sun-bonnet or two
near the door-waybut then the screamer!and this
followed
by the clamour between the belligerents outside
she
administering a
slapping
dose of the wise man's prescription,
and
it
exclaiming, indignant and outrageous at the medicine!
In one house where we often went to meeting, the owner
annoyed in the week by customers leaving an inner door
open, posted up within the room and on that door the
following
,
and in large letters:
If you
please
, shut the door, and if you
don't
please
shut it any how!
The preacher did not seem greatly disturbed at the first
glancebut alas!
my
weak thoughts wandered away to
the apostolic churches somewhere, and fancied the
surprise
of clergy and laity, if by any modern miracle,
this ingenious caution had, late on Saturday night, taken
the place of certain golden inscriptions!
The universal address on entering a house, after a
premonitory
rap or kick at the door wasWell! who keeps
house? It was a kind of visiting appogiatura to smooth
the abruptness of ingress. Once in a domestic meeting,
we were listening devoutly to the preacher, when a
neighbour
came, for the first time indeed, but by express
invitation
,
to
our
meeting; and after tying his horse, putting
the stirrups over the saddle and pulling down his tow-linen
trowsers, he advanced to the house and startled both
minister
and people by administering a smart prefatory rap to
the door cheek, and drawling out in a slow, but very loud
tone, the usual formulaW-e-llwhokeepshouse?
when he squeezed in among us and took a seat as
innocent
as a babe. Query for casuistsIs it
always
sinful to
laugh in meeting?
One more, dear reader, from our string of onions, and
we suspend at present the ecclesiastical history. A
hostess
who had a church in her house, found her dinner often
delayed by the length of the services, and therefore insisted
that a friend of mine, who was the preacher, should shorten
the exercises, which occasioned the following colloquy:
Sister Nancy, we must not starve our souls.
Well, I allow we'll starve our bodies then!
By no means, sister, is that necessary
Wellhow in creation is a body to have dinner if a
body aint time cook it?
Why, sister, as soon as you hear amen to the sermon
clap on the pot!
Sister Nancy ever after obeyed, and so the pork,
cabbage
,
and all that constitute a regular Sunday mess, were
bubbling away in the prophet's pot about the time the final
hymns, prayers, exhortations, and other appendices to the
regular worship were ended:a beautiful verification of
the remark, that some things can be
done
as well as
others, and, as may be added, at the very same time too.
As to our private edifices, the description of one will aid
an ordinary imagination to picture the rest. And we select
Dr. Sylvan's; he being of the magnates, and his house
being builded by special order.
This domicile was of burnt clay, rough as a nutmeg grater,
and of no decided brick shape or coloureach apparently
having being patted into form, and freckled in the drying.
It was a story and a fraction high, and fastened at one
end to a wing containing the shop. Here was kept the
doctor-stuff, and also the skeleton of Red Fire, and Indian
chief, about whom the reader may expect a story in due
time. Here too was the doctor's rifle and all his hunter's
apparel
:
for, once or twice a year, our Medicine put on his
leather
breeches, his leggins, his moccasins, his hunting shirt,
and fur cap, and with that long and ponderous rifle on his
shoulder, shot-pouch and powder-horn at his hip, and
tomahawk
and knife in the belt, off went he to the uninhabited
part of the wilds. There he continued alone for days and
even weekskilling deer, and turkeys, and bears, &c., and
camping out; stoutly and conscientiously maintaining all
was for the good of his health, while it supplied him at a
small expense with fresh meat. My heart always warmed
towards this genuine and noble woodsman thus apparelled!
oh! the measureless gulf between this
Man
and the
Thing
with curled hair, kid gloves, and anointed head!the
curious, bipedalic civet-cat of the East. I plead guilty,
reader, to a spirit of Nimrod and Ramrodismay! again
could I at times, shutting my eyes to the bitter past; again
could I exchange my now solitary native land for the cabin
and the woods! Alas! the doctor's age would now forbid
our occasional hunts togetherand Ned Stanley and
Domore
Go on with the doctor's house, Mr. Carlton.
Well, on the first floor were two rooms, and connected
with a Lilliputian half-story kitchen forming an Las
near as possible. Between house proper and kitchen was
the dining-room, a magnificent hall eight feet
wide
by six
feet
long
, with a door on each side opening intovacancy;
4*
threats to put steps to the doors made two or three times
a year with great spirit being never executed. Indeed, at
last, Mrs. Sylvan herself declared to Mr. Carlton, that
there was no use in steps, any way, as the children were
mighty spry, and the grown folks had got used to it.
And to tell the truth, the little bodies did climb up and down
like lamp-lighters; and I certainly never heard of more
than half a dozen accidents to grown folks, owing to those
stepless doors all the while of our sojourn in the Purchase.
Nor was the space for eating any inconvenience in a
country
where families rarely all sat at the same time to the
table
,
but came to their feed in squads.
The two rooms named contained each several beds,
couches by night, and settees by day. Indeed, even when
the doctor's lady(an accident that occurred maybe once
in two years)was confined by a slight illness to her bed
in the day-time, citizens of all sexes on visits of friendship
or business, might be seen very gravely and decorously
seated on the side and foot of madame's bedstead, knitting
or talking
Oh! fye!
Ladies, it was unavoidable; and not more surprising
than when French ladies admit exquisites of the worthier
gender to aid at their toilette. How much of the person
may be exposed in stage dancing and French toilettes, we
have never been well-bred enough to ascertain; but in Mrs.
Sylvan's levee nothing, I do know, could be discerned,
save the tip of the nose and the frill of the cap.
From the rooms doors apiece opened into the street;
and as these were very rarely ever shut, summer or winter,
the whole house may be said to have been out of doors.
In fact, as the chimneys were awfully given to smoking, it
was usually as comfortless within the rooms as without.
But in each of the small rooms a large space was cut off
in one corner for a staircase; each stairway leading to
separate dormitories in the fractional storythe
dormitories
being kept apart, as well as could be done, by laths
and plaster. Often wondering at this dissocial wall
upstairs
,
I once inquired of Mrs. Sylvan what it was for, who
answered,
Oh! sir, I had it done
on
purpose
On purpose!it wasn't accidental, then?
Law! bless you, no!it was to keep the boys and
girls apart.
Now where, pray, had modesty in the far east ever built
for her two staircases and a plastered wall, and to the
discomfort
of a whole family? Yet, vain care! The boys had
perforated the partition with peep-holes; but these were
kept plugged by the girls on their side with tow, so that
their own consent was necessary to the use of said
apertures
.
Still I was told the syringes from the shop were
often used on both sides the wall, to give illustrations and
lessons in hydraulics, little perhaps to edification, but very
much to the fun of both squirters and squirted: proof that
even among hoosiers and all other wild men, love laughs
at locksmiths.
South of Woodville, (distance according to the weather,)
and in the very edge of the forest, were, at this time, two
unfinished brick buildings, destined for the use of the
future
University. As we passed to-day in our vehicle, the
smaller house was crammed with somebody's hay and
flax; while the larger was pouring forth a flock of sheep
a very curious form for a college to issue its parchments
which innoxious graduates paused a moment to stare,
possibly
at a future trustee, and then away they bounded, a
torrent of wild wool, to the shelter of the woods.
The larger edifice was called Big College. Its site was
a beautiful eminence; but it was no more fit for a college
than any other moderately large two-story double house.
The other edifice was for the master, and called, very
appropriately, Little College; being a snivelling,
inconvenient
thing, like those in Pewterplatter-alley, ranged
each side a gutter,the whole fragrance and prospect!
We shall resume this subject, saying only now that a most
sumptuous area had been already marred by the ignorance
and paltry cupidity of planners and builders; and among
other irremediable evils, not a grove of forest trees had
been left standing in the campus.
Excellent lands adjacent to the college site had been given
by the Federal Government, for its foundation; the
judicious
sale of which, and also of other fine lands
elsewhere
seated, it was thought would create a fund of nearly
200,000 dollars: but, until that easy-natured and rather
soft-pated old gentleman, Uncle Sam, shall, at the time of
his gifts, prescribe plans and times of commencing colleges,
and make restrictions to obtain for some twenty-five or
thirty years after the opening of the institutions, and
himself
appoint a portion of the trustees, (non-residents even
of the State,) for at least ten years after things are
properly
organized, then must we naturally expect waste and
stupid and ridiculous applications and uses of the people's
money. May be, after all, sectarianism is not so bad for
colleges.
Hark!the rattle of our carriage; so we must hastily
wind up with saying, that east of Woodville was a
wilderness
,
and uninhabited for forty miles; south, cabins were
sprinkled, on an average, one to the league; south-west,
the same; but north and north-west, settlements and
clearings were more abundant.
CHAPTER XII.
Horresco referens, immensis orbibus angues
Incumbunt pelago, pariterque ad litora tendunt.
Our
driver finding the roads worse than his
expectation
,
now contrary to the solemn league and covenant
between
us, refused to proceed another step towards Glenville
without additional pay. While the controversy was
tending
upward in pitch and intensity, (for a very liberal price
had been already paid,) Dr. Sylvan said,
Come, driver, don't leave the strangers this way. I
consider the price Mr. Carlton has already paid you to be
very fair, and that you are bound to go on with him to
Glenvillebut here(action to word)here I'll pay
you a dollar, rather than this lady should not see her
mother to-night. Of course Mr. C. never allowed that
dollar to be paidyet such was the generous spirit of the
man! Alas! that politics should ever have made him lost
to some friends! and for what? ay!
for
what?the good
of the people! Ay! yesand times come, when
politicians
sacrifice first their friends and then cut their own
throats, for that ignis fatuns, and are laughed at!
It was noon, and the roads less bad, and sometimes
almost
good, we were, for awhile, in hopes of seeing our
friends in a few hours. The day, too, was pleasant; and
on the dry ridges being free from great perils, we began to
enjoy the wildness of the primitive world. And what
grander than the column-like trees ascending, many
twenty, many thirty, and some even forty feet, with scarce
a branch to destroy the symmetry! Unable, from their
number, to send out lateral branches, like stalks of grain
they had all grown straight up, hastening, as in a race, each
to out-top its neighbour, till their high heads afforded a
shelter
to squirrels, far beyond the sprinkling of a shot-gun,
and almost beyond the reach of the rifle! The timber in
the Purchase was only trunk and top! Yet where a
hurricane
had passed, and, by destroying a part, allowed room
for the others to grow, there plainly could be seen how
such could toss
giant
branchesbranches in amplitude
and strength greater than the trunks, or rather slim bodies
of puny trees in modern groves and parks!
But here comes our
first
snake story. In answer to some
query about snakes, our landlord at Woodville had replied
that there was a smart sprinkle of rattlesnake on Red
Run, and that it was a powerful nice day to sun
themselves
.
We were now drawing near to the dragon
district
,
and began to experience that vibratory sensation
belonging to snake terror, when lo! a crackling and rustling
of leaves and sticks on our leftand there, sure enough,
was a living snake! It was not, indeed, a rattlesnake, but
a very fierce, large, and partly erect, black one, with a skin
as shiney as if just polished with patent blacking, a mouth
wide open and astonishingly active tongue! Several feet
of head and neck were visible, but how many of body and
tail were concealed can never be told except by Algebra;
for when with curiosity still stronger than fear, the driver
and myself got out for a nearer inspection, not only did her
ladyship increase her vengeful hissing but she was joined
in that unpleasent music by some half dozen concealed
performers
;
and then our new and yet
long
acquaintance,
instead of vanishing, as had been supposed on our nearer
approach, darted head foremost at us, and believe me
reader
,
in the true western style, like greased lightning.
Had a boa made that attack, our retreat could not have
been more abrupt and speedywe pitched and tumbled
into
our wagonand on looking round, our queen snake was
leisurely retiring, attended by more of her subjects than we
even dared to shake a stick at. Some of these were
appaently
infant black snakes; for the protection of which we
then conjectured the dam(?) snake had endeavoured to
intimidate
usin which attempt she had very reasonable
success.
Every noise now by bird or squirrel seemed serpentish;
and every perfume of wild flower or blossom, was like
cucumbers
,
the odour of which resembles the fragrance of a
rattlesnake; and every crooked dark stick in the leaves or
twisting vines was a formidable reptile. At length,
however
,
we had exhausted our snake stories, conquered our
apprehensions, and gliding into other topics, had reached a
point in the forest where was to be sought the path leading
off to Glenville.
Reader, do not, when we speak of roads and paths, figure
a lane between fences; such trammel on the liberty of
travellers, and the freedom of cattle would be intolerable.
No, a road authorised by law is achieved by levelling the
trees between given points, and thus making an avenue in
the woods from twenty to thirty feet wide: the small
stumps being often removed, but all
a size
larger left, only
(
theoretically
) dressed down so as to permit wagons to pass
over without striking the axleif they can. This delicate
performance of wagons is calledstraddling, and is done
by rough ones without fear; other vehicles utterly
refuse
to straddle. As to saplings, such are cut off by one or
more oblique blows, some six or eight inches from the
ground, the remaining stumps thus conveniently sharpened,
and thre tening to impale whoever may be pitched on to
them from horse or carriage.
On one side usually, some times on both, of large stumps
was a hole from one to two feet deep. Where the stumps
followed in a serrated series, the wheels, but only of
straddling wagons, performed the most exhilarating
see-saw
,
with the most astonishing alternations of plunge,
creak, and splash, till the uproar of a single team would
fill a circle completely of half a mile radius! Indeed,
nothing so enlivened the wilderness! When vehicles
refused to straddle, driving became a work of the most
laborious skill in the perpetual windings among holes
and stumps that was then necessary; or when that was
too
perilous, it became a matter of taste and fancy to choose
among the dozen extemporaneous roads inviting from the
right and left. Hercules himself would have been puzzled
to select sometimes, where all offered equal inducements,
or equal hindrances. These auxiliary ways have
themselves
other helps, and these even other subsidiaries, so
that a person not a woodsman, after an agreeable ride of
some hours discovers often that a very long lane has no turn,
but a very unexpected end, and leads exactlyno where.
We, of course were chock full of instructions and with
all our windings and turnings still kept our eye steadily on
theblazes. The blaze is a longitudinal cut on trees at
convenient intervals made by cutting off the bark with
an axe or hatchet: three blazes in a perpendicular line on
the same tree indicating a legislative road, the single blaze,
a settlement or neighbourhood road. Hence, if desirous to
escape smoky blazes, we willingly kept on through this
sort; although unlike the smoky blazes, this sort is of use
only in the day time.
Well,(to come back)we began to look through the
legal blazes to espy a corner tree cut and notched in a
peculiar
way, at which turning off, we should discover a
single blaze leading to Glenvillewhencould it be
possible
!up
that very tree was coiling an enormous and
frightful serpent!
Obstupuri! steteruntque com! et vox faucibus hsit!
in spite of which all of us spoke out, and Mrs. Carlton
really screamed. Of course we halted; and it being seen
that cutting across was prevented by a ravine, it was at last
concluded that Mr. C. be a committee to reconnoitre, while
the others should remain in the dearbornea retreat from
snakes equal to covering up in bed or shutting one's eyes in
danger. Accordingly, on went capital
I
with a slow and
cautious step, an eye to the rear as well as to the fore, and
flourishing in my hands a very long pole to intimidate his
snakeship before it came to blows, or running away on one or
both sidesbut the scaly rascal budged neither head nor
tail, and yet seemed to swell larger and larger, as we, i. e.
I and the pole advancedtill, strange! now his very form
was changing yet remainingwhen all at once inspired
with a seeming phrenzy, I threw away my pole and dashing
headlong on the serpent I seized him by the tail
Oh!Mr. Carlton!
Precisely as my own wife cried out at first; but as I
maintained the hold and the enormous reptile still remained
inflexibly
bent around the tree, on came at last our friends,
wagon and all; and soon all capable of laughing, were
joined
in the merriment on finding our frightful enemy
subsiding
into the mere form of a snake very ingeniously
wrought with a hatchet into the corner tree and blackened
with charcoal! That indeed was notching in a peculiar
way, as Dr. Sylvan had said; and true enough as he said
also, we should be sure enough to see it.
I may as well add here that some years after as I rode
in company with a lady near this very spot, and I had just
ended the story for her entertainment, we both were no
little startled to see a veritable serpent enacting that same
part on a different tree indeed, and
propri person
i. e. in
his own skin. How he could adhere almost
perpendicularly
to the smooth bark of a large beech I know notyet
there and thus the reptile was about eight feet from the
ground and ten below any branch! On passing I
administered
him a smart switch on the tail with my riding whip:
a compliment he returned by detaching his head from the
bark, and fiercely hissing forth his acknowledgments. Our
amusements, you perceive, reader, are masculine in a
country
of men: and yet we play in civilized places with very
sleek and cunning snakesay, that hiss and bite too!
The Glenville road was a mere path marked by a single
blaze, which we very pertinaciously followed although it
lighted
us along a very circuitous route. In theory, the
shortest line between two points is the straight line; it is
not so in practice out there: at least it is not prudent to be
so mathematically correct in the neighbourhood paths of a
New Purchase. More than once especially when going by
the moss and the sun, and even with experienced
woodsmen
,
the mathematical travelling has occasioned our being
lost for hours, sometimes for days. Hence our backwoods
axiomthe longest is the shortest.
Notice here, a neighbourhood road does not imply
necessarily
much proximity of neighbours. I have travelled all
day long upon a neighbourhood or settlement road and seen
neither neighbours nor neighbours' cabins. Such road
leads sometimes not to a settlement
in act
(i. e. under
the axe)but to a settlement
in posse
(i. e. among the
possums
)viz. a paper settlementa speculator's
settlement
.
And even along an inhabited path,
neighbour
in the
Purchase was to be interpreted scripturally, and I rejoice
to say, was extended to comprise the Samaritans.
Indeed
,
out there
, we were very kind to neighbours
whenever
we could find them: circumstances there created a
kindness and a hospitality
wholly
unknown
in here
.
And now we reached the two story log house at the
entrance
of the bottom of Big Shiney, and where was to
be encountered the most powerful
slashy
land. That
the said slashy land was no better than it should be, may be
inferred from the fact, that it occupied us from half past
three P. M. until seven o'clock precisely in the evening to
do three milesa speed less considerably than that of
birds and even than that of steam cars.
The river was still swollen and turbulent from recent
rains, and although within its banks, it had barely retired
from its overflowings. And now a glorious sunset was
there, far away in the grand solitudes, where century after
century the god of day had gone down while his last beams
were pouring the rich mellow haze of evening over the
distant homes of the East! Gay birds were warbling
farewell songs with distinct and thrilling articulation, while
some darting from bank to bank seemed rays of sunlight
winged and glancing over the waterssuch was their
plumage
!
And squirrels without fear raced and sported on
hoary and patriarchal trees so inclined towards the river,
that from opposite banks they united their umbrageous tops
in green and flowery arches above its bosom! It did seem
as if for once we had surprised nature's self in her wild,
unpruned, rich, varied, luxurious negligence; and were
beholding
the sun, not coming from his chamber a strong man
rejoicing to run a race, but a glorious bridegroom retiring
to the bridal chamber of his spouse!
On the far bank was a small wigwam hut, and below in
the water was tied a clumsy scow; but who was to ferry
us over was not instantly apparent, our shoutings simple
and compound being answered only by Echo, senior and
junior. At last rose in answer the voice of an invisible
wood-nymph, and that was followed shortly by the
appearance
among the bushes of the hamadryad in the shape of
an athletic woman with a red head; who girding up her
loins(
anglic
, pinning up her petticoat)stepped
barefooted
and bareheaded into the boat, her little boy at the
moment casting loose the grape vine ropeits fastening.
She then poled, or set up stream about 100 yards, and
afterwards
,
by a large oar on a pivot at an end of the scow, she
kept the boat nearly at right angles with the banks until the
current brought the ferrywoman as diagonally correct to
where we stool, as if all had been in a fashionable school
on a black board.
Alas! all this was nearly as unromantic as mathematics
themselves; for our heroine was not at all like the lady of
the lake or any other lady made to paddle a skiff in poetry
or painting. She worked a scow to admiration, better truly
than the most poetic creature could have donebut then an
ugly shapeless clumsy scow! and a hearty, red-headed
woman in bare legs and Elssler petticoats!what had such
to do with the sunset and the birds? Poetry, therefore,
being sufficiently cooled down, we embarked; and while
the good hearted, and honest woman insisted she needed
no aid, both Mr. C. and the driver helped to navigate her
boat. It seemed, then, our ferrywoman had never heard
our
shouts, telling us we had not larn'd to holler; and
that having accidentally caught sight of our wagon, she
know'd we wanted over and so had hollored naterally.
And the way
she
could lift up the voice made crag and
cliff and forest far and wide speak with a dozen tongues!
Ay, reader, and we ourselves finallylearned to sing out
O-o-o-o-ver! till the rebellowing of the woods brought
the ferry person to the scow, even if at work in the
clearing
hundreds of yards behind his cabin. This wondrous
art cannot be taught on paper; nor by question and answer,
like other equally valuable matters now a days: but buy this
book, and then we will add when you visit us, this
important
lesson in Wildwood Elocution, gratis.
But happy we! the ferrywoman could tell us all about
the Glenville settlement! and then, unhappy we!in her
directions, which were sufficiently ample, she, like many
other instructors, took for granted that we knew well the
elements and data of which we were profoundly ignorant:
said she, Well I allow you can't scarcely miss the
path to the tan houselittle Jim here's bin thare many a
timeand 'cos the nabers go thare all round the
settlemints
Howsoever keep rite strate along the bottim till
you come to the bio(bayou)then sort a turn to the left,
but not quite'cos the path goes to the rite likebut you
can't cross thare nowwell, strate on is Sam Little's
clerein, till you come to the Ingin graveand after that the
path's a sort a blindbut then it ain't more nor a mile to
ole man Sturgisses, and he lives rite fornence the tan house
over the run.
Of course, reader, the above and most other directions
and speeches in this book like the above, are the filtered
condensation of our own translation: the full vernacular
you could not understand and perhaps might not relish.
But interrogation only rendered our labyrinthical direction
more implicated; and so, not wishing to seem less
sagacious
than little Jim, off we splashed for the bayou, and
here we succeeded so well in a sort-er turn to the left but
not quite, that we soon lost sight of all roads, paths, and
blazes; and then we, hearing the sound of an axe still more
to the left, travelled that direction by ear, through a
wonderous
wilderness of spice-wood, papaw, and twenty
unknown
bushes, briers, and weeds, till we
fell
suddenly into
a clearing, supposed to be our neighbour's, Sam Little's.
Happily it proved to be Squire Brushwood's. For Sam
Little's, it seems, was nothing save a clearing destitute of
any cabin; while Brushwood's was adorned with a double
cabin and all sorts of out-houses: and but for the lucky
loss of our blaze, we should here be recording a night in
the woods, to us then as deplorable as the prophet's
lodging, thus poetically lamented in some ancient version:
Jonah was three days and nights in the whale's belly,
Without fire or candle!
And nothing had he all the time
But cold fish gts to handle!
Whereas, now we were comfortably shedded and had more
corn-bread and bacon than we could devour. And instead
of being alone, our wife had, in addition to us and the
driver, a guard in her bed-room, or rather around her very
bed, a guard of four other menthe squire, the squire's two
sons, and a journeyman chopper, whose axe had invited
and guided us to the clearing; add women and girls too
numerous to mentionso that Mrs. Carlton never felt the
least lonesome the livelong night.
How getting to bed was managed could not be told, as
Mrs. C. made an extemporary screen by hanging
something
whatoh!
a utility on a rope or grape vine
stretched near our quarters: only no one went out to see
about the weather, and from first to last a very animated
talk went on in voices of opposite genders, and even amid
the creaking of ricketty bedsteads and after the dying of the
fire light. Great adroitness is acquired by women-bodies
especially in going to repose amidst company. For
instance
,
we were at Major Billy Westland's, in Woodville,
once in company with several male magnates, when the
major's lady withdrew from our circle at the fire, as for
some domestic duty; but on my accidentally looking around,
three minutes after, lo! there was a night-cap peering
above the kiver-lid, and Mrs. Major Billy Westland's
head in it!
Men-folks oversleeping themselves often find, on
opening
their eyes, the girls fixing the table for breakfast;
and then they contrive to put on their indispensables under
the cover and in bed. Hence, on one memorable occasion,
when we were at a wedding, our groom having overslept
the early morn, made this
covert
arrangement with his
inexpressibles, and then most courageously thrust out
among us his invested limbs. But woful ingenuity!just
then was entering at the opposite door, our groom's
brother
,
a gawkey young gentleman, with a green gosling
countenance, who seeing first the pantalooned limbs,
suddenly
exclaimed in utter amazement at such conduct:
Hey! if our Jess did'nt sleep in his breeches!
Reader!good night! we are sleepy.
THE FINDING.
CHAPTER XIII.
Ilionea petit dextra laevaque
A shaking with both hands
Years
had passed since Mrs C. parted with her nearest
relatives and among these her mother. We were naturally
in haste then to leave Brushwood in the morning. Glenville
being only two miles distant. What was thought of us at
Brushwood could now be only conjectured; but we learned
afterwards, that the screen made by Mrs. C. was deemed
powerful proud doings of stuck-up folks. And sorry
am I to say that in the Purchase, as in some other places,
such opinion is formed and similarly expressed about
extra
cleanliness, decency, modesty, learning, and the like: if
these things exceed your neighbour's, they subject you to
suspicion, often to dislike, and not infrequently to
rancorous
persecution. Perhaps the thoughts about you in a
New Purchase are boldly uttered, yet still, in an Old
Purchase, scorn, envy, hatred, are felt for your real or
supposed excellences, and acted out at the first fair
opportunities
.
However, Mr. Carlton himself got so far rubbed
down
in time as to need considerable rubbing
up
afterwards;
for he at last, in the Purchase, earned the appellation of
amost powerful clever feller, what could lay down
ahind an ole-log and hide raw bakin like the best on 'em
as naturally, too, as if brung up to it.
Receiving very
straight
directions for a very
crooked
path, we set out for Home! The path was rarely ever
travelled by wheels and indeed unblazed; and hence we
proceeded partly by instinct and partly by trace of ruts seen
usually by the eye, but often felt after by the feetone of
us always walking before the dearborne, while the other
drove. This path I had always great difficulty in finding.
And once the whole Glenville community nearly, having
to deviate from its direction on account of high waters,
were actually lost in the bottom for three long hours! To
imprint the affair more deeply we met, too, an accident at
that time. Endeavouring then to drive along a slippery
and very steep inclination, away suddenly pitched horse
and wagon, and away also Mr. and Mrs. Carlton, and one
young lady, and two little babies, all in an indescribable
and mixed succession of somersets, down into the ravine;
and yet, strange to tell! no one was hurt, nothing
important
broken, although when about half way to the bottom
of the hill, the vehicle was caught by sapling and bush,
the wagon there sticking, wheels uppermost and the horse
on his back with the whole four legs turning their shod
hoofs into thin air instead of thick earth! What it was, in
such a false position, I cannot tell; but so did the two
dumb things look, so patient, so resigned, appealing so
touchingly with outstretched limbs for help, that it was long
before laughter would permit Mr. Glenville and myself to
restore wheels and legs to the order of nature. And when
restored to a proper standing in society, never surely did
horse and wagon move with more unanimity!never did a
horse before so snort, so toss his head, so shake mane and
tail, till by practising all parts of his body he was convinced
it was only a very curious dream, just passed, and he was
truly himself again! Consequently after that I preferred
the better path by Sam Little's clearing and the Indian
grave. But on the present morning of the Finding,
Brushwood
had directed us the short cut to Glenville
Settlement
.
The reader will of course conjecture what happened to
noviceswe lost our way. What with turning aside for
logs un-straddleable, brush impenetrable, briars intolerable,
and for holes we cared not to fathom, we made the short
path considerably longer than the long one, till all at once
on clambering up a steep hill, farther progress was
barred
by a lofty and tortuous fence,
worming
around a clearing! At
the unwonted noise of cracking brush and bush in this
quarter
,
soon, however, came forth from a good log-house in the
centre, an almost gigantic yet venerable old gentleman,
who, to our great surprise, said he wasthe Mr. Sturgis
i. e. ole-man Sturgisfornence the tannery in the very
suburbs of Glenville! Very near! Reader!
After helplng to extricate and get our carriage in front of
his settlement, the old man advised, that, instead of now
going away round by a very obscure path, we had better
proceed right down the hill in the direction of the
tan-house
:
especially as to drive down the hill would, after
all, be not much worse, than the way up the hill just
come.
Accordingly we prepared to alight in Glenville: not
indeed by flying, but by slipping and sliding down on
them from our sylvan summit. And this was accomplished
as follows:our historian and his lady advanced
in
pedibus
(Latin
is more ancient than French,)or more
vulgarly
,
on foot, some yards before the wagon; then the
author judiciously presented one side towards the bottom of
the declivity, and the other towards its top; and then the
author's wife did ditto's; after which her lower hand in
his upper, the happy couple commenced the glide in that
picturesque attitude and series of linked cadences, he with
his dextral and unimpeded hand retarding the velocity,
when becoming perilous, by seizing, at suitable intervals,
bushes and saplings, until, without accident, Mr. and Mrs.
Carlton had almost alighted on the border of a delightful
and pellucid little creek. While above, the driver, on foot
too, and holding his horse near the bit of the bridle, and his
5
wagon, were tearing and crashing and thundering down,
the man partly on his knees, and the horse in a sitting
posture
like a pet-dog at dinner-time, till all seemed like an
avalanche of horses and wagons from the cloudsor at
least, in western parlance, a right smart sprinkle of the
articles. At all events, the unwonted uproar and shouts,
and voices and merriment, had announced that some
wonder
was raining down on the settlementand hence, they
rushed from the tannery to see what was descendinglo!
dear readerwe, Mr. and Mrs. Carlton, now ended our
descent by gliding into the open arms of uncle John
Seymour
and his nephew John Glenville! And was not that
stumbling upon luck?
Did you ever go away off, when travelling was the
work of monthsaway off, a thousand miles, in search of
the nearest and dearest kindredand then, unexpectedly,
on a bright and fragrant May morning, find those dear ones
in the dark depths of an almost impervious wilderness?
Then did, at that moment, thoughts of the pasthappiness
homescomfortsay! of a thousand nameless past things
rush like a torrent to your heartthen you know how we
met and rejoicedand wept! How we crossed the
creek I never knewall were shaking hands right and left
some asking questionssome answeringsome sobbing
and how could one see with eyes full of tears?But still
I do believe we were both
hugged
over!
But see! all Glenville is comingand the daughter
is once more upon the bosom of her mother!yet the voice
of weeping are not tears of lamentationthey are tears
of joy!
That morning thanksgiving prayers went up to heaven
from three households united, and hymns of praise
resounded
amid the wilds: for these families were
Christian
and
wherever, in their many wanderings, they halted
as pilgrims for a day or a year, there rose the domestic
altars.
God is every where!
FIRST YEAR.
CHAPTER XIV.
locus est et pluribus umbris.
a shady place for several friends.
Well
! this is Glenville. Has any body accompanied
our fortunes thus far?that body may as well see us also
out of the woods. A sojourn for a few years amid the
privations and hardships of the New Purchase will fit you
better for a home in the Eastin case, we mean, you stay
not so long as to be forgotten by the time you go back. And
even thenafter the first bitter feelings of natural sorrow,
of surprise, and perhaps of chagrinbelieve me, such a
force and independence will have been added to the
character
,
so much self-reliance gendered, as to furnish an almost
perpetual and complete substitute in your own resources.
One perhaps, after a sojourn of the proper kind in the New
Purchase, is rather in danger of too great a contempt for
the things of the old: at all events, one, whose spirit is
not naturally bad, is very much inclined to feel and say,
with the good humour of Bernadotte, when he finds on his
return that the world does not care a fig for him, well,
tell the world, I do not care a fig for it.
The man that has
practised
doing with little, and is fully
satisfied with it, and for years has been very happy with it,
is really superior to the man even of large fortune, and of
many wants. Can
he
be vexed for the want of grand
houses, fine furniture, sumptuous food, gay equipage, costly
apparel and the like, who, if he despise not such matters, is
soberly and philosophically indifferent to them? He has
really so schooled himself amid rough huts, rude furniture,
coarse food, and homespun clothes, as, in his very heart, to
prefer them with their freedom and independence, to the
wearisome and silly, and endless anxiety and toil of living
for mere show.
On your return, if you have your health, in what can any
one, who fancies himself superior, excel you? He knows
not as muchhe can eat no moresee no moredrink no
moresleep no betterlive no longer. Can he drive a gig?
you can drive it where he dares not venture. Suppose he
outrides
youyou can
outwalk
him. Does the chap shoot a
double-barrelled gun?so can you, if you wouldbut you
transcend him, oh! far enough with that man's weapon,
that in
your
hands deals, at your will, certain death to
one
selected victim, without
scattering
useless wounds at a
venture
in a little innocent feathered flock.
Stay with us, then, reader; and when you do return, you
will certainly enjoy some plain every-day conveniences at
home, once undervalued, perhaps despised, but which
belong
to the tenor of life; you will bear, with good humour,
a thousand petty disquietudes of civilized life, that once
kept you, and still keep the self-indulged, undisciplined,
fashionable vulgar ina stew. Yes! you will be cured
of a very common and dreadful malady, rendering one
miserable in himself and hateful to othersthe fidgets.
Nay you will be purged of the struts and swaggers
the emptiness of a puffy, self-important inflation, generated
by too long an acquaintance among brick and mortar houses,
and medicated wooden pavements. In a word, if you
become
not quite as great a man as you formerly designed to
be(and as city and town folks all at one time intend)you
will unquestionably, if disposed to learn by a few years
residence in a bran New Purchase, become a better and a
happier man.
Come, then, I will introduce our settlement. And first,
this term is applied to a place where one or more families
having bought lands at the government price from Uncle
Samuel, have actually
located
on it; and, not to a place
bought merely for speculation, or merely trespassed upon
by any of that nondescript and original racethe
squatters
.
Indeed, to these a settlement is so odious, that they
either pay for land and turn into settlers, or, as is the more
frequent, they become indignant at the legal invasion of
their domain, and hastilyabsquatulate; that is, translated
they go and
squat
in another place. And such is the
effect of
settlements
often in here, up north, down east, and
so on, where well looking and fine dressed gentlemen
become
so offended at the impertinence of neighbours, that
they too absquatulate: and perhaps better so, as a civilized
squatter would rarely make a good neighbour, either
in
or
upon
a settlement.
Out there, a settlement usually takes its name from the
person that first enters the land, i. e. buys a tract at the
land office. Often it takes the name from the family first
actually settling, or owning the largest number of acres;
and very frequently from the person that establishes a ferry,
a smithery, a mill, a tannery, and, above all, a Store.
Hence, whilst our brother-in-law was no patriarch in looks
or age, owned no boundless territory, and was, in stature,
the least in his father's house, yet because he tanned
hides(for shoes we mean)and intended soon to sell
tape by the yard, and buy pork by the cwt.we were The
Glenville Settlement. And this colony had, within its
territories
,
as many as three human habitations; two
occupied
by actual settlers, and one by a very special sort of a
squatterthe Leatherstocking of our tribe.
On an eminence between the othersand, provided you
knew how to holler, within hearing of both, but owing to
intervening trees, not within sightstood the primitive and
patriarchal cabinthe capitol. South-west, distant a
quarter
of a mile was the cabin of the Reverend Mr. Hilsbury,
lately married to one of Mrs. Carlton's sisters; and
directly
south of the episcopal residence, was the tannery,
to which John Glenville, of Glenville, owed the honour of
giving his name to the colony. Due east from the capitol
about a furlong, was the squateree ofuncle Tommy
Seymour
,
our Leatherstocking. So much of his long life had
passed in the wild woods, and among the Indians, that he
had thoroughly imbibed their feelings and their sentiments,
and had adopted some of their habits; and therefore he
had not only acquired an utter distaste, but even a sovereign
contempt for most usages and trammels of civilization.
And Uncle Tommy was also a preacherhence Glenville
was two-thirds sacred and only one secular!
Around, were a few other settlements, Sturgis'
Hackberry's
Undergrowth'sBrushwood's,
and some more;
all distant from us and one anothersome one mile, some
ten. The unentered and unsettled tracts between, were
our commons, called the Rangeused for hunting,
swine-feeding
,
and the like. The range had, however,
inhabitants
innumerable:viz. deer, wolves, foxesblue, gray,
and blacksquirrels ditto, ground-swine, vulgarly called
ground-hogs, and wild turkeys, wild ducks, wild cats, and
all the wild what-y'-callums:opossums up down in
and under gum trees:snakes, with and without rattles, of
all colours, from copper to green and black, and of all
sizes, from ever so little to ever so big. Addthe
neighbours' hogs,so wild and fierce, that when
porktime
arrives, they must be hunted and shot, like other
independent
beasts. Especially is this the case if mast
(nuts and acorns)is abundant; when swiney becomes
wholly savage, and loses all reverence for corn-cribs and
swill-tubs. Ay, gentle reader, our semi-wild boar is a
fellow something different in look, and rather worse to
encounter, when saucy or angry, than the vile mud-hole
wallower of the Atlantic! If one would understand the
wild-boar hunts of Cyrus, or the feudal baronsgo, get
acquainted with the semi-wild fellow of the Purchase.
The range is perambulated by cattle horned and unhorned;
by cows, belled and un-belled; and by horses, some with
yokes and some without:but notice, yokes are not to
prevent
jumping
out
of inclosures, but,
into
them. In the
range are also wonderful colts with cunning saucy faces,
shaggy manes done up with burrs, and with great long tails,
so tangled that Penelope herself could never disentangle
creatures almost uncatchable, and if caught nearly
untameable
.
Nearly south of Glenville was the grand townour
Woodville. And nearly west, some eight or nine miles and
a piece,
was
Spiceburghat least in dry times; for the
town being on the bottom of Shining River was, in hard
rains, commonly under water, so that a conscientious man
dared not then to affirm without a proviso, where
Spiceburgh
was, precisely. North-east from us, some fifty long
lonesome miles, was the capital of the StateTimberopolis;
the seat of the legislature and of mortality. But death
in later times there domineered less. Whether the
legislature
reformed and refrained from uncommon mischief is
not so easy to say. Parties are to this hour. I am
informed
,
themselves, divided on that subjectthe opposite
partizans
,
however, exactly agreeing in this:viz. that the
Ins
are a set of ignorant, selfish, truckling, snivelling
humbuggers
,
while the
Outs
are the men to save the statemutatis
mutandis.
In different directions, from Glenville were also Mapville,
Mapbourgh and Maptown; in all which the difficulty in
seeing the towns was not owing to the houses, but the
trees. A skilful woodsman could, indeed, sometimes
find a single housethe whole village: but as the
citizens were all absent hoeing corn or the like, except one
or more dirty bare-legged babies fastened inside, the lucky
hunter, except for the name of being in town, might nearly
as well be in the country. Unexpectedly, too, would a
traveller sometimes come into a town of thirty or forty
habitations but without a solitary inhabitantthe cabins all
standing cold and empty like snail-abandoned shells! For,
know, reader, that genuine agues out there are often so
powerful and vindictive as to shake, not only individuals
out of their skins, but whole communities out of their towns
and villages! In this latter case the folks swarm like bees
and re-settle where the legislature appoints a new seat,
passing at the time a law that the ague shall shake them out
no more.
This, then, is Glenville, its suburbs, its environs, its
neighbourhoods
,
its rangesall on that grand scale belonging to
Nature in the Far West, where we have grand woods,
grand prairies, grand caves, grand rivers, grand bears, grand
swinegrand every thing! except, maybe, grand rascals, in
which we doubtless excel here in the East.
Let us next enter the patriarchal cabin. Here we
become
acquainted with Uncle John Seymour and his two
sisters, widows, Mrs. Glenville and Aunt Kitty Littleton.
Here are also encabined John Glenville and Miss Emily
Glenville, the youngest of the family. Here too is a young
woman for helpin fact the gal; and here are to abide
Mr. and Mrs. Carlton
All in one cabin?
All in one cabin. But a family you know is the most
compressible and yet the most expansive of bodies. Yes!
here we two and a half families endured the compression
and lost no breath, and even seemed to have a few spare
inches of room! And yet many years after, in a different
part of the world, did Mr. Carlton's own single family
expand
and spread, and without any violent effort whatever,
their importance through a mansion containing fourteen
apartments, with cellars, and garrets, and kitchens and all
and still fret for the want of room!
But what led to the formation of your colony, Mr.
Carlton
?what
induced gentlemen and ladies of your
education
and endowments to settle in so remote an obscurity?
Thank you, Sirthe reasons alluded to in the
commencement
of this history operated in our case as in the cases of
a thousand others; but it was mere accident that turned our
folks to their location in the New Purchase.
The Seymours at the close of the last war with Great
Britain resided in Philadelphia. Like others they risked
their capital during the war in the manufactories of that
era; and like others, when peace was proclaimed, the
Seymours
were ruined. John Seymourfamiliarly known
among us as Uncle Johnon his arrival from the South,
where, during a residence of many years he had acquired
a handsome fortune, found his sisters Mrs. Glenville and
Mrs. Littleton, in great distress, their husbands being
recently
dead; and having not long before his return buried
his wife, (who however had borne him no children,) he
immediately
took under his protection the two widowed ladies,
his sisters, together with the four children of Mrs.
Glenville
.
Fearing his means were not sufficient to sustain the
burden providentially cast upon him, at least in the way
that was desirable, he resolved to remove to Kentucky.
Accordingly, the new organized family all removed to the
West; with the exception of Miss Eliza Glenville, who
was left to complete her education with the excellent and
justly celebrated Mr. Jaudon. With this amiable and
interesting
creature,
[3]
[3]
The young lady.
Mr. Carlton, who somehow or other
5*
always had a taste for sweet and beautiful faces, became
acquainted
Oh! Mr. Carlton!
do
tell all about this
Not now, young ladies, something must be reserved for
future works. But after the usual courtships, lovers'
quarrels
,
scenes and walks in the garden(Pratt's,)
versifications
,
notes on gilt-edged, flame-coloured paper, ornamented
with cooing doves and little fat dumpling cupidsin short,
after the most approved meltings, misgivings,
misapprehensions
and so forth, came the customary Miss-takingand
with the consent of friends east and west we were married.
It had been part of the arrangement that Mr. and Mrs.
Carlton should join the family in Kentucky, and that we
should establish there a Boarding School for Young Ladies;
but now came a letter from John Glenville that Uncle John
unfortunate, not in selling a very valuable property at a fair
price, but in receiving that price in worthless notes of
Kentucky
banks, (which, like most banks every twenty or thirty
years, had failed,) had with his remaining funds, as his only
resort, bought a tract of government lands in the New
Purchase
;
and, that, if I could join him with a few hundred
dollars in a little tanning, store-keeping, and
honest
speculation
,
we might gain, if not riches, at least independence.
He added that may be something could be done in the school
line.
Sorry so good a man as Uncle Johnand the world boasts
none noblershould be the victim of fraud, yet strange!
I found mingled with the feeling of distress a secret joy
that so plausible an inducement existed for a life in the
genuine
,
far away, almost unfindable backwoods! Less poetic
indeed than her husband, yet Mrs. C. earnestly wished to
see her relatives; and so off we started, as the reader knows,
in Chapter Second, and here we are waking up a little from
a curious dream, in Chapter Fourteenth. Some folks dream
all the way through to the very last chapter!
Here we found our new relative the Rev. James
Hilsbury
,
who had married Sarah Glenville in Kentucky, and
was now a missionary in the Purchase, in order to look up
a few sheep scattered in the wilderness. And to our
great amazement here we found too, Uncle Leatherstocking;
for about him Glenville in his letter had been silent, willing
us to be, as all had been, taken by surprise; because the
family on removing to their new world had found the old
gentleman comfortably squatted in a little nook of their
territories
,
when he was supposed all the time to be yet among
the Indians on Lake Michigan!
At the time of our arrival Uncle John was barely
recovered
from a very serious hurt received in the early
settlement
of the colony. In order to prepare a cabin he left the
family in Kentucky and went to the Purchase alone; it
being arranged that the family under the care of John
Glenville
should join him as soon as information came that things
were ready. But one day Mr. Seymour, being with his
guide in the woods, and in the act of mounting a restive
horse, the animal scared at the near and sudden leap of a
deer, plunged and knocked down Mr. Seymour, causing the
fracture of one arm and several ribs. For six dreadful weeks
he there lay in consequence, under a shantee of poles and
bark actually built over him as he lay unable to be moved, by
some neighbours called by the guide. And these set the
bones and dressed the wounds, according to Mr. Seymour's
directions, as well as they could; and then leaving the
sufferer
alone most of the day, as was unavoidable, they brought
his victuals at irregular intervals, and slept near him by turns
at night. On one occasion, however, our wounded friend
would have received a very disagreeable visitor, but for the
fortunate arrival at the moment of a neighbour woman with
his dinnerwho exclaimed,
Grammins! neighbour Seymour, if there ain't a
powerful
nasty varmint coming to see you!
The nature of the visitor was soon revealed to Uncle John;
for alarmed at the approach of the woman, the nasty
varmint
close to the patient's head but behind his camp, raising
his terrific head, made at the same time the whole woods
tremulously vocal with that rattle so peculiar and so
startling
even to the accustomed ear. But scarcely had Uncle
John time for alarm before the fearless woman had stopped
the music; and then dragging his dying snakeship in front
of the camp, she first measured his length, more than five
and a half feet, and secondly pulled off what she called a
right smart chance of rattles and gave them to Mr.
Seymour
.
And this memento of his escape, Uncle John one
day as he narrated the affair, handed over to me to hang to
the sounding post of my fiddlesuch being the western
secret of converting common violins into cremonas. I tried
the experiment of course; but not being willing to take out
a patent, I now offer the said rattles to any ingenious
Yankee
,
(who wishes to try the thing,) for a box of clarified
rosin
!the
rattles count sixteen and a button; just sixteen
semi, and part of a demisemiquaver to every shake!
As soon as Mr. Seymour could be carried, he was
conveyed
to Mr. Sturgis' house, and then he wrote for his
family
;
who hastening on through many inconveniences and
perils, all arrived in safety and found Uncle John just able
to walk without assistance. But as to the cabin it was as
yet unchinked, undaubed, and without its stack chimney;
yet into that deplorable hovel all were forced to remove and
complete it at their leisure! Ay! folks that knew all about
three story brick houses in Philadelphia! and who had
ridden in thier own carriages, in the settlements of the Old
Purchase! and promenaded Chesnut-street, some of them
haughtily, and proudly, and delicately!
Ye that have paid $20,000 for a dwelling, what do you
think of a dwelling that cost 20,000 cents?for that our
cabin costand experienced woodmen said that was too
muchthat Uncle John had been cheatedand that our
cabin could have all been finished off for $10! from the
laying of the first stick to the topping of the chimney!!
Our cabin was in truth a cabin of the Rough Order; for
reader, the orders of cabin architecture are various like those
of the Greek; for instance
the Scotched Order
. In this,
logs are hacked longitudinally and a slice taken from one
side, the primitive bark being left on the other sides. The
scotching, however, is usually done for pastime by the boys
and young women, while the men are cutting or hauling other
timbers.
The Hewed Order
in which logs, like the stones
for Solomon's Temple, are dressed on purpose.
The
Stick-out-Corner
Order
the logs left to project at the corners;
and the reverse of this,
the Cut-off-Corner Order
. I might
name too, the
Doubtful
or
Double Order
. In this, two
cahins
are built together, but until the addition of chimneys, it
is doubtful whether the structure is for men or brutes; and
also the
Composite Order
i. e. loggeries with stone or
brick chimneys.
But our abode was, from necessity, of the
Rough Order
its logs being wholly unhewed and unscotchedits
corners
projecting and hung with horse collars, gears, rough
towels, dish cleaners and calabashes! it had moreover a
very rude puncheon floor, a clapboard roof, and a clapboard
door; while for window a log in the erection had been
skipped, and through this longitudinal aperture came light
andalso wind, it being occasionally shut at first with a
blanket, afterwards with a clapboard shutter. Neither nail
nor spike held any part of the cabin together; and even
the door was hung not with iron, but with broad hinges of
tough bacon skin. These, however, our two dogs, (of whom
more hereafter,) soon smelled and finally gnawed clean off;
when we pinned on thick half tanned leather, which
swagging
till the door dragged on the earth, we at last
manufactured
wooden hinges; and these remained till the
dissolution
of our colony. The entire structure was, in theory,
twenty feet square, as measured by an axe-handle having
set off on itself two feet from the store keeper's yardstick,
where the cabin builder bought his handle at Woodville.
But I ever believed the yardstick itself must have shrunk
in seasoning, because our carpets stretched inside, as will
be described in the next Chapter, made the gross length only
nineteen feet two inches, and the neat length inside, an
average
about seventeen feet one inch. As our arrival caused
a new arrangement of the interior cabin, we shall start on
this subject afresh in
CHAPTER XV.
Qui miscuit utile dulci.
Which mixes soap and sugar.
Thrifty
housewives in cutting little boys' roundabouts
and trowsers always contrive out of a scant pattern of
pepper
and salt stuff, to leave enough for patches; but for the
Glenvillians it remained to subdivide two hundred and eighty
nine square feet of internal cabin into all the apartments of
a commodious mansion. Hence ours became the model
cabin in the Purchase.
And first, the puncheoned area was separated into two
grand parts, by an honest Scotch carpet hung over a stout
pole that ran across with ends rested on the opposite wall
plates; the woollen portion having two-thirds of the space
on one side and the remaining third on the other.
Secondly, the larger space was then itself subdivided by
other carpets and buffalo robes into chambers, each
containing
one bed and twelve nominal inches to fix and unfix in;
while trunks, boxes and the like plunder were stationed
under
the bed. Articles intended by nature to be hung, frocks,
hats, coats, &c., were pendent from hooks and pegs of
wood inserted into the wall. To move or turn round in such
a chamber without mischief done or got was difficult; and
yet we came at last to the skill of a conjuror that can dance
blindfolded among eggswe could in the day without
light and at night in double darkness, get along and
without displacing, knocking down, kicking over, or
tearing
!
The chambers were, one for Uncle John and his
nephew
;
one for the widow ladies and Miss Emily, who,
being the pet, nestled at night in a trundle bed, partly under
the large one; and one
very
small room for the help,
which was separated from the Mistress' chamber by
pendulous
petticoats. Our apprentices slept in an out-house.
These chambers were all south of the grand hall of
eighteen
inches wide between the suites; on the north, being
first
our
room and next it the stranger'sa room into which
at a pinch were several times packed three bodies of
divinity
or clerical dignitaries. Beyond the hospitality chamber
was the toilette room, fitted with glasses, combs,
hair-brushes
,
&c., and after our arrival, furnished with the first glass
window in all that part of the Purchase. The window was
of domestic manufacture, being one fixed sash containing
four panes, each eight by ten's, by whose light in warm
weather we could not only fix but also read in
retirement
.
Thirdly, the smaller space, east of the Scotch wall, was
subdivided, but like zones and tropics, with mere imaginary
lines. Front of the fire-place was the parlour. Into it were
ushered visitors, mainly, however, to prevent curiosity or
awkwardness from meddling with the corners and their
uses; but against which we were forced finally to place a
table or two as preventives.
The right hand corner was the ladies'
private
sitting
room. It was fitted with clap-board shelves, and on these
were arranged work-bags, boxes, baskets, paint-boxes,
machinery
for sewing, knitting, &c. The left side and whole
corner was the library, or as usually styledCarlton's
study.
Our
artificial
rooms were indeed connected with some
anomalies: for instance, under the parlour, was the Potato
Hole! And that held about twenty bushels. The descent
into this spacious vault, was accomplished by raising a
puncheon
and vaulting down on the vegetables; the ascent, by
resting the hands on the edges of the parlour floor and
weighing the body up. Again, Carlton's study had in it a
species of dresser-closet, invented and constructed by the
author himself. It was constructed of clap-boards dressed
with a hatchet, and held on some shelves, books in several
languages, writings, plates, knives, fiddle, pepper-box, flute,
mustard-box, and box of rosin, and so on; while some
modest
and light cooking utensils were lodged in the
basement
story shelves. To conceal the structure was hung
over as much of its front as could be covered, an invalid
table cloth, very white and very patched.
The kitchen proper had, about ten yards from the
mansion
house, a whole cabin to itself. Here were all the
vulgar
pots, kettles, frying-pans, homminy-block, and the like;
here the common cooking, the washing and ironing, and
weaving, andoh! ever so manycommon and
uncommon
common
things besides. Pickling, preserving,
cake-baking
,
clear-starching, sugar-refining, ruffle-ironing,
candy-making
,
and all such polite affairs were commonly
honoured
with attention in the parlour.
Like most grandee people brought low and flitting to
the West, our plunder was, like the Vicar's Family Picture,
too large for the house. We had also no small quantum of
envy and jealousy exciting articles, the like of which
had never been seen growing among corn, at least in the
Purchaseand such, policy required should be hid. Many
things, therefore, were left packed and deposited in lefts
and outhouses. Still some impolitic articles were unpacked,
being, however, kept concealed behind the curtainlike
sacred mysteries from the eyes and hands of the profane.
But an accident soon after our arrival delivered the colony
from part of these.
A large, antique, and elegantly japanned waiter had been
nicely balanced on a shelf in the toilette chamber; and on
this grand affair were tastefully set numerous anti-tee-total
glasses, jelly glasses, remains of a gilded French china tea
set, and ever so many
Reliqui Danaum
all regarded, I
fear, with half repressed elation, as shining remembrancers
of departed glory and greatness. Anyhow, more than once
on my sudden appearance behind the woolly rampart,
there was Mrs. C., ay, and even Aunt Kitty herself, a
handling, and a dusting, and a refixing the relies, as devout
as if all had been saints' bonesoften with smiles of
complacency
but
sometimes with tears! And, after all,
perhaps
,
that was not so very unreasonable:friends far away
nowyes some no more on earthdear friends had once
surrounded that very waitersipped tea from those very
cupsand in the fashion of bygone days, had drunk healths
from those glasses. Reader! may be you have shed secret
tears yourself over such things? We think of friends then,
do we not? Mournful shadows of the past are in the
vision
!
But the Genius of the Woods was incensed: and
mark the consequences.
One day Mrs. Seymour entered the parlour with a cake of
sugar-tree sugar in her hands, and nearly as large and
heavy
as she could conveniently carry. After our unanimous
admiration of its size, and breaking off lumps to taste, the
dear old lady disappeared to deposit the saccharine treasure
on the great store shelf constructed immediately over the
waiter of idols. Now oak pins
are
very strong, tough and
tenacious, and of most Job-like endurancebut the
creatures
will not
bear
every thing; hence the two enormous
pins under the store shelf had repeatedly sighed forth
remonstrances
,
as extra pound after pound of hard soap,
sugar
,
tallow, and jugs of vinegar and molasses, and what
nots, were cruelly and inconsiderately added to the already
almost insupportable weight. But to-day, when that
hugeous
lump of sugar was suddenly added to the grievance,
the indignant pins would stick to it no longer: in a
moment
without
one further premonitory creak, off they both
snapped simultaneouslyand down came the soap and
sugar
and tallowdown came the store tea and the true
coffee-coffee
,
and the rye-coffee, and the ocra, and the spices
in brown paper bags, and the pepper, red and black in
exiled
tea cups! Ah! yes! alas! alas! and down came that
japanned waiter and its gilded cups, and conical glasses
for wine, and bell-mouthed ones for ices and jellies! and,
moreover, down went the dear old lady of the crimped cap,
all rolling, heaped, mixed higgledee-piggledee, into one
bushel and a peck of yellow corn meal reposing in a wash
tub, and thirty-one and a half pounds of wheat flour in a
half-bushel measure, below! So much can a big lump of
unclarified backwoods sugar do! Ah! had it been double
rectified loaf, in blue paper, of a conical form and neatly
bound with hard twisted twines, dividing off circles and
parabolas
!
But a lump of uncivilized sweetness just turned
out of a pot!
Mrs. Seymour, however, was soon extricated amid the
almost
endless oh'sah'swho-could-have-thought-it'sand
similar exclamations, queries, reproaches and extenuations,
pertaining to accidents created by ourselves; and happily
she had sustained no injury whatever, although the outer
woman was considerably well sugared, well mealed, well
vinegared, and not a little soaped! But the glory of the
brittle ware shone only in piecesmultiplied but not
increased
!
Not an idol escaped, save a little punch goblet
belonging to the Carlton ancestory, and at the time
considerably
more than a century old! and whether the
sagacity
of age was the cause or not, this ancient relic
contrived
to roll by itself into an untouched part of the meal
tub, where after the pell-mell ended, it was discovered,
whole and sound. If any one is incredulous we will show
him when he calls, the venerable article yet preserved in
cotton!
About the time of the accident just told, the venerable old
pier glass, suspended opposite the only door of the cabin
was threatened with a very great danger. A neighbour
having ended a morning call, that, according to the
etiquette
of the Purchase, had lasted from a short time after
breakfast till past noon, rose to depart with the farewell
formula, Well, I allow I must be a sort a-goin, and then
off he started with great activity in the direction of the door
visible but not real. In other words mistaking the open
door reflected in the glass for the true door, he began
kicking
his heavy shod feet towards the mirror; but as he
ducked his head to clear the lintel of the scant door,
he naturally encountered a rough looking personage
seemingly butting against himself from the apparent door
when round he wheeled, confused indeed, but just in time,
(and before we could have arrested him) to avoid stepping
into the very bosom of the old reflector.
Such risk was too great for the glass to encounter
again, and so it was carefully re-packed and put away 'till
we removed some years after to Woodville; where, as it
could be placed so as to imitate neither door nor window,
it was brought again into the light and permitted to renew
its reflections. Alas! then, however, a dear face that had
been familiar to the old mirror for nearly three-fourths of a
century, was seen pictured there no more! Young and
joyous
,
and pleasant faces, have often since peeped from its
bosom
;
but never one so mild, so resigned, so radiant even
on earth with beams from the heavenly world, as that
venerable
and venerated countenance gazing now and with
out a medium upon the resplendent and ravishing scenes!
Pulvis et umbra sumus!
CHAPTER XVI.
Quadrupedante putrem quatit ungula campum.
A horse! a horse! my kingdom for a horse!
J. Glenville
and myself, not being able to complete
certain
arrangements immediately, my first summer and autumn
were spent in learning two arts, the one tending to the
preservation
of hides, the other, to the destruction of hides:
grinding bark, and rifle-shooting. The present chapter
is devoted to the former, the subsequent one, to the latter art.
Our bark-house was of the Grecian architecture in its
infancy, being almost wholly upright poles as columns, on
which reposed, (when the grinding ceased,) the calm
moonlight
horizontals, kept from falling off by the crotches of the
perpendiculars. On the horizontals were laid other poles,
and on these the roof, the latter being with due regard itself
made of bark. Under this shelter was our store of bark,
mostly oak and chestnut, with here and there a pile of
beech; and here, at one end, was ouray! what shall it
be called? Ye tanners and curriers, and all ye other hide
dressers! Shall we say our bark-masheror breakeror
millor pounderer  or tritterer? However, I will describe,
and you name.
First, was a hexagonal beam. This stood up nearly
perpendicular
,
its iron pivots at each end inserted into iron
sockets fastened above and below; and by means of these
pivots the beam could, when required, circulate with entire
freedom. Next, into this hexagonal, was fixed at right
angles
an hexagonal axis, yet free to move at the end inserted;
while its other end, passing first the nominal centre of a
wheel, (the axis there being wedged in theory immoveable,)
it continued beyond the lateral surface of said wheel far
enough to admit fixtures for Old Dicka quadruped
presently
to be introduced, not fashionably and formally by the
tip of a hat and the tip of a finger, but in detail, i. e. from
head to tail.
But the wheel!ah! had we that wheel and dear Old
Dick in here to grind bark as a show! It came nearer
perpetual
motion, that is, when Dick was harnessed, and I had
the rake in my hand, nearer than any thing I have ever
known since Redheifer's. The article was composed of
eight large white-oak blocks; the four interior ones being
parallelogramic, the four circumferential, plano-convex;
and all bound by long wooden pins driven from the
circumference
,
and by enormous clamps on the lateral surfaces.
In this state of
e pluribus unum
, the affair was as near a
circle
as is the earth to a sphere; and when art so closely
resembles
nature wheelwrights should be satisfied. But when
motion began, the sections and segments not moving
unanimously
,
circles were evolved whose circumferences did not
obey the definition, in preserving equal distances from the
centrenor did the centre stick exactly to its own point.
Especially were these irregularities visible, if old Dick
became
fidgetty, or suspicioned I was going to rake him
when he would jerk the whole concern with so sudden a
vengeance, as not only to displace the central wedges
intended
to confine the axis in the wheel, but to threaten the
dissolution of the whole bark house.
The wheel, (by courtesy,) was fourteen inches thick;
and its circumference was pierced with many holes by an
inch-and-quarter augur to the depth of eight inches in
towards
the centre; and these holes were armed with strong
pegs or wooden teeth, driven to the entire depth, and left
projecting from the circumference about four inches each:
the whole thus forming as tremendous and effective an
engine of torture as the best inquisitors could desire for
the extension of the Church. Inded, if any saint, after his
Holiness shall have converted our pagan countries, shall
wish with young Doctor Oxford to break ungodly heretics,
either
on
or
under
the wheel, for offences against the
State
,
ours would be the very dandy. But let no Mr. Dominick
think Old Dick could have been either persuaded or goaded
to pull the wheel over human beings: hardly could he be
frightened or coaxed to pull it over lifeless bark! No! no!
godly people must work the wheel themselves, unless they
prefer to turn it into a treadmill, or employ steam.
Lastly, the floor. This had the perpendicular, hexagonal
rotary shaft first described, as its centre, or thereabouts;
whence extended imaginary radii, some five, others nearly
six feet, rendering it doubtful if three times the diameter
was precisely equal to the circumference. Still the
circumference
being bounded by a border rising above the floor an
average of ten inches, the contents of the area could easily
be known by the wheelbarrow loads of ground bark carried
thence to the vatsnear enough at least for a popular
lecture
before some institute of
practical
science.
Another
last
word, however, seems necessary here, about
our floor. It was of puncheons. Not, my friend, the
puncheons
of brandy stores, distilleries, or other alcoholic
abodes, but back-wood puncheons. And these are a species
of Robinson Crusoe board, being planks from three to ten
feet long, and from two to five inches thick; and wide as
the size of the trees whence they are severally hewed by
the means of axe and adze. On such gigantic flooring do
primitive Buckeyes, Hoosiers and the like tread and sleep,
after the departure of the
red
aboriginals.
But come, Dick, my nonpareil of hoss beasts, trot up,
for thy history and portrait.
When this remarkable quadruped was foaled is uncertain.
No satisfaction on this point could be gained even from his
own mouth: not that Dick would utter a deliberate
falsehood
that
was impossiblebut still the answers he gave
by his mouth, to different experienced jockeys, made some
say he was sixteen, and others twenty-six years old!
I have known some even insist he must be at least thirty!
and some even forty! I incline to the opinion, however,
that, like certain human bachelors, Dick was of no
particular
age.
It is agreed by all that he was foaled, however, and in
Pennsylvania, among the mountains about the Bear Gap.
Here he was brought up to the wagoning business, having
served his apprenticeship with the famous teamster, Mr.
Conestoga Dutchy. Acting in his tender years as
wheel-horse
,
he was so constantly squeezed between the wagon
pushing him forward from his tail, and his master pulling
him backward from his head, that his longitudinal growth was
very greatly impeded, and it could be said, not that Dick was
longer than any other brief horse, but only not quite so short.
Happily, what was wanting to the fellow's longitude was
added to his latitude; and after all, he had as much weight
of character as longer horses, and, like a French bullet,
more too in a lump. On emergencies, although Dick was
educated as a wheel-horse, he could act in the lead, and well
understood the difference between the line jerked and the
line pulledindeed, better, I must confess, than Mr. Carlton
himself, who often managed the line wrong, to the great
jeopardy of his load; only Dick, out of generosity, would
usually go the way the driver meant, but for which in
ignorance
,
he had given the improper signal.
At the earnest recommendation of their mutual friends,
Dick was bought as a family horse by Uncle John, when in
Northumberland. Accordingly the fellow, after performing
wonders on the journey from Philadelphia to the West, in
hawing and geeing, and in pulling right dead ahead up one
side a mountain and holding back down the other; and after
having ploughed, and harrowed, and thrashed, &c. in
Kentucky
,
came at last with the family to the Purchase, where
at our arrival, he was cherished as no unimportant member
of the Glenville community.
Here he hauled logs for cabins and fires, bark for the
tannery
,
went to mill both with and without the cart, and
sometimes
to meeting and sometimes to Woodville. In going to
mill without the cart he usually carried one man and two
bags, bag No. 1, full of wheat, bag No. 2, full of corn, and
this was always the case in freshets, for Dick forded creeks
like a sea-horse; although the things on his back might
keep dry if they could, his own being under water: as to
being floated awayphoo!preposterous!Dick could
stay a creek like a dam! He could grind bark too; carry
raw hides and hides tanned, having no fears either about his
own! It was almost like that of a rhinoceros, and would
have resisted every process to transmute it into leather,
patent
or unpatentand we used both.
But nothing so endeared Dick to his friends as his mental
and moral qualities. He was for these worthy of the fairy
age; and had he lived in the days of Beauty and the
Beast, I do think he would have talked right out as well as
the best of the brutes belonging to the era. He was,
among other matters, the only horse that had a relish for
practical jokes. Let any one leave a nice flitch of fat
bacon in the sun till the pot was ready, under the notion
too, that greasing a horse's teeth will stop his eating oats,
the rascal was sure to smell out and devour it! Let the girl
set out a swill for Sukey, and turn away a few moments
you might catch sight of the tip of Dick's ear as he peeped
from behind the smoke house till the coast was clear, and
the next instant he would be gobbling the mess, lifting his
black-brown head to grin at the stupid cow, and with a
keen twinkling eye watching the return of the girl. And
when the help came in a whirlwind of wrath not indeed
on
but
with
a broomstickbah! how he would heel it
snorting and showing his teeth equivalent with him to
saying
catch
a duck asleep! Or when Dick was regaling
on his own allowance of corn on the ear, in the front of the
inclined cart, and swiney ran grunting up for a chance
grain or so dropped on the ground, our wag would on a
sudden with his teeth seize the unschooled creature just
back of the shoulders, and then lifting him up, shake him
so as to fill all Glenville with the squealings of terror or pain;
making it evident to all untutored beasts that Dick himself
had lived when the schoolmaster was abroad.
He was kind to men; but to women he was specially
kind. For fun he would carry males double and even
treble; but females might be packed from stem to stern
and the kind soul would trot away with an evident care.
True, he would now and then turn his quizzical head with
a make-believe snap at the dangling feet, but it was
manifest
all was sham from his peculiar grin(his way of
laughing
)when
any not acquainted with the trick would scream
or jump down. When thus used for sport, no saddle or
bridle was needed, the passengers on the forecastle
holding
by the mane, those on the poop, by the helm, and those
amidships sitting,  la squaw, with ancles on both sides.
The steering was, however, done at the prow by boxing his
ears; when he turned at right angles with the slap, and if
fun was to be made, which was always indicated to him by
a peculiarity in the slapping, he turned so suddenly as to
occasion the rise, the fall, and the flourish of petticoats.
And indeed this was the grand recreation and sport in the
whole affair! and a ride on old Dick was one of the
inducements
to the young ladies from the neighbourhoods to
visit Glenville!
Ay! you may suspend all this on your nose: but,
believe
Vol. I.6
me, in no way is the fear of the East before people's
eyes out there; secondly, folks
will
play; and thirdly,
remember
de gustibus non
i. e. literally translated some
love hog and homminy.
But I must not make too large a picture; so with the
mention
of Dick's idyosyncracy(for since the birth of
Phrenology
that disease is quite fashionable)we shall for the
present suffer him to trot away. Like other celebrated
persons he had then his antipathies: he never could bear
the sight of a dead owl! and, unless blindfolded, would
never carry on his back the carcass of a dead deer! And
this, after carrying barn-hill fowls a dozen at a time tied
by the legs and dangling against his sides! and tanned and
raw hides innumerable! Hence his enemies may suppose
it was all affectationbut it was no such thingit was real
and uncontrollable idyosyncracyas real as Dr.
Reverence's
towards a live cat, or Col. Butcher's towards a
drawn sword!
Such then was our barkery, our bark, and our bark
grinderand, such was old Dick. But all in motion!
Can one without a black board and diagrams exhibit the
cycloids of that uncircular rounditythe wheel? Can we
without brass bands and bad players make audible the
skreaking of the ungreased pivots?the curious moaning
and growling of the axis?and the dreadful cracking and
crashing of the bark under the miniature Juggernaut? And
who has skill to catch and fix on paper, or canvas, the look
and manner of that more than half reasoning horse?after
resting the full hour I had been in chase of a playful
squirrel, starting off at the crack of the rifle, and trying to
prove by his manner that he had been going all the time!
If any one is Hogarth enough when he undertakes this
work with picters to match, let him not fail to illustrate
old Dick and the Bark Mill.
CHAPTER XVII.
Omne tulit punctum,
Centre every time.
Reader
, were you ever
fired
with the love of rifle
shooting
?
If so, the confidence now reposed in your honour
will not be abused, when told my love for that noble art is
unabated: nay, let me whisper in your ear
What yet?
Yesin the corner of my bed chamber a genuine New
Purchase rifle! And all the forest equipments,otter skin
bullet pouch with a tail gracefully pendenta scalping knife
in a sheath adorned with procupine quillsa savage little
hatcheta powder horn, and its loader of deer-horn, tied on
with a deer sinew and holding enough to prime a shot gun
a mould running three hundred and twenty-five to the
poundwipersan iron hook to tote squirrelsand some
hundred and fifty patches all strung and fastened to the
leather strap of the pouchay! and a pair of moccasins and
pair of green leggins, and
Do you ever yet go a gunning?'
Gunning!alas! is that degrading appellation to be
applied
to hunting!but how should they know? Yes, I do
steal off sometimes and try to fancy myself in the woods.
But what are these
scrawney
little trees fenced in to
prevent cattle from eating them down? Where is a
squirrel, or a racoon, or a fox, or a turkey to hide?
And where can one lose himself and camp out? No
grand and centurial trees here reaching up to heaven
and sending roots to the centre of the earth! No hollow
caverns in enormous trunks, where wolves and bears may
lurk! No vast sheltering expanse of tops where panthers
and wild cats may find security! How vain to think of
crawling through a thicket of undergrowth to the leeside of
a deer, stepping with moccasined footstirring no leaves
cracking no twigshaking no bushestill one can get
within the magical distance, a hundred yards. Nothing,
nothing here, to excite dread, call forth skill, reward toil,
and show the independence of the hunter.
True, I make-believe, like little girls, playing baby
house; I say to myself, Now Carlton, 'spose that old log
away off there was a bear?or that tame turkey a wild
one?or that cream-coloured calf a deeror that sharp
eared dog a wolf? And instinctively I catch myself with
my side that way, drawing a bead with one eye into the
hind sight and fixing the other on the may-be game, and
then, click goes the trigger. Fortunate, the rifle is not
cocked. Indeed, these rehearsals are always without a
load; if not, farewell to the integrity of the little knot in
the old logand to the gambols of calf and doggood
night to the eyes of farm turkies and dunghill roosters!
In vain do flocks of black-birds and robbins, and tom-tits
rise!they might perch on my shoulders: for who but a
wretched dandy and shot-gun driveller, with a
double-barrelled
gun, a whole pound of powder! and four pounds! of
shot! will fire at a flock, killing two and wounding twenty?
To be sure a curious stranger will sometimes meet us and
politely request to see a rifle
discharged!
and with an
incredulous smile wonder if a man can really hit a solitary
single bird with so
minute
a ball! And then we cannot
but show off, and so we begin with amazing condescension:
Sir! do you see that little blue bird?
Oh! yes! that tiny creature on the next tree.
'Tut, no!that to your right, on the post.
What! that away there? too far, Sir, too far.
Too far!forty-five yards in a straight line!!
Reader, we hit at any height or in any direction; but
a horizontal or a little below is our preference. The rifle
is better balanced, and the light, especially in opposition to
the sun, is thus less dazzling and makes the cleanest bead.
Hence I select, if possible, on occasions like the present a
bird so placed as to render the affair more like our target
firing.
Now, Sir,we continueI shall hit that bird.
If you do, I will eat it.
Then you will have your supper in a second or two.
And with that I set triggerstoss down my hatfeel for
a level with my feetcock rifleturn left side to the mark
raise the piece with my thumb on the cockincline
shoulders back with knees bending outwardtill the mass
of man and gun rest on the baselet fall the rifle a little
below objectand then, ceasing to breathe and stopping
my pulse, and bringing into the hind sight a silver bead
like a pin's head, I rapidly raise that bead till darkened by
the feathers under the throatand the nextyou see is a
gentle flutter of spread wings as if the poor little creature
was flying down for a worm or a crumb.
Ah! Sir, you've only inflicted a severe wound; but
really this is wonderful! I could hardly believe in this skill
unless I saw it.
Well, sir, please pick it up; the poor tit is dead enough,
and never knew what hurt him. And of course, reader, it
must be so, for the bird's head is off.
Such skill was of course not the work of a day. Ounces
of powder and pounds of lead were spent in vain first, and
many a squirrel, at the crack of the rifle, would remain
chattering
or eating a nut, imagining somebody was shooting
somewhere; until conjecturing by the third or fourth ball
pealing bark some two or three feet from him, that the firing
was rather in his direction, away he would scud for fear a
chance bullet should maybe hit him! But my heart was
in the matter in those days. Hence it is no great marvel if
in due time my rifle dealt out certain death second to none
in the Purchase. What avail then concealment in the
top-most
branches; there was the dark spot of a body or a head
amid the green leaves. What! a retreat behind crotches
or into holes; there was yet the tip of an ear or point of a
nose, or twinkle of an eye. Or did a squirrel expand on a
small limb till his body above was a mere line of fur on the
bark like feathery hair on a caterpillar? in vain, the meat
was mine.
A squirrel once so stretched himself as to create a doubt
whether a squirrel was above the branch or not; but firing
secundum artem
down he came, and, as was necessary, dead.
Yet wound external had he none; he had been killed, as
is often the case, although it occurred but once with me, by
concussion; the ball having struck the limb of the tree
exactly
under his heart.
Let none think we western people follow rifle shooting,
however, for mere sport; that would be nearly as ignoble
as shot gun idleness! The rifle procures, at certain
seasons
,
the only meat we ever taste; it defends our homes
from wild animals and saves our corn fields from squirrels and
our hen-roosts from foxes, owls, opossums and other var
ments. With it we kill our beeves and our hogs, and cut
off our fowls' heads: do all things in fact, of the sort with
it, where others use an axe, or a knife, or that far east
savagism
,
the thumb and finger. The rifle is a woodman's
lasso. He carries it everywhere as (a very degrading
comparison
for the gun, but none other occurs,) a dandy a cane.
All, then, who came to our tannery or store came thus
armed; and rarely did a customer go, till his rifle had been
tried at a mark, living or dead, and we had listened to
achievements
it had done and could do again. No wonder, in
these circumstances, if I should practice; especially when
it needed but the flash of a rifle pan to set off our in-bred
magazine of love and tendencies towards bullet moulds and
horn loaders! No wonder, that, after many failures, even
in hitting a tree, Mr. Carlton could be seen in his glory at
last, standing within lines of beholders right and left, and
at forty-five yards off-hand planting bullet after bullet into
the same augur hole! Reader! may you live a thousand
years; but if you
must
die, unless somebody will save your
life by splitting an apple on your head(William Tell size)
at fifty yards off-hand with a rifle ball, send for meshut
your eyes for fear of flinchingand at the crackgo, your
life is your own.
Old Dick is one hobby often mounted literally and maybe
now too often, metaphorically, the rifle is my other. But
with
this
by no means must we
bore
you; and, therefore,
after narrating my famous shots in behalf of the Temperance
Society, we shall for the present put the gun on the rack
over the fireplace.
Glenville and myself were once, on some mercantile
affairs
,
travelling in an adjoining county, when we came
suddenly
on a party preparing to shoot at a mark; and from
the energy of words and gestures it was plain enough a
prize of unusual importance was proposed. We halted a
moment, and found the stake to be a half-barrel of whiskey.
If ever, then and there was to be sharp-shooting; and
without question, then and there was present every chap in
the settlements that could split a bullet on his knife blade or
take the rag off the bush.
Glenville, said I, seized with a sudden whim, lend
me fifty cents; I mean to shoot.
Nonsense! Carlton; you
can't
win here; and if you
could, what does the president of a temperance society want
with a barrel of whiskey?
John, if I can find a gun here anything like my own, I
can
win. And although I have never before won or lost a
penny, I shall risk half a dollar now for the fun of the thing,
and to have the satisfaction of knocking yonder barrel in
the head and letting out the stuff into the branch here.
After some further discussion Glenville acquiesced, and
we drew near the party; where dismounting, I made the
following speech and proposal:
Well, gentlemen, I think I can outshook any man on the
ground, if you will let us come in and any neighbour here
will allow me to shoot his gun, in case I can find one
to my notion; and here's my fifty cents for the chance.
But, gentlemen and fellow citizens, I intend to be right out
and out like a backwoodsman; and so you must all know
we are could water men, and don't believe in whiskey;
and so, in case we win, the barrel is, you know, ours,
and then I shall knock the article in the head. But then
we are willing to pay either in money or temperance tracts
the amount of treat every gentleman will get if anybody else
wins.
To this a fine, hardy looking farmer apparently some
sixty years old and evidently the patriarch of the settlement,
replied:
Well, stranger, come on; you're a powerful honest man
any how; and here's my hand to it; if you win, which will
a sort a tough you though, you may knock the stingo in the
head. And stranger, you kin have this here gun of mine,
or Long Jake's thare; or any one you have a notion on.
How do you shoot?
Off-hand, neighbour; any allowance?
Yes; one hundred yards with a rest; eighty-five yards
off-hand.
Agreed.
Agreed.
Arrangements and conditions, usual in grand contests like
that before us, were these:
1st. A place level as possible was selected and cleared
of all intervening bushes, twigs, &c. 2d. A large tree
was chosen. Against this the target shingles were to be
set, and from its roots or rather trunk, were measured off
towards the upper end of the cleared level, the two
distances
,
eighty-five and one hundred yards. A pair of very fine
natural dividers were used on this occasion; viz. a tall
young chap's legs, who stepped with an elastic jerk,
counting
every step a yard; a profitable measure if one was
buying
broadcloth; but here the little surpluses on the yards
were equally to the advantage of all. 3d. Cross lines at
each distance, eighty-five and one hundred yards, were
drawn on the measured line; and on the first the marksman
stood who fired off-hand, while on the second the rests were
placed or constructed. Rests depended on taste and fancy;
some made their ownsome used their comrades'and
some rested the rifle against the side of a tree on the line:
and of all the rests this is the best, if one is careful to place
the barrel near its muzzle against the tree and not to press
hard upon the barrel. Some drive in two forked stakes and
place on them a horizontal piece; and some take a chair,
and then seated on the ground, they have the front of the
chair towards them and its legs between their feet, resting
the whole gun thus upon the seat of the chair. Again,
many
set a small log or stone before them, and then lying down
flat on their bellies, they place the muzzle on the rest and
the butt of the gun on the ground near their face; and then
the rifle seems as moveless as if screwed in a vice. In
this way Indians and woodsmen often lie in ambuscade
for deer at the licks, or enemies in war.
4th. Every man prepared a separate target. This was
a popular shingle, having near its middle a spot blackened
with powder or charcoal as a ground; and on this ground
was nailed at its four corners a piece of white paper about
an inch square and its centre formed by a diamond hole;
two corners being perpendicularly up and down. From
the interior angles of the diamond were scratched with a
knife point two diagonals, and at their intersection was the
true centre. With a radius of four inches from this centre
was then circumscribed a circle: if beyond this circum
6*
ference any
one
of the allotted shots struck, ay! but a
hair's breadth, all other shots, even if in the very centre,
were nugatorythe unlucky marksman lost.
5th. Each man had three shots. And provided the
three were within the circle, each was to be measured by
a line from the centre of the diamond to the near edge of the
bullet holeexcept a ball grazed the centre, and then the
line went to the centre of the holeand then, the three
separate lengths added were estimated as one string or
line, the shortest securing the prize. This is called line
shooting.
6th. Each one fixed, or had fixed, his target against the
tree as he pleased; and then, each man was to fire his three
shots in succession, without being hurried or retarded. We
occupied on an average to-day every man about fifteen
minutes
.
More than thirty persons were assembled, out of whom
had been selected seven as the best marksmen; but these,
induced by the novelty, having good-naturedly admitted me,
we were now eight. Of the eight, five preferred to shoot
with a rest; but the old Achates, the sapling
[4]
[4]
Tall Jake.
woodman that
had stepped off the distances, and myself, were to fire off
hand. All the rifles were spontaneously offered for the
stranger's use. I chose, however, Tall Jake's; for although
about a pound too heavy, it sighted like my own, and went
as easy on the triggers, and carried one hundred and eighty
to the poundonly five more than mine which carried one
hundred and seventy-five.
Auditors and spectators now formed the double lines,
standing, stooping, and lying in very picturesque attitudes,
some fifteen feet each side the range of the firing, and
that away down towards the target tree even, behind
which several chaps as usual, planted themselves to
announce
at each crack the result of the shot. All this seems
perilous; and yet accidents rarely happen. In all my
sojourn
in the Purchase we had but two. The first
happened
to a fine young fellow, who impatient at some delay,
peeped out it is supposed, to ascertain the cause, when at
the instant the rifle was fired, and its ball glancing
entered
his head and he fell dead in his tracks. The next
happened
to an elderly man, who was tationed behind a large
tree awaiting the report, and who at the flash of the gun, fell
from behind with one piercing cry of agony, bleeding and
dying:the trunk was hollow and in and opposite the place
where our neighbour stood in apparent safety, was a mere
shell, through which the ball had gone and entered his
heart!
Well, the firing at length began. I have no distinct
recollection
of every shot. Now and then, a central ball
was announced, and that followed by two others a full inch
or may be an inch and an eighth even from the centre; and
once, where two successive balls were within the diamond,
the third, by some mischance of the rest depended on,
struck on the very edge of the grand circle. Balls, too,
were sometimes planted in three different corners of the
papervery good separate shotsyet proving want of
steady and artistical sighting, or even a little experimenting
with the edges of the hind sight; which was owing
doubtless to drawing the bead to the edge and not the
bottom
.
A smart young fellow having made two very fair shots,
boasted so grandly about his new rifle, that a grave,
middle-aged
hunter offered to bet a pound of lead, that if the young
chap would allow him after the gun was rested for the shot,
to rub his hand from the lock to the muzzle, he would so
bewitch
the rifle that she should miss the big tree. This was
all agreed to; and then, such as knew how to bewitch
rifles
rapidly retreated to our rear, and such as did not, were
beckoned and called till they came. All ready, the young
man on the ground, and his rifle on its rest, our conjuror ran
his hand slowly along the barrel, pausing an instant at the
muzzle, and uttering an incantation, and then going behind
the marksman, he bade him fire when he liked. This he
did; and marvellous enough it wasthe ball not only
missed the shingle, but struck no where in the tree! Great
was the astonishment and mortification of the youth; but
as we magnanimously allowed him a shot extra and without
witchcraft, his countenance brightened and especially
when his ball now spoiled the inner edge of his diamond.
Perhaps you are curious, and wish to learn how to
bewitch
a rifle? I will tell on one condition:all the
spectators
when a rifle is bewitched must be made to come to
the rear of the firing party. Here is the recipe: let the
rifle-doctor conceal in his hand a bullet small enough for
the purpose, and on rubbing as far as the muzzle, let him
as adroitly as possible deposit said bullet just within the
said muzzlesafely betting any number of pounds of lead,
that whatever else the marksman may hit, he cannot hit his
shingle. N. B. See that the rifle to be bewitched has no
triggers set, and is not on cock, otherwise two tartars of a
very unpleasant character may be caught by the rifle-doctor
instead of one.
One man only took to his belly, (the technical term was
to fire on his belly,) but as his log-rest turned a little at the
third shot, the unerring bullet, following the guidance of the
barrel, stuck itself plump outside the circumference named,
and thus nullifying one true central ball, and one in the
lower interior point or angle of his diamond. Another man
was still more unfortunate. After two most excellent shots,
his gun hanging fire at the third, he bawled out, No
shot! which being a notification before the shot could be
examined and reported, entitled him to another trial; but
alas! the ball thus tabooed had grazed the centre! Again
his gun hung fire; but now he did not
veto;
and his bullet
was found sticking in the tree an honest foot above the top
even of his shingle!
And now we, who fired off-hand, and thereby professed
to be crack shots(yet most marksmen make a
noise
there)we began to make ready. We higgled a little as
to who should lead off; not to show politeness as well
bred folks in entering rooms and carriages, but because all
were, the least bit however, cowed, and each wished to see
what his neighbour could do first. When that kind of spirit
comes crawling over a body in rifle-shooting, it must be
banished
in an instant. The effect in oratory may be a very good
speech(unless you stump)but in our art, it is always
a very bad shot. Our noble art demands calmness and the
most imperturbable self-possession; and that, at the
beginning
,
the middle, the ending of the exercises. And so I
said:
Well, gentlemen, if you want to see where to plant
your balls, I'm the one, I think, to show you
Why no, strangerreplied the old AchatesI
allow
that aint fair nither, to let you lead off. We're all
neighbour-like here, and 'tis only right you should see what
we kin do fust. I sort a suppose maybe it will save you
the trouble of shootin anyhow. So come, Long Jake,
crack away and I'll follerand arter, you, stranger, may
shoot or not jist as you like best.
Agreed, grandaddie, responded Long Jake, so here
goes. And then Jake, after returning from the old beech,
where he had put up his target, took his rifle, left a
moment
leaning against a tree, and with firmness and grace
stepped on the line. Two things and only two gave me
hopes, viz: he shut his left eye and held on the diamond
without rising or falling perpendicularly to it: but then he
held that rifle as if it were the true horizonand then
clicksnapbut no report. Lucky snap for me!
[5]
[5]
I am sorry to say it, but nobody in rifle-shooting is an Emmonite,
or even a Hopkinsian; he wishes his neighbour to make good shots
but not too good. And where perfect first-rate marksmen contend, an
accident only can give any of them the victory.
I knew
it must have been a central ball; but still better for me
Jake was embarrassed a little. Shaking out the damp
powder
he primed afresh, and again began his aim. Now,
however
,
a very slight vibration seemed to glimmer on his
barrel
,
and when he did fire, I was not disappointed nor
greatly
displeased at the cry from the fellows that leaped from
behind the target treerite hand corner, grazin the
dimind! Again Jake loaded, raised his piece, and fired
at first sight, and the cry now camecentre! This
increased
my neighbour's confidence, and happily lessened
his carefulness; for sighting, as he himself afterwards
confessed, a leetle bit coarseish like, the cry now was
line shot, scant quarter '
bove
centre!
Come, grandaddie, said Jake to the old gentleman as
he walked up to the line from adjusting his shingle, you
must do a little better nor that, or maybe we'll lose our
stingo, for I know by the way this stranger here handles
my rifle, he's naturally a hard chap to beat.
This speech was occasioned by my handling the gun,
taking aim, setting triggers, &c., in order to get better
acquainted
with the piece; and which experiments resulted
in a secret and hearty wish for my own gun.
Well Jake, I allow yours kin be beat a bit, replied
our veteran taking his position on the line. At a glance
towards his toot en sembell, Mr. Carlton too, allowed he
had met his matchand, perhaps even with his own
gun. How grand the calmnessas if in no battle! How
alive muscle and featureas if in the midst of enemies!
There he is dropping his beaday, his eyes both wide
awake, and he raises the piece till that bead dims on the
lower point of his diamonda flashand from the tree
centre! He was soon again ready, and at his second
flash, came the cryupper edge, fust hole!and that
cry was answered along the gradually narrowing and
crowded lines, by the whole companyhurraw for
grandaddiehurraw-aw! His third shot, brought from
the treelee-e-tle tor'ds rite corner of dimindjeest
grazed centre!and was answered bygrandadde
forever
,
hurraw-aw-aw!
Carlton, maliciously whispered Glenville, the stingo
is safeanti-temperance beats!
I felt honour demanded, however, a trial; and so
requesting
Glenville to fix as I should direct my target, I stood on
the line of firing, sighting several times with open pan and
no priming; until the mark exactly suited, when I cried out
stand clear! And now, supposing Jake's rifle sighted
like my own, and threw its ball a little above its bead, (as
indeed is best,) I drew up as usual, with rapidity, and let
fly just as the bead caught the lower tip of my diamond,
the report instantly returned beinginside lower pint of
dimind, scant quarter, b'low centre!
Blame close, stranger, said the old hero, but I allow
you'll have to mend it to beat me.
Praise from
you
, my old friend, is
worth
something
I'll try my best to satisfy you.
Jake's rifle was now understood: she sent balls exactly
where she aimed, and not as mine, and most good rifles,
an eighth of an inch above. Making, therefore, my front
sight a hair thicker and fuller in the hind sight, and coming
full on the lower angle of my diamondCentre!was
echoed from the tree and along the lineshurraw-aw!
for the stranger!
You're most powerful good at it, said the old
gentleman
,
but my line's a leetle the shortest yet.
Well, my good old friend, here goes to make yours a
little the longestand away, along between the
unflinching
lines of excited spectators, whistled my third and last
ball, bringing back the crylee-e-tle b'low the centre
broke in first hole! But, while all rushed to the examination
and measurements, confined to our two shingles, no
exultation
burst forth, it being doubtful, or, as the hunters said,
a sort of dubus whether the stingo was grandadde's, or the
stranger's. In a few moments, however, and by the most
honourable and exact measurements, it was decided that the
old Achates had the shortest string by near about half the
brenth of his bullit! And then such uproar rose of
mingled
hurraws,screams,shrieks,yells,and outcries!
an uproar none but true honest-hearted far westers,
unadulterated
by foreign or domestic scum, ever did or can make.
The hurricane over, the victor mounting a log made the
following speech:
Well, naburs, it's my sentimental opinyin this stranger's
acted up, clean up, to the notch, and is most powerful
clever
.
And I think if he'd a fired his own gun as how he
mought a come out even, and made up the leetle matter of
diff'runce atween usand that would be near about shootin
a little bit the closest of any other chap, young or old, in
these 'are digginsand so, says I, let's have three cheers
for the stranger, and three more for his friend.
Oh! dear reader!
could
you have heard the old, dark
woods ring then!I struggled hard, you may be sure; but
what was the use, the tears would come!
We both made replies to the compliment; and in
concluding
,
for I mounted the log last, I touched on the wish
we really had to do good, and that nothing was better for
hardy, brave, and noble woodsmen than temperance.
Well, strangers, both on you, replied that very grand
old man, you shan't be disapinted. You depended on our
honourand so, says I, if these 'are naburs here aint no
objection, let them that want to, first take a suck of stingo
for a treat, and then, says I, lets all load up and crack away
at the cask, and I'll have fust shot.
Agreed! agreed! hurraw for grandadde Tomsin!
hurraw for the strangers!hurraw for the temperince
society
!load
up, boys, load up!nobody wants a suck
crack away, grandaddecrack away, we're all ready!
And crack went old Brave's riflecrack, long Jake's
crack the brave Gyas, and the brave Cloanthusand crack
every rifle in the company: and there rolled the wounded
half-barrel, pouring its own death-dealing contents through
its perforated heads and sides, till soon the stingo was all
absorbed in the moist earth of the forest.
Glenville and I now gathered hossis and put out,
highly pleased with the events: and a few weeks after we
were still more pleased, at hearing that all the company at
the prize shooting that day had become members of the
temperance society. If, therefore, any old fashioned
temperance
society. (such as it was before fanaticism ruled it,)
wishes champions to shoot, provided grandadde Tomsin
will be one, I know where can be found another.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Thou shalt not muzzle the ox when he treadeth out the corn.
(Obsoletesince the use of patent threshing machines.)
From
the time or our arrival
in
and
at
Glenville, (it being
both a big and a little place,) we commenced forming
acquaintance
with our neighbours. And this business was
promoted by the many little and big meetings held by
Mr. Hilsbury in all directions, over and above the regular
monthly ones in Glenville, and on three successive
Sabbaths
in old man Welden's settlementfor every body, man,
woman and child, was found at meeting. Nor does it
interfere
with attendance, if it be rainy or shiney, or mighty
cloudy, or powerful skyey; but in all weathers and seasons,
and from all quarters of the woods, along roads, traces,
paths, or short cuts, come horses to the preaching; some
with single riders of any sex, bursting, at a gallop, into
view, through underwood thickets of spicewood and papaw,
or clearing log after log, in a kind of hop, skip and jump
gait. Many horses indeed have two riders, a mode of
horsmanship called in the Purchase riding twice. And
some horses come with folks riding even twice and a half,
or may be thrice: for instance, with a man and his wife,
the latter holding in her lap a two year old child, although
the child is very often carried by the father; or with three
girls; or with one beau, having two sun-bonnetted damsels
behind. Dick always figured on such occasions with a
cargo on his back that doubtless made a lively impression on
his feelings of past times, and of the loads he had in his
earlier
days seen crammed into a Conestogo wagon: and never,
in fact, did he look so like a family horse as on Sundays,
when he usually carried so much of our family on his back.
In fording swollen waters, if the water came up no higher
than the saddle skirts, and if depending articles (legs and
so on) could be crooked up or neatly packed on the mane,
in plunged all, whether riding once, twice, or morefold:
nay, it was contended that the more riders the better; the
heavier weight preventing the horse from being floated or
losing his foothold in a strong current. But if it was
certain
that the creek was swimming high, then the riders
crossed on a log, the horse swimming by its side and the
bridle being held by the rider. Afterwards the furniture
(saddle and so on) was transported over the natural bridge.
Arrived at meeting the critters (
alias
the horses, or
hoss beasts) are
hung
to a swinging branch of some tree;
for such, yielding to the inquietude of the horses, prevents
the snapping of reins, and yet affords ample space for the
curvilinear play of the hind quarters. Nor are the horses
at all
backward
in using their ecclesiastical privileges;
especially
if we are favoured with a powerful smart
preacher
,
that is, a fellow with a very glib tongue, who preaches
by inspiration, and has the wonderful power of saying
nothing
,
or something worse, over and over again, for hours.
Then the hung animals, impatient maybe, begin and carry
on extra dancings, rump-rangings, branch-shakings, and
other exercises. They champ bits!snap their teeth at
neighbouring horses!kick, as quadrupeds should, in
quadruple time!and stamp, squeak, and squeal! In fact,
they make as much noise and behave as foolishly as if they
held a
fanatical
meeting themselves!
Often too, among the horses, are a few knowing old
codgers, (and Dick, I am sorry to say, cultivated their
acquaintance
,)
who have slipped their own bridles, and are
now misspending the time in eating off the bridle reins of
quiet animals, or in kicking and biting, with most provoking
sang-froid, fastened horses, already furious and indignant.
Most horses when liberated usually start home at full speed,
inconsiderately leaving folks that rode once or twice to
meeting, to walk away in single or double file, or to get a
lift from a neighbour. Dick, however, never ran home:
he preferred, like luke-warm Christians, Sunday visiting;
and so went to see his neighbours in settlements directly
opposite the way to Glenville. Yet I must say he never
made the least objection to be caught and bridled again
provided you could
find
him.
Let none understand me to say that religious meetings in
the wooden world are not by very many attended from
serious
and devout motives: yet there, as elsewhere, many
attend such meetings from secular motives, and some from
very improper ones. Numbers go to see their neighbours
or to hear the news, and not a few to electioneer. A very
frequent cause is to advertise strays.
Dignity is given to
our
pulpit gazetteering by confining
the business to the clergy; but in the Purchase, lay
members
,
and even a worldling give out notices: and that,
not by reading the advertisement in the reverential manner
of the civilized churches, but extemporaneously and orally.
Sometimes the affair assumes the form of the question
implied
,
as thus:
Neighbour Bushwhack, livin down the lower end of
Sugar Holler, would like to hear if any body in this here
settlement has heern or seed a stray critter of hissin, as his
hoss-beast, a three year old black geldin, come next spring,
with a switch tail, but a kind a eat off by his other colt,
slipt his bridle on Hick'ry Ridge last big meetin, and he aint
heern or seen nothin of him sense.
To which indirect query one or more neighbours rising
up will answer in this style;
Well, I allow the critter didn't come over here, as he'd
been heern on or seed by some of usbut if any body hears
or sees sich a stray, we'll put him up, and let neighbour
Bushwhack know of it.
Perhaps a notice thus given and answered in a city church
would do as much to discountenance Sabbath advertising,
as the rebukes of the religious press. Try it.
A big meeting is often held in the woods in our delicious
autumns. And nothing is more welcome to our young
people
hard at work till then, and needing a holiday, than such
a gathering. Then is the grand sparking time, and young
men go expressly as they say, to find a most powerful
heap of gals! Nor is this curious heap of sun-bonnets
and calico frocks adverse to a little extra attention; and
hence, compound parties steal away at intervals to the
springs, where they contrive
accidentally
to have a little
meeting of their own, whose merry and loud notes return
as strange echoes to the voice of psalmody and prayer.
A small meeting extra, is often held at night in a friend's
cabin. Then it sometimes happens, by reason of a storm
or very long sermon, or both, that the folks conclude to stay
all night; and then if the author's memory is faithful, we
used to see what was called a leetle fun. Nothing
immoral
or gross ever takes place; but certainly we had
something
more lively than praying and singing.
It was, therefore, with some surprise we used to read
reports from
new
missionaries, in which the large numbers
that came in all weathers and from great distances to attend
protracted meetings, and who seemed unable to tear
themselves
away from the exercises, &c. &c, was considered
as conclusive evidence that we New Purchase people had
uncommon anxieties to hear the truth. Now, the result of
all our experience, and we had a pretty rich one, is and
wasthat unregenerate hearts are pretty much out there
as in herethat men born of log cabins and stick chimneys,
and men born of silks and broadcloths, are all equally born
of the flesh and are flesh. Maybe the German
population
about central Pennsylvania are exceptions, as a
certain
learned young Doctor of Divinity seems to think; but
then, they are the sole exceptions.
The occasion offers to say a few words about the
missionaries
themselves. But while we profess to be very
good-natured
and social, we are not, reader,
so
charitable as to
extend our term beyond pretty well educated, talented and
evangelical missionaries. We made Glenville
head-quarters
for missionaries and we ever found uneducated
preachers
and even small talented gentlemen, an inconvenience
and an evil more than a blessing; and as to the
unevangelical
sort
, learned or unlearned, they were a nuisance and
a pest.
As a body, then, the true missionaries in the New
Purchase
were very excellent men; eminent in self-denial, in
ardent zeal, in endless labours, in disinterestedness. They
were considered Domestic Missionaries; but they endured
as much as their brethren in the foreign field, and that
without the incidental excitement and support derived from
the eclat of a mission: especially when the wood's preacher
comes to depend for his entire sustenance on two or more
weak settlements, the aid of the missionary society being
declined or withdrawn. For a year or two an approximate
salary may be paid, a few shillings in cash and the balance
in trade. Still, educated men need a few other articles
beyond pork, corn, tow-linen, leather, &c.a few books for
instance. And they are forced to go a few journeys; wish
to educate their children; pay doctor's fees, and the like.
Nor is it, maybe, an unpardonable sin to aspire after
furniture
one degree above rough cabin apparatus. Hence the
missionary must have a little hard cash; and hard enough for
them, poor fellows, it is by the time they handle it.
The outposts, therefore, must be either wholly abandoned
to profoundly ignorant, vain, empty, conceited, self-confident,
and snarling fanatical preachers; or proper preachers
must
do some things that are
secular
. And if the New
Purchases
are abandoned, then must they be cursed out there with
inspired
clergy, such we have heard thus reciting
their
apostolic
creed:
Yes, bless the Lord, I are a poor, humble manand I
doesn't know a single letter in the A B C's, and couldn't
read a chapter in the Bible no how you could fix it, bless
the Lord!I jist preach like old Peter and Poll, by the
Sperit. Yes, we don't ax pay in cash nor trade nither for
the Gospel, and arn't no hirelins like them high-flow'd
college-larned
sheepskinsbut as the Lord freely give us, we
freely give our fellow critturs.
Hence a few of the true preachers betake themselves to
teaching as the least uncanonical avocation. And all would
gladly do this, if scholars were plenty enough; and, if after
all the extra labour in teaching, pay came not also in the
shape of fat-flitch, cord-wood, eggs, and butter. Most true
preachers and pastors are, therefore,
compelled
to enter some
land; and then after long and arduous toils they contrive
to barter some produce at the settlement store for sugar, tea,
coffee and paper. But to jingle a few silver dollars, the
parson must sell a cow, or calf, or even a horse!
The proverb, half a loaf better than no bread, applies
here; for if proper ministers out West do not, in very many
places, in a great measure maintain themselves, settlements
now half-served by those noble men would not and could
not be served at all. True, the folks out there might have
husks
from fanatical fellows; but Christ's sheep ought to
have pastors and proper foodthey are not hogs to be fed
by the Devil's swine-herds.
Very nice and classic essays used to find their way
sometimes
to Glenville, which were full of very proper rhetorical
words against secular clergy, and commanding them to
reform
and give themselves wholly to the work of God and the
ministry; essays no doubt well intended, but written, we
apprehend, by inexperienced young gentlemen, just
married
,
and seated in the parsonage in the midst of a well
furnished
library. Sometimes, too, such essays were penned
by learned gentlemen, with sons and daughters at good
boarding
schools; and the writers, maybe, received so much
hard silver per page, especially if a prize essay; and our
far east censors not only had the pleasure of pelting our
poor frogs, but found it profitable too. In such essays the
Proton Pseudos
was,
all
pastors and preachers
must
give
up secular employmentstheir schoolstheir farmstheir
merchandisetheir tradesand imitate the Apostles, &c.
In extraordinary times men are sustained by the providence
of God in extraordinary ways, and purse, scrip, and books
in the Apostles' time were not needed; and few then had
the care and expense of a family, except Pope Peter!and
he, unlike some Unholinesses, was wicked enough to
prefer
a Wife to a Harlot!
And even in those days Paul, whilst aiding to erect a
spiritual tabernacle, supported himself at secular
tent-making
!
It is not improbable that Luke, the beloved and
benevolent physician, prescribed and took fees in
emergencies
.
May, then, modern ministers in no cases do secular
things, without being subjected to unkind suspicions, and
not rarely denounced as merchants, farmers, speculators,
and even jockies? Nay, many thus stigmatized are among
the best of men; and that, however warned by hasty young
clerks and clergy to look out for the doom of unfaithful
stewards! and bid to expect, after a life of toil for the
gospel
and after bestowing the spiritual without reaping the
carnal, bid to look out for banishment into the outer
darkness
!!
Ah! ye hasty censors! God will never forget
labours
of love in that far West or elsewhere; even if a
preacher, to put bread into the mouths, and garments on the
bodies of his family, do work secularly with his own hands!
It is even granted by hasty writers, too, that the
penuriousness
and dishonesty of congregations may
drive
the
minister to secular labour; and that surely is ample and
sufficient apology, one would think, for the minister's
irreverent
conduct. Why then this perpetual cannonade against
the Clergy? Does it never occur, that the niggardly Mr.
Miser, the close-fisted Mr. Grip, the narrow-minded Miss
Snarl, and the dishonest Mr. and Mrs. Finepromise, may,
at the grand assize, have to appear as defendants and show
cause why the preacher
was
driven to be secular? Strange!
passing strange, if a hunted, defrauded, broken-spirited
man, who, because he wishes yet to preach, maintains
himself
,
should, in addition to all his sufferings, be decried and
rebuked as faithless and money-loving!as needing
reform
!as
passing to a severe doom and vengeance in the
life to come! Oh! you that in one sense, at least, are at
ease in Zion, and have, therefore, so much time to buffet,
go, visit a New Purchase!and then write
Mr. Carlton!!keep cool.
Well then, I will go on to say that meetings in the
Purchase
were not always dry affairs. Once, this very autumn,
a two days' meeting was to come off on Saturday and
Sunday
in the Welden settlement. At the close of the first
day, while Glenville and Carlton were settin the toone for
them, a heavy shower began suddenly to fall; and as we
clerks could not get out to secure our saddles they became
well soaked. Many, indeed, hurried out to secure their
own accoutrements and those of the wimmin folks's, but
they forgot the clerks' and the rector's: hence after service
we found seats cool and refreshing as a wet sponge. We
had been invited to spend the night at a chieftain's
[6]
[6]
White, of course.
in the
settlement: and as we were without umbrellas or cloaks,
and the rain kept mizzling away, we had a very agreeable
ride of it, receiving too, from overhanging branches and
thick bushes frequent baby-sprinklings until the whole
amounted to believer's baptisma thorough immersion.
However, we were neither salt nor sugar. On we
splattered
and splashed, laughing and talking, while our
saddle-seats
added to the noise very hearty and peculiar notes or
sounds, which may be called
soggings;
and we comforted
one another with mutual promises of a dry house and a
drying fire. Butah! me!our dear good landlady, and
expressly to honour her guests, had determined to have
things fixed!and a wet fix it was. First and foremost,
the puncheon-floor had undergone a deluge of scrubbing,
effected by pouring over it forty great calabashes of water,
or one great calabash forty times emptied! Then the floor
Vol. 1.7
had been violently assaulted with stiff hickory brooms, till
its dirt was raked and floated away to form an alluvion in
the cellar below; but much of the flood having eluded the
swabbing process that followed, there remained many
Lilliputian
lakes of muddy water in the cavities and gulleys of
the puncheons. Secondarily, chairs, tables, benches, and
even bedsteads had undergone Pharisaical ablutions: and
although things
did
dry in process of time, yet, as the good
woman remarked, Things were a leetle dampish, to be
sure! Indeed, chairs and benches on which persons of
a sanguine temperament sat, exhibited, on their rising, a
decided Mosaic of dark and light shades. Thirdly, when
we washed before supper and dinner in one, we were offered
a
wet
towel to
dry
on! the lady apologizing for the anomaly
by saying, Thar'd been sich a rite down smart chance of
rain that their wash wouldn't dry. Of course this apology
accounted for the
undried
table-cloth at the meal; where,
by the way, we recognized, in the midst of other good things,
and full of milk, the republican bowl that a few moments
before had enacted the part of wash-basin. In anticipation
of its complex and yet desultory character, we of
Glenville
,
instead of dipping at the time our hands into the bowl
had poured from it the water over the hands. All the guests,
we must say, were not so considerate.
But a most sumptuous fire was roaring away for our
comfort
;
and, be satisfied, in no sense was it cold comfort.
And soon all, and at a very respectable distance, were
steaming away, and, in the midst of haze and vapour,
snuffing
the savoury odours of ham fried in lardof venison
and wild-turkey in dittoand of chickens in cream and
butter! Generally, meats of every sort in the Purchase
were fried, and that so perfectly as to be not only done, but
actually
done up;
till the pieces curled at the edges, and
the taste of one kind of flesh could not be distinguished
from another, likelikeoh! like the carcasses of one
horse and two cows burnt to death in the conflagration of
Mr. Forgethisname's
[7]
[7]
Said accident happened once upon a time, when we
was
a boy.
livery stables in the Northern
Liberties
.
And yet a cookery of squirrels or chickens,
a la
Kaintuc
, in cream, butter, and dusted flour, excels any fry
in the world.
By bed-time affairs had become dryish. Still, much
vapour hung in our atmosphere; and towards the arctic
regions
of the cabin, matters were puddly. However, ten of
the company were accommodated in the beds, and as many
others,indeed, I do not know where: yet we all retired;
when a spirited and general confabulation was maintained
till most of the trebles, tenors, and basses grew, some flat and
others muttering, and there was a subsidence into a colloquy
between two. At last, one of these returning a mumbling
kind of response, Mr. Holdon, despairing to extract any
more talk, cried out, Well! good night: which signal
was followed by a farewell crackling of bedsteads, and an
audible rustling of kivers; and then all lately so active
and chatty, was turned into sleeping and snoring. Bah!
tell me not about the sleep of innocence! nothing comes up
to the sleep of a backwoodsman; and as to his snoring, beat
it if you can!
Well, I dreamed a dream. Methought old Dick was
harnessed to our bedstead, and was pulling us through
showery bushes and nettles, and that I had the tooth-ache,
and so uncomfortable all seemed that I determined, as is the
case in some dreams, to wake myself. Happy resolution!
for whilst Dick had vanished, and we were safe enough in
the cabin, yet the interpretation of the dream was present:
a gentle stream was trickling from above through a hole
in the clapboard roof, the jeau d' esprit having already
saturated
my rag-pillow, and more than a foot of the adjoining
covers!and, what was very remarkable!I
had
the
toothache
!!
Indeed!
Yes! indeed. I whipped out of bed; quietly worked the
bedstead from under the unelectric water spout; doubled
my end of the bolster in place of the pillow removed; got
once more into bed, and began to lull the grumbling tooth
by holding my mouth shut and breathing through the nose,
and occasionally counting slowly and deliberately as high
as a hundred. And in this laudable work I had at last
succeeded, and was sinking away into dryer dreams, when
I was suddenly aroused to my last and severest trial by
water by a rude shake from Glenville, who also thus
addressed
me:
Carlton!are you going to sleep all day?get up if
you don't want your boots full of water
My boots!my boots!!man alive! don't let them
get any wetterI shall never get them onnever!
Up thenor Tom Hilton will clean yours as he has
minehe'll dip them in the rain-trough.
Fortunately all were up and out but myselfand yet it
would have been the same if Queen Victoria had been
theremy boots were not to be trifled with, even when
dry;what! if provoked by such a ducking! I thought,
therefore, of neither man, woman, nor childI thought only
of my bootsand I leaped out of bed without regard to the
ordinary precautionsand slipping on the limbs of the
indispensables
(anglic,
jerking on my breeches)and
holding up and buttoning as I moved, I rushed to the door!
and in the very nick of time to witness the catastrophe!
Yes! there on the muddy earth stood, sad and sullen, boot
the first, clean and soaked as a scrubbed puncheon! and
there descended into the rain-trough boot the second, up to
the strap-stiches!!
Tom! Tom!why did'nt you let my boots alone?
you've fixed me nowI shan't get them on to-day!
Well, sir, I was only a sort a cleanin themthey was
most powerful muddy likehope no harm done, Mr.
Carltin?
Well, Tom, thank youbut I am afraid we have tight
work nowplease let's have the articles, any how.
And our fear, reader, was not unfounded. Never, since
the origin of boots, and the abolition of sandals, was there
such a tugging at straps! It did seem as if, at last, the
grand philosophical achievement would be effected, and with
a
leetle
harder pull we should, boots and all, be raised clean
up from the puncheons!nearly equal to lifting one's self
over a fence! And oh! what soaping of heels!what
numerous and contradictory suggestions and advices from
commiserating and laughing friends!
tears
in all eyes!
Oh! the rubbing of insteps!the contortions of the os
sublime! And then, withal, when a boot had reached a
certain point, the creature could be neither pulled on nor
pulled off! But there limped Mr. Carlton, his two limbs
glued, somewhere about the junction of ancle and foot, in
two remorseless leathers; a very odd fellow, indeed,
hobbling with four feet, two of his own treading downward,
and two of the boots treading sidewaysand all with vain
hopes of stretching, and thus coaxing further on or off the
half-tanned conveniences!
At last it seemed necessary to cut the articles, as all
ordinary
and extraordinary attempts to move them up or down
had failed, when, at the crisis, in came a Goliah-like
woodsman
,
who, understanding the fix, declared; if them 'are
straps thare would a sort a hold, he allow'd he'd pull on
Mr. Carltin's boots. We agreed to a new trial.
Accordingly
,
Mr. Goliah placed himself behind the patient, with
his own back to the wall, and then working two fingers
apiece into each strap(all he could get in)he
did
pull
the boots on, sure enough!! Ay! and that he would have
done if both of Mr. Carlton's legs had been in the same
boot, instead of one leg per boot!
King William was of opinion that thumbkins was logic
enough to make him confess to a liewhat, if he had tried
the logic of my boots! If the iron boot is any more forcible
I cannot stand it at allI should scream out my belief in
the Pope or the Devil, or any other dogma of the particular
catholic church! The holy church will of course canonize
a man who has already discovered two efficacious ways to
make Christiansour bark-wheeland now our boots!
Apropos! de botte, this reminds me of the Kentuckian
saved from the massacre, at the Blue Licks, by a pair of
wet buckskin breeches. He was pursued by two Indians,
and on reaching the river, was forced to plunge in and swim
over. Emerging, he soon discovered that to run with his
former speed, his buckskins must be left for booty: hence,
he halted an instant to unskin himself, whilst his nimble
foes had now reached the opposite bank of the stream. But
now the wet unmentionables, half-way off, became
obstinately
adhesive, and could be drawn neither up nor down
and the enemy coming nearer and nearer.
Poor fellow!what a dreadful situation!
Very; and so he made up his mind, like a gallant man,
to diein his breeches. And yet, being a Presbyterian,
his predestined time had not come: for, to his amazement,
his red friends, on arriving, burst into loud laughter, and,
instead of knocking him on the head, they only spanked
him on the antipodes and took him prisoner; and the
Kentuckian
,
being ransomed, got home to tell his adventure
and was one of the very few brave gentlemen that survived
the battle of the Blue Licks.
Yesbut, Mr. Carlton, what has this deliverance to do
with the Pope or the Devil?
Oh! nothingit was owing to the Indians:other
torturers
do not let off folks so easily. But talking of one
thing, you know, makes us think of another.
However, after the second edition of wet towels, wet
table-cloths, and other dampers, we all went to churchor,
by courtesy, the dissenters' conventiclewhere seats and
floor were also dampish: yet none of these little affairs
killed us then, and even now, most of the Glenvillians live
and talk, occasionally, of Carlton's Wet Time.
During the present summer and fall, others of our colony
had little adventures. For instance, John Glenville, in
moving a piece of bark to throw under the wheel, was bitten
in the wrist by a copper-head coiled under the bark; but,
by a timely application of proper remedies, he escaped very
serious injury. Uncle Leatherstocking also came something
nearer being killed than Sir Roger's ancestor, that had a
narrow escape from being slain in a battle by arriving on
the field the very day after the fight: for our uncle, stooping
to examine a fine cabbage in his patch, discovered a
rattlesnake
ready to salute him, and yet time enough to leap back
and avoid the favour. And then a young woman coming
from Welden, by herself, to return a call due to Glenville
Settlement, just as she had reached the outskirts of our
territory
,
was gratified by the sight, a little way from her, of a
lady panther, affectionately sporting with two rampant
pantherines
each
as big as a pair of domestic tom-cats.
La!and did she not scream?
Scream!Miss Peggy Whatmore scream! Fortunate
for the quadrupeds, Peggy was within reach of no rifle!
No, no! to use her own language, she only a sort a skued
round towards ole-man Ashmoresisand did'nt say nuthin
to them, as they didn't seem like wantin to say nuthin to
heryet it was a leetle skary as they was powerful nasty
lookin varmints.
A missionary, also, coming to fulfil an appointment among
us, saw in the edge of our clearing three barri. e.,
three bears; there being, in western phrase, a powerful
sprinkle of such shaggy coats in our borough. At this
information, all our domestic and neighbourhood forces
being
mustered, we succeeded in overtaking and killing the
growling trio: and in due time, the largest skin, properly
prepared at our tannery, was presented to the missionary;
who ever after, till the day of his death, used it as a
bruin-saddle
cover.
Perhaps we may here say, that at night, on many
occasions
,
were around invisible serrenaders, that gave exact
imitations of wolves howling, foxes barking, and owls
screaming, hooting and screeching, with interruptions now
and then from sudden cries and growls so strange that we
could not say what bird or beast precisely was designed or
represented. The whole, however, riveted the conviction
that we were no longer dreaming about the woods, but were
actually living there; and, to be candid, I had never in
visions seen a single serpent, and could not have guessed
the wild beasts would turn out so very wild. But to all
things I got used, except snakes. To the very last of my
sojourn in the Purchase, I was slow to crawl through dark
thickets; and never did step over or off a log, till satisfied
no serpent was there to be tramped upon: and, that it was
necessary so to ponder our ways, may be believed by the
incident with which we now end the chapter.
One night Mr. and Mrs. C. were on a visit at Mr.
Hilsbury's
;
and, though pressed to remain till morning, and
warned of the danger in walking in the dark at that season
of the year, we decided on returning to uncle John's. The
path between the cabins was only a few inches wide, and
running through high grass and tall weeds, was nearly
invisible
in the day: yet having travelled it some half dozen
times daily, I was familiar with every stone, stick and root,
lying in or across the path; and any thing new there would
be sure to arrest my attention. Furnished with a light in
a small glass lantern, we proceeded homeward, myself in
front and my wife following, till at the end of about two
hundred yards, an unexpected root presented itself, running
seemingly from the nearest beach: but as the root ought
not to be there, before taking the next step I stooped to
examine, holding the light down towards the rootwhich
turned not into, but was in reality nothing more nor less
than the head and neck of an enormous rattlesnake!
Perhaps a novice, as I then was in backwood life, may
be pardoned for feeling a momentary sickness when the
glare of the serpent's eye fell on mine, as the rays of the
lamp disclosed and struck on his! The distance between
us was only eighteen inches; another step, therefore, would
have carried me over or upon the reptile: in the former
case
I
should have been safe, in the latter, one, or both
Mrs. C. and myself would have been wounded, perhaps
killed! And no sooner had I saidIt is a
snake!
than
Mrs. C. too alarmed to reflect, instantly from behind
clasped me, holding down both my arms; and thus
allowing
me neither to advance, nor retreat, nor stir, she at the
same time began a series of most piercing shrieks, to which
as nothing better could be done, Mr. C. added loud cries
of Hullow-ow! down there!hullow-ow!!
Of course, this uproar brought them all up from down
there, and a clerical visitor among the restBishop Shrub
of Timberopolis. In the meantime the snake had retreated
or passed on; and as there was too great risk in poking
after him amid the weeds and grass at night, and the
central
cabin was the farther away, our whole party returned,
and all spent the night at the parsonage.
7*
CHAPTER XIX.
Ab ovo
Usque ad mala
From the cackle to the cluckle.
I was
sitting one day, towards the end of September,
with Bishop Hilsbury, when, through his modest little
sash were seen two young men riding up; who tying their
horses, after a short consultation, advanced to the door.
On this the Bishop whisperinga wedding without
doubt, hastened to receive his visitors, who yet
administered
the usual rap to the door, and entered with the
universal
salamWell! who keeps house?
Evidently the parson had been supposed alone; and my
presence seemed to disperse the courage mustered by the
youngsters, and they stumbled into seats in manifest
distress
.
But we soon engaged them in conversation on
land, timber, corn, swine, muddy roads, dry ridges, high
waters, and all sylvan topics: and on all and each, our
friends rung the changes of all the powerfuls, big and little;
and all the chances and sprinkles, the smarts and right
smarts and right down smarts, till they were talked, not out
of countenance, but into it; nay, till they had more than a
dozen times (while the clatter lasted) seemingly collected
brass sufficient for their special affair to be introduced at
the next pause. Yet alas! with the calm, returned the
sheepishness; and there sat our rustics red as boiled
lobsters
,
not at any thing said, but at what was to be said, and
grinning a smileless kind of contortion at each other, equal
to askingWon't
you
begin? Then they gnawed their
spice wood riding whipswriggled on their seats
crossing
leg after leg, as if the legs were all equally opposed to
being undermost, till convinced nothing by way of expose
was coming this gap, off all set afresh on the circle of the
old topics thus:
Immense forests here, sir!
Yesmost powerful 'mense heap of woods. Allow
woods is most considerable cut off in them 'are settlements
you come from, Mr. Carltin? They say you've no barr
nor turkey out thare, in Filledelfy?
No: no bears on four legs. But still we've a smart
sprinkle of dandy out our way
Huh! haw!them's the fellers with hair on their
faces and what goes gallin all the timepowerful heap a
fun in that, Mr. Hilsbury, though.
Here the speaker stopt short; for what he had said
about
our
hairy creatures was out of no disrespect for the
animals, but only to lighten his own load; but then he had
found it still too heavy, and broke down at the lift. Retreat,
however, now did not offer, and so suddenly rising and
winking to the parson, they both went together into the
yard, leaving myself and the other young man in the cabin.
When outside, the groomfor he it was, thus commenced:
WellhemMr. Hilsburyhem!
YesJosephI think I understanddon't I?
Wellallow, maybe you do.
I was down in the Welden settlement, and I heard
something about our losing neighbour Ashford's Susan.
He! he!yes!well I am a sort a goin to git
married
and
Susan's the very gal. Well now, Mr. Hilsbury,
Billy Welden's come along for groomsman and he's got
the inviteI'll just call him out and git it.
Billy accordingly was now summoned, and taking off his
new fur hat, he extracted the invite from the lining and
handed it over to the preacher. As the Bishop allowed
me to see the document as a specimen of New Purchase
literature, I
took
the following exact and literal copy:
Rev. Mr. Hilsbury asqr.,you are pertiklurly invited
to atend the house of mr. Abrim Ashford asq. to injine upon
i the yoke of konjegal mattrimunny with his dater miss
Susan Ashford as wasthersday mornin next 10 aklok
before
dinner a. m.
mr. Joseph Redden
your humbell sarv't,
mr. William Welden, groomsman.
p. s. dont say nuthin about this 'ere weddin that's to
beas its to be sekritand to morrer Billy Welden's goin
to ride round and give the invitesand all your settlemint's
to be axed.
The reader will err if he thinks this the
worst
specimen
of our New Purchase authorship. It was, in fact, the best
our literati, near Glenville at least, could furnish, (and like
Andrew's and Stoddard's Grammar,) it was a joint
production
;
it was done by Joseph Redden and William
Welden
,
both aided by the schoolmaster of the Welden
settlement
.
And it was got up with great care and done in the
very best round hand. Few persons around us at this time,
could even read, much less write; and the ladies of Glenville
were regarded with wonder as soon as it was known that
they could not only read and write, but even sifer, and cast
'counts! We men of Glenville had from the first been
deemed powerful smart, and the above note had been
got up and performed expressly to show us that other folks
had learning too, and could do a thing up to Gunter.
Next day Mr. Welden appeared in the edge of the woods,
being too much in a hurry to dismount and let down the
bars, and according to etiquette in such cases, he
exclaimed
,
Hullow! the house! Upon this, Mr. Seymour
proceeded
to the fence, and on his return to the house
announced
that we all had the anticipated invite.
And now as it is sometimes before we go to the wedding,
we may properly in the interval introduce the bride elect
and her family. Abraham Ashford, the father, was the
patriarch of the Ashford settlement, which joined Glenville
on the north-west. After a life of some years in a cabin
of the roughest order, the family had, within the past year,
removed into a good two story log-house of the hewed
order
;
and hence, he himself being a very tall man and
having
sons tending rapidly upward to his summit level, and
having a two story house, neighbour Ashford is to be
regarded
as an eminent man. He had, too, scraped a
spelling
acquaintance with easy reading, and that made him
affect the company of the Glenvilliansnot so much I
fear to increase his knowledge as to display it. For
instance
,
once on bringing his stock of ginseng to our
tannery
,
where we bought the article on speculation, Mr.
Ashford
on laying it on a dry hide thus began:
Well, Johnny, my buck, what do you allow sang's (
ginseng
)
done with out thare in Chi-ne?
Oh! probably the Chinese smoke it, or chew it!
Well, that's your idee; but I knows better nor that
comes to, according to my idee.
What is your opinion?
Well, I'll tell you. A sailor-man was once out here in
sang time a buying uplong afore you come outand he'd
been in all them parts about Chi-ne in a ship or the like
and he told me all about what them fellers done with it.
Indeed!
Yesand he told me as how they biled the sang
up, and put it in to clarify their chany tea cups and
sassers
.
Neighbour Ashford was, moreover, a philosopher; but as
his views may perhaps expose him to a visit from the
Inquisition
,
I shall give no greater insight into his physical
creeds, than by a narration of our talk on the shape of the
earth.
Mr. Ashford, said Glenville, one day I was present,
I wish you would let Carlton here understand your idea
about the shape of the earth; he's just from college and
don't think as you do.
Well, Johnny, my buck, I'm willing to talk with
Mr. Carlton, or any larn'd man; and I've no idee this
here world of ourn is round. Them's my sentiments, Mr.
Carlton.
I do not quite agree with you there, Mr. Ashford; I
have been taught that our earth is an oblate spheroid!
Oh! I don't know nuther consarnin high-flow'd
diksionary shapes; all my idee is the world's not ublate,
nor no sort of round, and I kin prove it straight as a rifle.
I only meant to say I was taught to think the world was
a sort of roundish; but I'm ready to give up if you can prove
as you say.
Well, I'm powerful glad to see, Mr. Carlton, you aint
proud for all your high larninand so I'll jist tell you how
I kim to find it out.
[8]
[8]
Speech only translated and contracted and improved.
You see, sir, I was one day a
ploughing with them two brown mares, to put in corn, and
as we ploughed along, I gets into a solelo'que on this
diffikilt
pint, and so sez I to myself, sez I, what's the use in
filloserfers a sayin our world's round. Don't my
ole-womin's
dry apples git off the plank and then role rite down,
smack down the pitch of the ruf? 'Cos why? Why 'cos
it aint flat. And so I argefied the pint agin this way; sez
I, kin a feller go spang up the round of a big punkun?
And then I stops the mares; and sez, wouldn't this here
plough and them 'are hoss-beasts role down like the dry
apples if this here world was round like a big punkun
and aint it more powerful harder to go up and stick on a
big round thing nor a little one? And then I jist minded
and I slapped agin my head so, (action to word,) and I
hollows
out aloud, so that the mares started to gobut I cries
woh! won't you?and they stops aginand I kept on
a hollowinI've got it!I've got it!and slaps rite off
to make tracks homeand when I gets in, sez I to the ole
womun, Molly, sez I, hand us the ole bookI've got
it! Got what, Abrum?sez she. Why hand us the
ole book, I tell you, sez I. (During the progress of his
lecture,
[9]
[9]
Could not some Lyceum send for Mr. Ashford?
Mr. Ashford had taken up our family bible; and
now with his finger resting on the third verse of Genesis,
he did, on a sudden for me, what he had previously done
for his wife.) And so she hands me the ole book, and I
lays it out afore her jist so, (opening and spreading the
book before me,) thare sir, thare, read that thare varse
its proved from the Bible, sirthare read that are! viz:
And the earth was without FORM! sir.
Here we held down our head as close to the page as
possible
,
as if absorbed in thought and inspecting the words
most closely, till with an unsteady voice we could reply:
I confess, Mr. Ashford, I never
did
see the passage in
that light before; and it only proves that plain men, if left
to themselves, will often discover what learned folks never
can: but what shape is the earth do you say?
Do
I
say!why does'nt the ole book itself say the
earth aint
no shape at all?
its got no formits nuthin but
a grate stretched along place like a powerful big prararee
without any indyes, sir, and as flat as a pancake.
True, Mr. Ashford, and the Bible says also the earth
is VOID!empty, sir, and hollow as a nut shell!
For a moment Mr. Ashford was staggered at so
unexpected
an addition to his theory; he seemed alarmed at the
utter emptiness of a shapeless earth! Yet at the very
next log-rolling, he proclaimed both Glenville and Carlton
to be converts to his idee, adding in the latter
gentleman's
praise, he wan't nere so stuck up a feller as folks
said. And so, reader, we are Amorphorites; with more
belief, however, in the emptiness of the world, than in its
want of shapes.
As to the sun, Mr. Ashford had a very peculiar and
original
theory; I am, said he, sentimentally of opinion
that the sun, after all, is nothing but a great shine! Like
many other forest patriarchs, our neighbour often did his
own preaching; being in advance of this age, when we all
do our own doctoring, write our own poetry, tales, essays,
and every man is his own lawyer; and of course in
theology
,
like people in an enlightened era, he had his own
notions
.
Hence, in one discourse about the good Samaritan,
he took occasion to illuminate us as to its Speretil
meaning
;
and among other things said, some folks think that
the two pennies left the Jerickoo man, was nuthin but
cash penniesbut my friends, there's a speretil and
bettersome
idee:one penny is the law, and tother's the
gospel
.
The Ashford's were, however, remarkable for nice
house-keeping
,
and for cleanliness of person. They all were, too,
thrifty and ingenious. Unable in the early times of their
settlement to obtain hemp or flax, they gathered a peculiar
species of nettle, (called there nettleweed,) which they
succeeded in dressing like flax, and in weaving it into cloth.
By some accident, they had been then destitute of food for
several days, and during that time they had lived on squirrels
and elm-bark. But the rose of our wilderness was Susan
Ashford, the intended bride. Ignorant, indeed, she was
of all things out of the woods; but she was of good natural
capacity, merry disposition, lofty notions, and withal a
very pretty and modest maiden. From the first, she took
a strong liking for the Glenville people; and was evidently
glad to find friends able and willing to teach her many
important
matters of which she frankly and voluntarily would
confess her ignorance. And as far as her mother would
permit, Susan by degrees conformed their own domestic
economy and fixtures to ours, defending us whenever her
mother would object and intimate that the Glenville
folks were, maybe, a leetle prouder nor they should be.
Susan had, of course, many offers; yet as she told
Emily Glenville, her confidanteshe'd no idee of
marrying
any rough body without no more manners than a
barr; and for her part she'd have somebody that know'd
how to dress up on Sundays in store cloth and yaller
buttins
,
a sort a gentleman like.
Now Susan did not really think that dress made the man;
she did only think, and properly think, that no decent young
fellow would on proper occasions boorishly neglect his
dress, and especially when he came a courting.
One answering externally became a suitor. He was
morally, however, unworthy Susan; and her escape was
owing to his personal dirtinesswith which a curious
accident
made her acquainted. She caught sight of his
naked
feet, as he in a moment of forgetfulness took off his
shoes and stockings in her presence; upon which she
declared
next day to Emily Glenville, that she never would
have sich a dirty feller, if he did wear store cloth and
yaller
buttins. This fellow, a pretty well educated
Scotchman
,
had courted some by letters, which the Ashfords not
fully comprehending had now and then brought to Emily
to be deciphered, especially the letter in which the suitor
said, he had a
predilection
for his mistress! On this
occasion, Susan remarked, there was sich a powerful
heap of diksenery words, she could'nt quite see the drift on
'em. Happily the above accident saved our proteg
from a disastrous union with an atheist and a distiller.
But now Joseph Redden was accepted; a very honest,
industrious, and upright young man; and who not only
dressed up to Susan's rule, but more than that, he kept,
about twenty-five miles distant, a small store himself, and
sold store cloth and yellow buttons to others. And thus
Susan
,
and all her old friends, and we her new ones, were
well satisfied. Having no occasion to mention our young
folks after the wedding, we think the reader will be glad
to know, that when we re-emigrated from the west, Mr. and
Mrs. Redden were living in comfortable circumstances,
respected and beloved.
In due time the wedding-day came. Mr. Hilsbury,
however
,
had not yet got home from a distant missionary tour,
and we of Glenville were forced to set out without the
bishop; in hopes indeed, he would be yet in time at Mr.
Ashford's. Between our settlement and his, the distance
was little more than two miles; and for want of
conveyances
enough for all, it was concluded in a general
assembly
of our colony the day before, that the ladies and helps
of the borough, should ride to the wedding, and the
gentlemen
walk. And so we took up the line of procession
thus:
1. Uncles John and Tommy in the van. Their business
was to keep the true course through the woods, clear away
brush and let down fences.
2. Mrs. Glenville and Aunt Kitty riding twice on Kate,
the celebrated grey marequeen of horses (
genus
.)
3. The Rev. Mistress Hilsbury on a borrowed nag; the
lady with an infant in her arms, and a little girl for nurse
behind.
4. Mrs. Carlton, Miss Emily and Aunt Nancy on our
spotted mare, called Freckled Ginney.
5. Last of the cavalry, Old Dick, with all the help of
the colonyi. e. three gals riding thrice.
6. Glenville and Carlton closed the rear. Our business
was to put up fences, see the ladies get along in safety, and,
above all, to keep Dick from lagging. For like grave
personages
familiar with Chesterfield, Dick was rarely in a
hurry; on the contrary he usually stepped with a very
solemn
swing, as conscious men's eyes were upon him and of
his weight in society. And yet after a very long sermon
he would sometimes hasten home with an irreverent
impatience
;
and always on rounding a certain sink hole, whence
could be caught a glimpse of the stable, our hero, and
without
consulting the friends who were kindly
backing
him,
would suddenly pitch into a gait compounded of every pace
and shuffle ever learned in his youth or since taken up
extemporaneously
.
Once Dick had been loaned to the Bishop's wife; and
on our return from churchall persuasives from the lady's
heel and Mr. Carlton's toeall stripes from beech rods and
leather whipall cherrups and get-ups and even
old-rascal's-you
all
snapping of bridle reins to bring to his
recollection
Conestogo whip-crackingsall, all were in vain!
Dick only grinned or gave a double flourish with his tail,
crawling along and dragging leg after leg, till they seemed
always in motion and yet always stock-still! But
unexpectedly
to us he reached the favourite sink hole; when,
giving a sudden sneeze and slapping my beast in the face
with his tail, away he darted into the nondescript gait
namedbut very much as if the caco-demons dislodged from
the swine had somehow got possession of his carcase.
The dry leaves of autumn were then plenty, and the fellow
got them into such a lively, excited and noisy state, that
we riders, only ten feet apart, could hear nothing said by
one another: hence, after useless efforts to be heard in
answer
to the lady's voice coming to me in a high
screech-key
,
I kept only at last rising in my stirrups, opening the
mouth very wide and supporting the jaw with one hand, so
that with a distorted face I seemed in the agony and effort
of loud and earnest deliverybut yet uttered not a word.
And in this interesting attitude we sustained an instructive
conversation, till the lady guessing at the pantomime, we
both added a chorus of cachination to the rattling harmony
of shuffling horse-heels, and came in a tempestuous
whirlwind
of careering leaves to the lastbars; where Dick
stopped and the hurricane subsided.
Nonsense! Mr. Carlton
Granted, my dear Mr. Graves: but are we back-woods'
people to have
no
fun? And if we are to have any, how
shall we have it unless we
create
it? You have concerts,
and balls, and popular lectures till they become unpopular
and jest booksLady's BookGentleman's Book
Boy's Bookand organs in churches, and candy shops and
oysters and what not? And we are to mope to death in
the woodshey? Believe me, we learn out there to make
our own sports and contrive to extract something pleasant
from the empty roar of autumnal leaves shuffled and kicked
into harmless tempest by old Dick's horse-heels. And
further
,
dear Mr. Strutell, all this requires more ingenuity, and
even a calmer conscience, than every body has: an
ill-natured
,
an ignorant, a conceited, a wicked person will be
very miserable in the solitudes of a New Purchase.
But you started for the wedding.
We did; but we had two miles and more to goand
here is the placeand we shall resume the narrative.
The wedding party were all assembled and expecting
our arrival. And now Mr. Ashford came to meet us,
expressing
his regret at the failure of Mr. Hilsbury to be
present; but as several other preachers were present, he
suggested that it would now be best to proceed with the
ceremony. In this we coincided, and so preparation was
made for it, the Rev. Diptin Menniwater being selected in
place of Bishop Hilsbury.
And soon then we were all paraded in the large room,
in which the company was compactly rowed along upon
benches, as noiseless and solemn as in meetin: and hence
we men of Glenville went squeezing around, and among, and
into, shaking hands with all that could be got at, and nodding
and smiling and winking at such as could not be felt and
handled, till places were found if not to sit in, yet to stand
in, and where we waited in laudable patience for the
descent
of the bridal party to destroy the oppressive and dead calm
that succeeded. The solemn stillness was indeed, now
and then broken by some lagger who administered the
usual slap to the door and uttered the visiting formula
already
namedbut that was only an interruption like
pitching
a pebble into a smooth deep lake. At very long last
Mrs. Ashford going to foot of the stepsa compound of
ladder and stairscalled to those in the upper room:
Well! if any body up thare's got a sort of notion to get
married to-day, I allow thare's no time to lose, no how.
This was answered with a species of giggle-sniggering by
parties in both stories; and in the midst commenced above
a shuffle movement, as if something might be expected
below
pretty quick. And soon was placed in descending
order, first, a pair of shiney new calf-skin boots with thin
soles; then, secondly, only a step higher, a pair of bran
new morocco slippers, with ancles in white stockings; and
then, thirdly, at suitable intervals, second pairs of shiney
dittos and moroccos and ancles. These omens were
instantly
succeeded by coat tails hooked on men's arms, and
white frocks held aloof from soiled stairs(all which matters
were plain enough to us behind the stair way, it having no
flooring or back for the convenience of sweeping and
scrubbing
)till
the principal actors had all descended bodily,
and stood among us propri personi. e. as large as life.
Whether from ignorance or etiquette, the groom and his
attendant, instead of being leaned upon, rested their own
arms on those of the two ladies, the bride and her maid
as if each man had
hooked
a woman and was determined
to hold her fast for a wife after the trouble of catching.
The Rev. Mr. Menniwater, a piteous looking personage,
humble as a drowned rat, was now seen to emerge from
behind one of the back benches, whither he had slunk away,
to nurse his courage for the grand duty; but unable to come
near the parties at the foot of the stair-ladder, he remained
where he was and began to
cry
out his part as if engaged
in out-door preaching, only with unusual rapidity, lest his
speech should be forgotten before it could all be delivered
thus:
Wellare you goin for to takeSirthat wominSir
a holdin by the handSirfor a lawfulcovenint wife,
Sir?
To this question direct the groom and groomsman both
returned nods; although the real man added an audible
Yes I am, giving, too, a visible pinch to Susan's arm;
equivalent to an exhortation and admonition that it was next
her turn.
Wellare you goin for to
have
hem!Ma'am!that
thare manMa'am!a holdin on your armfor to be your
lawful covenintmanhem!husband, Ma'am?
Here both ladies made a courtesy, (kurtshee,) but Susan
added the affirmative; upon which the parson repeated the
following closing form:
Well, I say then by authority of this here license from
the clark of our court, as how you're both nowman and
womanthat ishem!as how both of you are married,
young folks, and no body's no right to keep you asunder.
Upon which, greatly terrified, our preacher instantly
demanded
something to drink; not that he needed any thing
from thirst, but from embarrassment, and to cover his
retreat
.
And this request was, at the very word, answered
by a potation or grog, of whiskey, water and maple sugar.
Indeed, in those days out there, we have been in church,
when, at the amen to the benediction, forth came Deacon
Giles, with a wash-basin-bowl full of whiskey and some
water, sweetened as above and flavoured with nutmeg; and
of this sipped first the man of Godfor form's sake:and
after that it was all swallowed by the congregation, in
mouthfuls sufficient to elevate the mind, if dejected by the
sermon.
But the Rev. D. Menniwater's call for drink, was the
signal that the matrimonial meeting was out; and the
kissing
of the bride was set going by the ladies of Glenville,
who, (for mere example's sake, however,) were followed by
the gentlemen of Glenville. And two of these gentlemen,
I think, extended their salutation to the bride'smaid, which
was so encouraging to the groomsman, and other shy chaps,
that they with one consent began to salute the brides that
were to be: so that affairs were soon as completely
uproarious
and screechery as in a fashionable, highbred evening
party, with one good piano and some three dozen vocalists,
professors and amateurs of singing and talking. At last
the girls put out; followed by the beaux, and none were left
in the room but we old folks, (married people,) and the
young couple. And then came on all the old, racy and
original jokes and sayings on such occasions, with some
new ones in regard to the man and woman, made by
Mr. M.; whose inveterate habit of old manning, &c.
had forced him to substitute man and woman for husband
and wife, in concluding the ceremony. One very smart
neighbour body so persisted in calling the whole no
ceremony
at all, that poor Susan was half persuaded she was
hardly married; and had we of Glenville fomented the
affair
,
and Mr. Hilsbury been present, Susan, I do think,
would have had the marriage ceremony over again.
It was now noon, and dinnerthe grand affairwas not
to be till near 3 o'clock, P. M.although every body, man,
woman, boy, girl, help, domestic, hired and volunteer,
hands and legs, were all ferment in hastening this
catastrophe
of our drama: and truly drama it was, if action and
motion pertain to its essence. Here a boy was ferociously
cutting woodthere one toting wood: here a man and two
women getting a fire in full blast out of doorsthere two
men and one girl blowing up one within: and then rushed
by a whirlwind of petticoats, with one featherless turkey,
or two featherless hens, affectionately hugged along to dutch
ovens and skillets! Some carried and fixed tables,
pushing
and kicking and jamming at them till they consented to
stay fixed, and not to coggle! Some fixed rattling plates,
clattering knives, and ringing bowls on stout table covers;
which were at the same moment jerked by others, till they
came a sorter strate! And there was Mr. Ashford, Jun.
with his rifle, decapitating extra fowls, the company
proving
much larger than had been expected! For on these
hearty and solemn occasions every body is welcome, who
comes as an
umbra
to a neighbour, or acts as his own
shadow and shade; and every body is stuffed with as much
as he will hold; so that all sorts of feathered creatures
suffer
for the wedding dinner, and in great numbers, it being
long before a wholesome backwoodsman ever cries, Ohe!
jam satis! about the same as the classic reader knows
as crying out, Well! I've a belly full!
The whole clearing evidently enjoyed a saturnalia.
Wagons
and carts and sleds rested from rolling and screeching;
gears of leather and gears of elm-bark hung crooked and
unstretched on fences and projections of cabin outhouses;
and ploughs lay peaceful, with polished shares gleaming in
sunshine. The animals manifestly enjoyed the affair; hens
of maternal character clucked mid late broods, and some
wallowed in dust; geese hissed; ducks quacked; and dogs,
in all quarters, ran, barked, and wagged their very tails for
gladness; while shaggy horses peeped in wonder over bars,
or hung tenderly about the barn and corn cribs.
Adjacent the house was a yard; and this being swept
daily with wooden brooms and tramped, had become
denuded
of grass, and hard and clean as a puncheon floor.
Here
[10]
[10]
We
, here belongs to the company, not the author.
we now walked, ran, jumped, joked, told tales, made
brags and betstickled folk's ears with timothy heads
quizzed chaps about marryingchased girls going to the
spring for water, or to the milk house, and ever so many
funny things beside. And, what was wonderful! the girls
went every five minutes to the spring or milk house; and
came too through the front yard, when, if they had thought,
the way out of the back door was much shorter and more
direct! And then such a sprinking of water from little
calabashes and tin cups and ox horns! And such a
hanging
of dish-cloths and milk-strainers on the yaller buttins
of the hinder man! And the laughing!and the
rifle-shooting
!in
a word, we, (author now included,) were
most decidedly, and most vulgarly happy, joyous, and chock
full of fun and frolic.
Of course all this was too much for Old Dick to stand
and look at all day: hence, contriving to ease off his bridle
and then to work over the fence, or may be under it, there,
sure enough, in the midst of our sacred enclosure, suddenly
stood his impudence, and as if we were his feller critturs!
He was no stranger, however, to the company, and his
self-introduction
was hailed with more than three cheers; it
being well known he would contribute his share to the
entertainment
.
Accordingly, like a favourite dog, he was fed
Vol. I.8
with bits of bread, both corn and wheat, and with slices of
fat pork and pieces of fresh beef; which latter he would
only chew awhile, like tobacco, and then eject. He was
then smoothed and slapped and called namesthen pulled
by the tailpinched on the earsmade to grinand then
jumped on and jumped over; till at last girls were packed
and stowed upon him, and nothing was visible of the
favourite
but four horse-legs, moving under frocks, and a tail
wagging and flourishing happily among chintz and
morocco
the
whole a most grotesque feminine centaur! But
when we packed the fellow with men and boys, he would
either shake or bite them off; and if these failed he would
suddenly lie down, and then the compound rollings were
uncommonly entertaining.
Three chaps now mounted Dick, and fully resolved to
make him ford the creek, here about ten yards wide and
some two feet deep. By dint of coaxing and kicking, and
pulling and pushing, by the riders and the company, Dick
was got into the water, when he splashed on voluntarily to
the middlebut farther than that, not an inch. Nothere
he halted, and stood fixed as a river-horse that had grown
up on the spot! And vain all entreaties, cuffings, kickings!
vain all combined hallooings! vain all pelting with clods
and stonesall latherings with long bean poles!he was
wholly unbudgable! At last, however, he did move; and
so did his riders, who hastily slipped off into water more
than knee deep, preferring that to a roll in the creekDick
having exhibited the premonitory symptom of performing
that ceremony; and then they, amid no small uproar of
laughter from the whole assembled weddeners, waded
to the bank. But Dick, what did he? Ay, sure enough
why he speedily betook himself to the farther side, where
he wandered about and eat twigs and bushes, till he was
caught for our return. Reader, was all this instinct or
reason?
After this we told adventures. Among others, one hard
featured old worthy gave the following account about his
ole womin's tarrifying a barr, anglic, terrifying a
bear.
When we was fust settledsaid hedown on
Higginsis
bottim, thare was no mills in these parts and so we
pack'd all our bread stuffs from over thare at Wood'll about
once a month or thare-abouts, me going one day and coming
back agin next day and my ole womin a stayin in the cabin
till I gits back. The Injins was mostly gone, but straglin
ones kept comin on and off, but tho' they was harmless like,
folks was a little dubus and didn't want thare company; and
my ole womin she always shot the door at night, and a sort
a draw'd the bedstid agin it. Well, so one night I was
away for meal and she bethought as how she'd render off
her fat; and so she ons with the grate potthat one you're
old womin neighbour Ashford borrerd last year to bile sugar
inand she puts in her fat and begins a heatin it; when
what does she hear all at once on a sudden but a powerful
trampin round the cabin! Maybe, says she to herself,
its some poor Injin wants inwhen all at once the
trampin
stopt and somethin begins a scratchin up outside the
chimbly, and she spies through a crack, and if it want a
powerful barr that was arter the fat! And she know'd the
varmint wasn't going to rest till he klim down the inside of
the chimbly; and then she'd have to put out and maybe
lose all her fat! Well, my ole womin was to be sure, a
leetle skur'dbut she did'nt lose her presentiment of
mindshe only let the fellow back down as near as was
convenientand then she jerks a handful of dry grass out
of our tick, and set fire to the whole on the fat! And she
says, 'twas most powerful laffy to hear the barr go up
chimbly
againand how he was still heern a growlin and makin
tracts for the timbers! And that's the way she tarrifyed
the barr and a sort a scorched his brichis.
That makes me, grandaddy,said a young Hecules
think how near I was to bein skur'd last week, with a
wild cat over on Acorn Ridge. I was out huntin turkey,
but had no luck, and didn't see the fust one till I comes
toward's
Inglissisand thare I heerd a feller goblin. So I
crawls into the brush near a beech and begins a goblin, and
he begins a anserrin and a comin upbut jist then I hears
somethin a nuther in the beech abovebut I was afeard to
move my head lest the turkey ketch sight of meand so I
gives another gobble, and then hears him a coming up rite
smart, and I was only waitin to git sight of himwhen
what should I hear but a sudden shakin rite over my head
and so I looks out of the tail of my eye so(turning his
eye for illustration)and I'll be dogg'd if thare warnt a
wild cat jist goin to spring, as I'd gobled him up like a
gineine cock myself. So, you see I give up the turkey
and killed the varmintand that's his skin, grandaddy, you
see tother day at our house.
This reminded Uncle John of an adventure of his own
somewhat similar, and he went on thus:
One day when hunting in Georgia I got into a pine
thicket, where I sat down on a log to rest. Happening to
look in a certain directionfor nothing of the sort was
expected
I
saw a fine buck coming slowly towards the
thicket
,
either not seeing me or to reconnoitre. I had put off
my shoes to cool my feet, but now without thinking about
it, I rose to my feet ready to fire as soon as the deer should
be near enough: but as I stood about this way(way
exhibited
,
the legs apart)I felt something very cold glide
upon one of my bare feet, and on glancing my eye that
way, what was it but a rattlesnake crawling from under the
log across my foot! I had providentially presence of mind
to remain immovable as a rock--till the snake had
actually
crawled his whole length over my foot; and when fairly
beyond I suddenly jumped away, and then killed him:
but of course I lost my buck.
Brother Johnsaid uncle Tommythat makes me
think of my being lost twenty years agobut dinner, I
reckon, is most ready
Oh! no, uncle Tommysaid Mr. Ashfordwe've
time for that 'venture of yours.
This was enough for our Uncle Leatherstocking; for no
man so delighted in telling adventures. Indeed, few men
ever encountered more; and still fewer could orally relate
them so well. He was not an educated man, or even a
good English scholar; still he had read much and
conversed
much with intelligent persons: and so he was fluent in
natural English, and could aptly coin words and
pronunciations
to suit new ideas and circumstances. I shall try and
preserve his manner and spirit: but to enjoy his stories,
one should sit in his lonely cabin of a winter's night away
in the howling wilderness, and see his countenance and
action, and hear his tones.
Prehapssaid uncle Tommyyou know my wife's
father had considerable land on the Blue Fox River in
Ohio; so as we two wanted a leetle more elbow room, I
says one day to Nancy, Nancy, says I, I dad 'spose
we put out and live there. Game's mighty plenty there,
and there's fine water and plenty a fish, and plenty a
wood; and we kin lay in stores enough at Squattertown
to last more nor six months on a streech. And sure
enough, as I'm a livin man, off we sets and puts up a cabin
in the centre of the track, and that give us room for the
present: for the nearest white settlement warnt nearer nor
four mile, and Squattertown, the county seat, was nigh on
to twelve mile off. The Ingins, poor critturs, kim a huntin
over our track,. albeit, there was no reglar town of theirn
nearer nor twenty miles: but they never did us harmno,
not a
hait
(little bit)and Nancy got so used to their red
skins that she never minded them. There's bad Ingins
that will steal and maybe
massurkree:
but most when they
find a rale sinserity-hearted white, would a blame sight
sooner sculp themselves than him. And I do believe me
and Nancy was beliked by them: and many's the ven'sin and
turkey they fotch'd as a sort of present, and maybe a kind of
pay for breadstuffs and salt Nancy used to give them. Sartin,
indeed, a white would now and then be killed: but when
all the sarcumstansis was illusterated, it was ginerally found
the white was agressur, and was kotch'd doing something
agin their lawsand me and Nancy had a secret
conscience
that the white desarved his fate:and
sometimes
I felt like takin sides with the red skins myself, and
shootin down the whiskey devils that made them drunk
but I'll not enter on that now.
Well, I hunted and fish'd about whole days, the livelong
blessed day, while Nancy she'd stay alone a readin Scott's
Family Bible: so that she got three times right spang
through it, from kiver to kiverthe whole three volumes,
notes, practical observations, marginal references, and all!
And, I dad, if she did'nt read clean through all our church
histories, Milnursis, and Mush-heemisis, and history of the
Baptisis and Methodisis, and never so many more books
beside, for we always toted our books wherever we went.
And when I fished I used to larn sarmins by heart out of
Chrismas Evans, and president Davy's and Mr. Walker's
and that was a kind of help in preachin.
Uncle Tommy usually made the
dead
speak when he
preached, and sometimes he would echo Bishop Shrub
and Bishop Hilsbury, and other living apostles. And in
this he acted wisely, not being competent to the concoction
of his own sermons; and besides, when fully excited he
could do Christmas Evans' celebrated almanac sermon
nearly as well as Christmas himself: thence among the
Baptisis, as he always called them, Uncle Tommy was
greatly venerated, and was heaped up with titles like an
English Bishop, being styled: a mighty smart and most
powerful big preacher! Let not uncle Tommy's pulpit
preparation be despised; even high larned sheepskins,
it is said, do sometimes lay both the living and the dead
under heavy contribution, and that, too, when not endowed
with our buck-eye-preacher's pathos and unction. We,
indeed, of Glenville, always preferred that uncle Tommy
should represent Davies and Walkerand even Evans
and not to give his own. But to the story;
Wellcontinued heone morning early in
December
,
I says to Nancy, Nancy, I dad, says I, I do believe
I'll jist take old Bet(a rifle)as we are out of meat, and
go where I seen the turkies roosting last night: you mind
the morning, Nancy, my dear, don't you?
Bless you, Tommy Seymour, I'll never forget itI was
near losing you then, Tommy.
Well, Nancy, I'll go on with the story.
This was one of the interlocutories that always varied
and interrupted uncle Tommy's narratives, and nothing
could excel the intense interest that most affectionate and
devoted wife(wife and child to him)took in the stories,
though heard the hundreth time. But uncle Tommy went
on:
And so I slips out of bedit wasn't day quiteand
slips on my clothes, and fixes my old gun by the fire and
then opens the door to set out, when I dissarned a leetle
sprinkle of snow and a likelihood for a snow storm.
Howsomever
,
this did'nt
faze
me, only I steps back for my old
camlit cloaklittle thinking, as I fixed it on, how I'd need
the thing afore I'd git back agin.
Well, I starts for where I'd seen the turkeys, and gitting
near, sneaked round a bit, but soon found the critturs had
been too quick, and like Paddy's flea, wasn't there. I
heerd them, howsomever, fly, and so on I kept creeping
slowly along till I'd got from home, mayhap, a matter of two
miles; but the snow was so thick in the air that I never
could dissarn the birds, and away they kept going
flurry-wurry
about seventy yards a headtill I give up the hunt
and turn'd to go home for fear Nancy might be waiting
breakfast
Yes, Tommy Seymour, I did wait breakfast for you
Never mind, Nancy, my dear child, I got back at last
you knowreplied uncle Tommy, and continuedWell,
I turn'd to go back, but I dad if I could jist exactly tell
where I was precisely, the snow had so teetolly kivered my
tracks, and it was now snowing so bodaciously fast as to
kiver as fast as I made them. But I took a sharp look at
the timber, and fixing on a course, I kept my line for near
two mileyet, I dad, if I could strike the cabin and could
n't tell whether it was too high or too low; and so up I
went a short quarter, and down a short quarter, as near as
could be guessed circumlocating for three hours, but no
cabin
was to be seen. Well, says I, I dad, if I aint about as
good as lost; and so sits down in a tree top to reconsiderate,
and take a fresh startbut soon starts up and hollows like
the ole Harrybut nothing gives no answer and all was
snow!snow!snow! not a smite of noise, only my
breathing and a sort of pittinpattin sound of my heart! I
found it wouldn't do to stand still as the scarces begin to
crawl in a leetle, and so off I sets at a venture; for the
cabin must be, says I, somewhere near; and sometimes I
conceited it to be ahead of me, but all at once it vanished,
and I seed it was only a case of fantis-mgeryand that I,
Tommy Seymour, was actially lost!
Yes! Tommy, and I couldn't give you any help!
Nancy! child, I wouldn't a had you there for the
universal
world.
Well,resumed he,there I was teetolly lost! I
couldn't stay stillyet what use to walk on? And if I fired
my gun, and Nancy heerd it, and I didn't git back, mayhap
she'd think the Injins had killed me, and then she'd
come out and git lost too!and with that idee, thinks
I may be she's out now!and then I gits
bodaciously
sker'd and hollows agin like the very ole Harry! and
walks and runs this way and that waythe snow blinding
my eyesbut all was of no useI was lost! lost! lost!
But it was only about Nancy here, I thought at this time;
and I dad, if I din't ketch myself a crying like a child,
and, wished to be lost by myself without her coming out in
such a storm!(We here stole a look at aunt NancyI
could not catch her eye as she had her work-bag over her
face: but I dad, as uncle Tommy used to say, if we
didn't feel a
leetle
tender ourselves. And so, generous
reader, would you have felt, hearing the tremulous thrill of
the venerable old man's voice and seeing his eye
affectionately
turned towards that dear old lady that for so many
years had shared his wanderings and sorrows.)Well,
I must 'a become crazy, running round and hollowing and
cryingand all of no usewhen all at once it quit
snowing
,
and I was sperited up, hoping the sun would shine out
next, and I could take a course for Squattertown or the
Injin
settlement. But it kept dark and cloudy and I begins
t ` feel weak from fatigue and hunger(albeit I war'nt
sker'd on that pint, as I had old Bet along)and so
allowing
it was about one o'clock, I determined to strike the
Blue Fox, and keep down stream to the settlement on its
bank thirty miles down. Well, off I sets to strike the
river
,
and in about four mile comes to a little pond with a
couple of duck swimming about. I stopp'd in my tracks
knock'd out damp priminputs in freshand slams away
and kills one duck; and the other flies away. And I gits
the duck to land by pitching sticks in, but not wanting to
lose time, I kept on going; and so picked off the feathers
and sucked a little of it raw, till it 'most made me sick, and
I thought it would be better to keep and cook it at night
8*
which was now coming on black as thunder. Well, it
was time to look out for a camp; and just about dark I
come across a tree what had been twisted off by a harrikin,
and was lodged the butt ind on the stump; and the top on
the ground was puttee much of a dry brush heap. For all
the world! there never was sich a place!Providence
seemed to have blow'd it down jist for me! I could have
camp'd there a week! And so we brushes away the snow
and makes a fire in the top! and near the stump under the
trunk, makes a comfortable bed out of chunks and brush
wood: and then I goes to the fire and sits down to cook
my duck.
But, I dad, if I could help thinking about our cabin and
every time I think of Nancy!I; but I know'd there
was a divine Providence and a heavenly Fatherand so I
prayed, and then eat one half of my duck, keeping the
other; as game was mighty skerse and no human beings
was in that direction till I struck the Blue Fox. And then,
making a little fire near my bed for my feet, and kivering
my powder-horn with a hankerchief to put under my head
for fear of damp and sparks, I raps up in the ole-camlit,
and laid down, and was soon fast asleep.
Well, after a while I gits to dreaming I was lost in a
prararee, and that the grass had tuck fire, and that I was a
kind of suffocated and scorch'd;and I dreamed I heerd the
awful roaring of flames, and seen a burning whirlwind
coming
towards me, and that so sker'd me that I woke right up
and, I dad! as I'm a livin man! if the woods all around me
wasn't as light as day! And my tree was all a living
blaze and burning splinters was tumblin on my ole camlit!
ay! and my cotton hankerchief round my powder-horn
was jist beginning to smoke and scorch!I dad! my
friends and bruthrin(Here, uncle T. insensibly glided
into his preaching tone and manner)but this was a most
murrakulous dream!! and show'd the nature of Providence
and his careor I'd 'a soon been burnt to death or blow'd
up! And I didn't sleep no morebut kneeled down and
thank'd God for the deliverance; and then kept sitting
near the fire till day, and then I once more started for the
river.
Howsomever, to make a long story short, I walked on
and on the live-long blessed day, and never heerd or seen
a living crittur; and I never came to any riverbut at
night I comes to a log that had been chopp'd off and this
give me courage. And so I makes a fire, and eats now the
other half of my duckfor I was somehow sartain I'd find
a settlemint in the morning. Well, I slept the second
night along side this log, and by daybreak I jumps up and
feels something a kind of moving in my old camlitand, I
dad! if it wasn't a snake what the fire had smoked out of
the log and what had crept into me to be warm! But I only
shook out the reptile and never killed him, thinking only of
some settlemint(although it was the
snake
, brother John
told about, that made me think of my adventure)for the
sarcumstance of the chopp'd log satisfied me, some was
near, as it was no tommyhawk cut, but was done with a
white man's axe. Well, I starts off puttee considerable
peert and brisk, considerin I was weak, and, all at once, as
I'm a livin man, if I didn't hear a bark! And so I stops
and listensand there was anotherand anotherand I
was sartain it wasn't no fox or wolf but a dogand then, I
dad! if I didn't streak off that way like greased lightnin!
and begun and holler'd and fired!and the dog bark'd
louder and louder, and kept on coming nearer and
nearer
!
and I a running and a hollerin till all at once right in
sight of me wasa human cabin!! If I live a thousand
years,(and none of us, my bruthren will live half that
long,)I'll never forget that momentand if ever I thank'd
God with a rale sinserity-heart, 'twas then. But while I
was reconsiderating whose settlemint it was, for things
looked a kind of familiar, the dog what had kept on barkin,
now bust out of the bushes, a yelpin and a prancin around
me!and why do you think?because the poor feller had
found his lost masterand it was Nancy's little dog Ruff!
And would you believe it?my eyes was suddenly opened
like a prophit's, and I found I was on my own trampin
ground, and the cabin was ours!and there stood my dear
child Nancy, a lookin our way out of the cabin door! I
dad! if I didn't snatch up Ruff and kiss him!and the poor
little crittur(he's dead now!)lick'd my face with his
tongue!and in that way I run over to Nancy.(Here
the emotion of the old man and the agitation of his wife
made a momentary pauseit was, indeed, as solemn as
church.)Well, after all was explained and illusterated,
we kneel'd down and thank'd God: and then Nancy, she
told how she thought I was killed and then maybe only lost,
till she was jist goin to start for the next settlemint; and if
I'd a come ten minits later, she'd been off after help!
So that's one of my scrapes; and it illusterates the
fiillosofee that makes a man keep going round and round
when he's lost; for albeit I must a walked more nor fifty
mile in the two days, I wasn't never over seven mile from
the cabin; and that's the pond where the duck was;and
when I come back agin, I didn't know at fust my own cabin
nor the chopp'd log, though I'd cut down the tree myself.
And
Here dinner was fortunately announced; for nothing else
then
could have stopped Uncle Tommyand we
weddeners
had a lucky escape from a long sermon on Providence;
Uncle Tommy greatly delighting in improvements, and
speretilizing his adventures, and, indeed, all other
matters
,
and usually winding up his land-yarns with notes and
practical observations, in the manner of Henry and Scott.
The truth is we were half starved, and had very natural
hankerings after beggarly elementscarnal meats and
drinks, and such like observances.
The dinner table was set in the diagonal of the room, and
could accommodate about thirty persons; but as our
company
was twice that number, we were to eat twice. As
usual the new married persons were seated at one end, and
the groomsman and bridesmaid at the other: and then were
seated all the married men, and after that as many as
possible
of the married women; preference on such occasions
being shown to the worthier gender.
[11]
[11]
This is according to a rule of Latin grammar.
This inversion of
the matrimonial chord arises mainly from the fact, that out
there women reserve themselves to attend to the table; and,
therefore, when the set up is ordered, the gentlemen
instantly seat themselves alongside, and partly under the
table. Sheepish young chaps usually hang back, however
hungry, and say, Oh! there's no 'casion: after which
they give an acquiescing cough or two, or more commonly
go to the door, and give a twang with the nose and finger
instrument, (in place of fashionable phrases,) and then drop,
as if shot down, into a seat, jerking the seat under the table,
till the mouth comes to its level, and is thus fixed for
convenient
feeding.
All Glenville had a seat at the first table, except John
Glenville, who, partly out of policy, but much more out of
true and gentlemanly feeling, preferred coming with the
young people to the second table. And when the company
were fixedand fixed it was till one could barely stir a hand
or footUncle Tommy asked a blessing; when he made
amends for a long story by a very short prayer. But even
in that prayer, which certainly lasted no longer than two
minutes, he contrived, among other things, to ask a blessing
on the young folks, praying especially, for them as had
jist been married, according to the divine appintment in the
gardin of Edin, that they might both of them live to a good
old age, and be fruitful and multiply and replenish the earth,
and see their children's children to the third and fourth
gineration, and that other young folks present might soon
settle and have families, and become an honour and a
blessin in their day and gineration.
Many young gentlemen of the second table waited on
us of the first table, and among them John Glenville:
and this was taken so kindly, that before we went home
declarations were heard about taking him up for the
legislature
,
fall come a yeara hint not lost on us, and of which
more hereafter. I am sorry the reader can only taste our
goodies
in imagination; and yet are we cruel enough to let
him see what he lost.
And first, notice, all eatables, from the egg to the apple,
were on our table at once. Thus a single glance disclosed
what amount of labour was expected:our
whole
work was
there, and no other jobs of eating by way of appendix. Nor
were we plagued with changing knives, whipping on and
away of plates, and brushing or removing cloths; no, no, we
kept right dead ahead with the work from the start to the
finish; the sole labour of the attendants being to keep the
plates chuckfull of something, and ours, to eat! eat! eat!
The dishes next. First, then, and middlemost, an
enormous
pot-pie, and piping hot, graced our centre,
overpowering
,
with its fragrance and steam, the odours and vapours of
all other meats: and pot-pie was the wedding dish of our
Purchase, par excellence! The pie to-day was the doughy
sepulchre of at least six hens, two chanticleers, and four
pullets, if it be logical to reason upward from legs and
wings to bodies! What pot could have contained the pie
is inconceivable, unless the one used for tarrifying the
barr. Why, among other unknown contributions, it must
have received one half peck of onions! And yet it is
to be feared that they who came after us were potpieless;
for potpie is the favourite, and woodsmen sharp set are
awful
eaters.
Around the pie were wild turkeys, (tame enough now,)
with wonderful necks stretched out in search of their heads,
and stupendous limbs and wings ready for flight, the instant
the head should be discovered, or heard from! The poor
birds, however, were so done, over and under too, that all
native juices were evaporated, and the flesh was as dry as
cork: but by way of amends quarts of gravy were
judiciously
emptied on our plates from the wash-basin-bowls.
That also moistened the stuff'nin, composed of Indian
meal and sausages.
These two were the grand dishes: but sprinkled and
scattered about were plates of fried venison, fried turkey,
fried chicken, fried duck, fried pork, and, for any thing I
could know, even fried leather; for so complete and
impartial
the frying, that distinctive tastes were obliterated,
and it could only be guessed, by the shape, size, legs, &c.,
which was what, and the contrary.
But who can tell of the sasses? for we had biled
petaturs
!and
smashed petaturs!and petatursis!
i. e. potatoes rolled into balls as big as marbles, and baked
brown. And there were bil'd ingins!fried ingins!
and ingins out of this here pie! Yes, and beets of
all known colours and unknown tastes!all pickled in
salt and vinegar and something else! And there were
pickled cucumbers, as far as salt and water could go; and
punkun-butter!and punkun-jelle!and corn bread
in all its glory!
Scientifically inserted and insinuated among the first
course, was the second; every crevice and space being
wedged up: and had the plates and saucers been like
puzzle-maps
,
no table cloth would have been visible through the
interstices. And fortunate! the table itself was strong and
masculine; otherwise it must have been crushed under the
combined weight of elbows and dishes! This second
course was chiefly custard; and that stood in bowls and
teacups of cadaverous white, encircled by unknown flowers.
A pitcher of milk was gracefully adorned by the artist with
the pattern of an entrail, taken doubtless out of some school
book on physiology. But we had also custard-pies! and
made with both upper and under crusts! And also maple
molasses, (usually called them 'ere molassisis,) and
preserved
apples, preserved water mellon-rinds, and preserved
red peppers and tomatoesall termed, for brevity's sake,
(like words in Webster's dictionary,) 'sarves.
A few under crusts, or shells, were filled with stewed
peaches and apples; an idea borrowed by Susan from
Glenville
:
but so much was this like conformity to the pomps
and vanities of life, that the careful mother had that very
morning rebuked her daughter, and earnestly advised her
not to take to quality ways, but naturally bake pies
with uppermost crust's. And yet Mrs. Ashford soon got
over her miff, and, won by the marked and
uncondescending
attention paid to her daughter and her daughter's husband
by us, she was heard not long after the rebuke to say
Well, arter all, they're a right down clever sort of folks,
and that 'are Mr. Carltin is naterally addicted to fun.
Among the curiosities were the pound cakes, as
numerous
as apple dumplings, and about as large. These were
compounded of some things found in pound cakes every
where, and of some not found, maple sugar being, evidently
from the taste, the master ingredient; but their shape
that was the beauty! All were baked in coffee-cups! and
after being disencupped, each was iced all over, till it looked,
for all the world, exactly like an ill-made snow ball! The
icing, or snowing, was a composition of egg, starch, and a
species of double-rectified maple sugar, as fine and white
as table salt.
In addition to all these matters tea and coffee were
severally
handed, while the girls in attendance asked each
guestDo you take sweet'nin? If the reply was
affirmative
the same sized spoonful was put into every sized cup;
and then, to save you the trouble, the young lady stirred the
beverage with her own fair hand, and with as much energy
and good will as if she was mixing molasses and water.
Now, we do hope no reader will think we of Glenville
turned up our noses at all this. No, no, verily; but we eat
as much and as long, laughing, talking, joking all the time
too, as if native born. As for Mr. Carlton, he stuck mainly
to pot-pie, the marbled-potatoes, the custard and the maple
molasses; which last, by the way, is indeed as superior to
all far east and down east molasses and syrups as cheese is
to chalk.
The eventful day was, however, now closing, and some
had already taken French leave, while many were rigging
their horses for departure: hence we also began
assembling
our party to go homeward. But at the request of
some young fellows, who offered to catch Dick and see the
gals home, we left our helps, to have some fun after
the graver people should be gone away. About a dozen
volunteer groomsmen and bridesmaids remained to see it
out; viz. to torment Susan and Joseph: but Mrs.
Ashford
,
a very watchful and discreet woman, told us
afterwards
,
she took care to stop all goins on, and made ev'ry
livin soul and body of 'em go to bed an hour before herself
and her old man went.
A different but no less effectual preventive was used by
another new-married couple in the Purchase, where we had
the honour of an invitation. The loft had been assigned
as the bridal chamber, the sole access to which was a light
ladder; and up this some of the weddeners intended to
steal and upset the bed of the sleepersbut alas! for the
fun!the groom, in anticipation of the favour, it was found,
had drawn up the ladder!
CHAPTER XX.
Parva leves capitant animos.
Various, that the mind of desultory man.
The
ladies of Glenville, in addition to various other
matters
,
paid special attention in the winter to needle-work:
and that was bestowed on gowns, coats, overalls,
inexpressibles
,
and in short, on the whole tribe of unmentionables;
and also on various tasteful and fancy articles. In the
kitchen was a loom, not for laces, but for measuring out,
yard after yard of tow-linen and Kentucky jeans; and on
this piano
forte
our ladies played many a merry tune, the
burden of which was our days are swifter than a weaver's
shuttle; which yet proved that a short span is rendered
pleasant by a swift shuttle. Indeed, in our circumstances,
the use of the
treadles
was more important than the use of
the
pedals
.
Our ladies this winter spent much time in reading: and,
not a little in longing after the flesh-pots of Egypt! And
yet there was much in the wild and rough wilderness;
much in the men and women of the woods, so in contrast
with the culture of the city, that when the novelty passed,
and we had time to reflect that in our day the neighbours
could never be like us, nor we like themthat we were
tolerated, rather than cherishedand were far away from
sympathyit was then that we seemed to awake to a sad
and bitter remembrance of the pastyes, and that past in
no way, to some of us, ever to be restored, to be revisited!
In the far east were the graves of
their
fathers!(the
graves of
mine
, I cannot find) for the Seymours were
ancient
,
and in their day men of substance and renown.
And Indians are not the only ones that love to linger among
the graves of their fathers: not the only wanderers that
see in vision the swelling mounds over their dead, and see,
with melting hearts and dimming eyes! Mournful world!
before we left the woods, graves of ours had consecrated
two lonely spots in the wilds, and our dust was
comming-ling
with the dust of the red men: so that lonely now
amid the graves in the east, we here sigh and weep for
the graves in those western solitudes!
As for myself, this winter, I made the closet for Carlton's
study, and the one in Bishop Hilsbury's cabin; also two
skuttles for the loom, one too light however, the other, too
heavy: and I aided in putting in and taking out a
piece, becoming thus adept in the mysteries of woof
and warp, of hanks, reels and cuts. I mended likewise,
water sleds, hunted turkeys, missed killing two deer for
want of a rifle, played the flute, practised the fiddle, and ever
so many other things and what-nots. But my grand
employment
was a review of all my college studies; and hence,
I was the very first man since the creation of the world
that read Greek in the New Purchase! And it was I that
first made the apostles talk out there in their own language!
that first made the primal woods resonant with
Tyture tu patul recubans sub tegmine fagi!
or thunder with Demosthenes! that first addressed the
revereful
trees in the majestic words of Platowords that Jupiter
himself would have used for the same purpose! aye, that
first taught those listening trees the names of the Hebrew
and Chaldaic alphabets, or made them roar like the sea with
the poluphlosboio thalasses! And, hence from the renown
of all this, I was finally made a trustee of the State
College
at Woodville; which appointment afterwards brought
me into contact with some adventures, to be narrated in
their proper place. The appointment, however, was not
given till Mr. J. Glenville took his seat in our legislature
in 182.
Our evenings were devoted to cracking nuts and jokes,
visiting uncle Tommy, and Bishop H., to planning, to
hearing adventures or reading aloud; but, as it was not
possible
to have a centre-table, the grand family lamp was
suspended
in the centre of the parlour; and then around this
we either all sat as an Iceland family, or raising the
carpetbarriers
,
we lolled on the nearest beds in couch and sofa,
and ottoman style.
The lamp in its primitive times was a patty-pan; but
having spent its youth in different sorts of hot ovens, its
tin had entirely shone out, and nothing remained save the
oxydated iron; yet, to this it owed its present elevated
station in Glenvillehumility before exaltation! In the
edges were three holes punched with a tenpenny nail, and
into these were put and fastened three several wires, which
united eighteen inches above the patty-pan, were joined by
a strong twine, tied to a hook in a pole: and then the whole
affair, when released from the hand, could, and did swing
with a very regular irregularity over the middle parlour.
The illuminator filled with lard or bear's oil,
[12]
[12]
We of Glenville burned lard many years prior to the late
discoveries
in swine light.
and supplied
with a piece of cloth for wick, was touched with flame
from a burning brand; and then away it blazed in glory,
filling all things, even eyes and noses, with light and soot!
But we soon got used to suffocation; and many were our
pleasant nights around the pendulum lamp, spite of
inconveniences
within, and the cries of prowling beasts without,
or the demon-like shrieks and howls of wintry tempests!
Calm consciences in rude and lone huts bid defiance to
most evils and dangers! Besides, who has not known the
delight of lying in bed under an unceiled roof, and of being
lulled to slumber by the music of a pattering rain! So our
delight arose often from a sense of entire security: and yet
the dangers and evils of the dark and howling wilderness
so near!separated by a slight barrier!
During the day, this winter, I took lessons in axecraft;
for, in addition to the niggering-off,
[13]
[13]
To be described hereafter.
it became
necessary
as the cold increased, to chop off logs, especially as
our fire-place devoured wood at the rate of half-a-cord per
diem. Niggering belongs mainly to very large timber, and
pertains rather to the science of log-rolling than of
preparing
fuel; but chopping is essential to nearly every branch
of a woodsman's life, and must be learned by all who aspire
to respectability and independence.
Awkward indeed, were my first essays, and my strength
inartificially bestowed on every blow, was soon exhausted;
but when we had larned the sling o' the axe, then could
we as easily execute a cord a day, as at first the fourth of
the measure. Nay, we could at last mount a prostrate
beech and take the butt end two feet in diameter: and
then, with feet apart, the exact width of the intended chip,
could we cut away, within one inch of the cowhide boots,
and that neatly and regularly all the way to the centre:
and then, turning round, accomplish the same on the other
side, till cuttings matched and almost met, when we would
make the final and flourishing cut, and then in a moment
lay two logs out of one!
But oh! the way Tom Robison could flourish the axe!
And proud am I to call Tom my master; indeed, all
Glenville
were indebted to his lessons. Tom was a fellow of
gigantic proportions, longer than six feet three inches, and
with enormous width of breast,about the girth like a
columnar beech. He had also legs and arms to match.
His face was as mild as a full moon's, and nearly as big,
and in temper he was as good-natured and harmless as a
chubby baby! Tom rarely bragged; although he could
shoot well, drive wagon well, ride horses wild and tame,
and walk as fast and nearly as far as an elephant: still he
would boast a little about his chopping, being indeed as an
axeman, the envy and admiration of all that part of the
Purchase. Oh! I do wish we could paint Tom's smile of
benevolent scorn as he took the axe from my awkward
hands, to larn me the sling! when he saw me puffing at
every ineffectual blow, striking every time in a new place,
till a little weak amorphous chip was at long last haggled
out with hashed edgesit was really sublime.
Jeest
[14]
[14]
Jist
becomes
jeest
, and
little, leetle
out there, when tenderness and
affection or dimunition, &c., is to be designated.
do it
so
like, Mr. Carltina sort a hold your
left hand here, allowin you're goin to strike right hand
licks; and your tother hand so fashin, a toward the helf
but a sort a loose: then swing the axe out so, lettin the
loose hand run up agin tother this awayand here Tom's
axe finished the sentence or speech by gleaming down and
burying itself nearly to its back in the log: but next instant it
was again quivering in the air, and changing its direction was
gleaming and burying itself as at first, till out leaped elastic
chips light as a feather, although these chips were twelve
inch eslong, and two thick! And then the log would show
two inclined planes as if wrought with a chisel!and all
the time Tom talking and laughing away, like a fellow
whittling poplar with a dirk-knife. Oh! it was really
delicious
to see such cutting; and it was surprising anybody
should call wood-chopping hard workit was nothing but
cutting butter with a hot knife.
Reader, Tom had actually done in axery, what Horace
pronounces in writing, the prefection of the art, viz.
ravishing
and yet beguiling the reader into an opinion that
he can write as well. Tom therefore was a master. Aye,
the axe in his hand, was like the bow in Paganini'sand
in the Purchase vastly more serviceable. In short, Tom
could cut wood like lightning; and whilst some things can
be done before a fluent tongue (female of course) can say
Jack
Robison, we defy any body to do the same things
before
Tom
Robison could chop a stick off!
We shall now describe our firemaking, not indeed to be
imitated in here to the utter ruin of all moderate fortunes,
but to show the grand scale on which we do even small
matters out there. To build a New Purchase fire, a cabin
must first be builded or built for the fire, with a fireplace,
constituting nearly one whole end of the cabin; then we
must have wood, not by the cord, but by the acre; and
thirdly, we must have active, robust, honest-hearted fellows
to cut and carry in, unless one niggers-off, as some do, and
drags logs into the cabin by horse-power.
The foundation of our fire was laid every day very early
and required all hands. We menhem! we men rose
before sun-up; and then uncle John hauled out the relics of
yesterday's firecoals plenty and livelythe unconsumed
centre of the back-log and chunks of foresticks; while
Glenville and Carlton issued forth to select a new back-log.
This was usually of beech, the greener the better, and about
seven feet long and two in diameter. It was rolled to the
door wth handspikes, where, with the aid of uncle
Johnit
was next rolled, lifted, pushed and coaxed into the
centre
of the parlour: and here we rested and blowed, uttering
between the puffsplaguey heavy! a'most too long!'
and the like. But directly, with a few united efforts the
back-log was rolling and crushing over the coals and soon
lodged with a thundering noise in its bed of hot ashes, and
against the stone back of the inner chimney; we, during
this process, alternately lifting our scorched shins, and then
at the noise of the thunder, nimbly leaping back and rub
bing them; till we could nearly have ventured at last to
try the ordeal of the burning plowshares. The log was
now covered with ashes to prevent too rapid a
consumption
;
and then two delicate andirons in the shape of pig
iron, were pushed by a stick into proper position, being
always, any time in the winter, too hot to be touched with
the hand or even kicked with the foot. In case a cabin has
opposite doors, much labour and many sprains may be
saved and avoided, by tackling a horse to an end of the
backlog
and hauling it into the cabin; it is, however, rather a
slovenly
practice, and used mostly by women in the absence
of the men.
Next in order were the second-story back-log, and the
fore stickequal in length, but different in diameter and
material: the former being of beech and one foot thick, the
latter of sugar tree and about eight inches thick. Each is
often carried by two persons; but still oftener each is
hipped. And hipping is done by one man who has some
strength and more dexterity; who adroitly whips up the
log on his hip, and trots off with it like the youngest
quilldriver
of a shop will do with Miss Troublesome's small
bundle of silk under his arm. These timbers are also
frequently
shoulderedbut I regret to say that a certain friend
of ours when his turn came, used to roll his stick as far
as the door, and then
hitch
it. Hitching is performed by
getting the article on an end (no odds which) and then
working it along by alternate corners: an operation that
impressed on our puncheons numerous indented mementos
of our friend's lazy ingenuity. The
plane
beauty of poplar
or pine floors it would have marred forever! The
puncheons
,
however, thought little of the matter, although they
wriggled and screeched likelikelet's see. Oh! like
all the world!
Meanwhile uncle John carried in brush enough to make
a Jersey load of oven faggots; and the girl, baskets full
of all sized chips, from the Tommyrobison kind down to
the Carlton sort; and so when the upper back-log and
forestick
had been arranged, there were present all the
kindling
and burning materials. An infant sapling, some three
inches thick, lay between the back log proper and the
forestick
,
forming thus a chasm for a bushel of burning coals;
while other coals remained under and above the pile; and
then across the upper coals were placed bits of small trees
intermingled with hot chunks and cold chips, the whole
being
capped and climactirized with a brush heap.
Now issued, first, volumes of smoke, then a spiteful
snap or two, becoming soon, however, a loud and decided
crackling; and then appeared several fierce curly blazes,
white, red, and blue, verifying the vulgar saying about
smoke and fire; till the temperature of things getting to the
scientific pointout burst simultaneously from all parts of
the structure a wide, pure, living, roaring flame chasing
soot-clouds up the stick-chimney, dispersing fire-builders
as far as the carpet barrier, and lighting the interior cabin
with the blaze of a volcano!
Combustion(hem!) was supported during the day on
the most philosophic principles; by supplying
fuel
: not a
small bladder of gas; not even an old fashioned
Philadelphia
iron
fore stick and
stone
black log; but real
backwood's
fuel, chips, brush, bits of saplings and miniature
timber
.
The fire was constructed regularly once only in
twenty-four hours; although some back logs will last
nearly twice that period.
Each firemaker had a tong of green timber an inch
thick and six feet long; hence two persons lifting or
poking
in concert were equivalent to a pair of tongs. Usually
we operated with only one tong; but by dexterity all can
be accomplished with that one, that in here is commonly
done with tongses and shovel to boot. True, our
practice
was incessant; since no man, woman, nor child in the
Vol. I.9
Purchase ever stood, sat, or lay near a fire without
poking
at it! Hence my determined and ineradicable hostility to
a fire of coal, bituminous or anthracitethe thing won't be
poked! And what's a fire for, if it aint to be poked?
Our young woman now, in here, keeps every thing
in the shape of poker, and scraper, and tong, single
or double, out of my way; and, when the grate or stove
needs a little tussling, in comes
she
with some iron article
or other: but always on going out takes the article with
herfor fear Mr. Carlton will spile her fire!!
Bah!don't lecture me about furnaces and flues, and
patent grates and ranges, and no-burns and all-saves, of
this pitiful age! Give me my all-burn and no-save fire of
beech and sugar and chip and brushhand back my tong
let me poke once more! Oh! let me hear and see
once more before I die a glorious flame roaring up a
stick-chimney
!
There let me, on this celebrated cold Thursday,
thermometer two and a half inches below zero, there let
me stand by my cabin fire and be heated once more
through and through! Oh! the luxury of lying in bed
and looking from behind our Scotch wall on that fire!
Oh! ye poor frozen, starving wretches of our blind and
horrible alleys, and dark and loathsome cellars; ye, I now
see buying twopenneth of huckstered sticks to heat your
water gruel for one more mouthful before ye die; ye, that
are shivering in rags, begging of that red-faced carter in the
pea jacket a small, knotty, four-foot-stick of sour, sappy
scrub oak just fallen from his cart, to hear it sob, sob, on the
foodless hearth of your dungeon like holes--away! for
heaven's sake, if you starve not before, away! next summer
to the woods!
Go; squat on Congress land! Go; find corn and pork and
turkeys and squirrels and opossums and deer to eat! Go;
and in the cold, cold, cruel winter like to day, you shall sit
and lie and warm you by such a fire!Go; squalid slaves!
beg an axeput outmake tracks for the tall timberGo;
taste what it is to be free! Away!run!leap!and
shoutHurrawaw! the ranges forever!!
CHAPTER XXI.
Thy hounds shall make the welkin answer them,
And fetch shrill echoos from the hollow earth.
We
had this year a very merry Christmas. For first and
foremost we devoted the holidays tohog killing and all
its accompaniments, lard rendering, spare-rib cooking,
sausage
making, and the like. And secondly, our cow Sukey
performed a very wonderful thing in the eating and drinking
line:she devoured a whole sugar trough full of mast fed
rendered lard! The blame, at first, attached to Dick; but
he could clearly prove an alibi, and besides Sukey had very
greasy chops, and got horrid sick, as much so as she had
swallowed a box of Quackenborg's pills: and when she
did again let us have milk it was actually oily! And then,
thirdly, there was aunt Kitty's mishap about the sausages.
Aunt Kitty was intended by nature for a dear delightful
old maid; and she greatly mistook her vocation by
marrying
,
although nothing but her being a great favourite with
the beaux of the last century hindered the fulfilment of her
destiny. She was the most amiable and kind hearted
womanbut a
lee le
too modest; so that, in her
circumlocutions
and paraphrases to get round the tough places of
plain English, she often made us uneasy lest she stump, or,
perhaps light on some unlucky word or phrase worse than
the one she shyed at. She denominated the chanticleer
chickbidde--or, he-biddeor, old-rooster; and the
braying
gentleman she styled--donkey; although she would
venture as far asJack. Ancle, with her, was any part
from the knee downward, and limbs were of course, her
what-y' callums. She milked the cow's dugs, and
greased
,
not her bag, but herudder. From all which it maybe
conjectured what ingenious contrivances in strange cabins
were necessary before Aunt Kitty could get into bed or out
of it: indeed, setting all backwood scorn and ridicule at
defiance, she would take the very coverlet and fork it up for
a curtain!
Well, Aunt Kitty called things prepared for the reception
of sausages,
skins;
and so this Christmas having prepared
the skins by the scraping process, she laid them away in
salt and water till the stuffing was to take place; but when
the hour for that curious metamorphose of putting swine
into
their own skins came, behold! the skins could not be
found--
What! had Dick devoured them?
Oh! no,the girl had accidentally thrown them all
away. And this, indeed, was too bad; and no housekeeper
can blame Aunt Kitty for being greatly provoked: but alas!
for delicacies, anger permitted no choice of words:
(and by that it may be seen
how
angry Aunt Kitty was;) for
on learning the cause and manner of the irreparable loss
she exclaimed:--
Why, you carelessyou! Have you really gone and
thrown out all my gts! that I was keeping for skins!!
Fourthly, we had a deer hunt, not only somewhat
remarkable
in itself, but memorable for the change it caused
in the relations of Brutus and Csarthe dogs of Glenville.
Of these, Brutus was the elder, and hence, though smaller
and weaker, he managed to govern Csar: proof that
among brutes opinion has much to do with mastership and
reverence. An intimate acquaintance with old Dick and
the two canine gentlemen has unsettled my early theories
about instinct and reason: and as to the first-named worthy,
the theory that the power of laughing is distinctive of
human beings much be received with limitation; for Dick,
if he never indulged in a rude boisterous horse-laugh,
could and did most decidedly and repeatedly
grin
and that
is all some very sober and sensible persons ever attain to.
As to the others, Brutus had possession of the premises
before Csar was even a whelp; and though only Csar's
foster-sire, he had trained him in his puppyhood in all the
arts of doggery; showing him how to worry infant pigs,
then saucy shoats, and finally true hogs, and without
regard of size or sex. He taught him how to chase
poultry, and suck eggs; how to hang at a cow's tail and
yet avoid both horn and heel; how to hunt squirrels,
opossums
and racoons; and how even to shake a venomous
snake to death and not be bit. And to his indefatigable
care and example was owing the loss of our original
bacon-skin
hinges, and the ruin of sundry raw hides.
But when the cold meat, or potatoes, or buttermilk, &c.,
was set out in the dogs' sugar-trough, how instructive the
dignity of Brutus as he walked up solus, and with no
ravenous
and indelicate haste to eat his fill! And how
revereful
the mammoth and lubberly Csar, standing at a
distance till his step-father had finished and retired! C
sar, when very hungry or smelling something extra, would
indeed crawl up with an imploring eye and piteous whine:
but then the awful look and cautionary growl he
received
from the wiser dog, sent him away in a moment with
a trailed tail and even to a greater distance than ever!
And yet Csar was equal in strength and size to one
Brutus
and a half! Carlyle's theory of opinion, must be
extended
to dogs: and our deer hunt will confirm it.
One day during Christmas week Uncle John went a
hunting
.
About two o'clock, however, he returned, having
wounded a deer a mile beyond our clearing, and wishing
after dinner(now on the table)to take the two dogs
to put on its trail; when we should soon find the deer
and in all probability dead. Accordingly, on reaching the
spot, and blood being here and there visible, the dogs were
placed on the trail, and we soon came in sight of the poor
deer. It was not dead, as had been conjectured, but was
lying down sorely wounded, on a little island in the creek,
hoping there, after baffling pursuit by the intervening
water, to sob away its life unseen and undisturbed by its
relentless enemies! Poor creature! mere accident led us
to look towards its retreat; where, alarmed, it had
incautiously
moved, and no moving thing ever is unseen by the
wary and stationary hunterand then, at our shouts, up
sprang the terrified animal, wounded, but bounding away as
though unharmed! And away in pursuit leaped the
yelping
dogs; but in the excitement Csar, forgetful of all
reverence
,
in the lead.
Following the uproar, I ran up on this side the creek
about two hundred yards; and then the deer was seen
recrossing
the water a few rods higher, Csar close on the
flank, the most noble Brutus panting far enough in the rear!
The poor hunted victim, blind and expiring, staggered in
its last agony towards my station; and then, as Csar leaped
to seize its throat, it fell stone dead at my feet; for the
rifle ball had passed nearly through its body, and the
chase had happily but accelerated death. The two
brothers, for Uncle Tommy had joined us, now came up;
and then, the feet of the dead deer tied in pairs, and a
sapling
,
cut and prepared with a tomahawk, inserted
longitudinally
under the thongs, we shouldered our prey and
marched homeward triumphant:i. e. we three rationals
and the now opinionated and consequential Csar, who (or
which?) strutted near, every few paces leaping up
and smelling at the carcass. But Brutus, the
hitherto
lord of the woods and clearing, alas! dejected,
lagged away behind, both crest fallen and tail fallen! yes,
both, for he hung his head and kept his tail dangling
without
one thriumphant flourish! He evidently felt his
importance
lessened, his dignity diminished by such a palpable
and utter naturalnot to say moralinability, to be in at
the death. Yes, opinion was changed! And he saw plain
enough that Csar entertained notions of dog authority now
very inconsistent with peaceable subjectionay! as
different
as when slaves first wake to the full perception of their
powers and rights and opportunities; their masters having
injudiciously allowed them to discover themselves to be
really men and to have souls! Yes, yes, opinion had
changed;and these dogs read it in one another's eyes,
for that very day the instant the entrails of the slain-deer
were thrown out as the dogs' reward, up-rushed the
unceremonious
Csar; and when Brutus tried the experiment
of the old cautionary growl, Csar instead of modestly
retiring
as usual, leaped ferociously upon his venerated
step-father
,
and so bit and gored and pitched and rolled and
tossed him, that away, away ran the elder dog at the first
fair interval howling with rage, vexation and pain! And
ever after that memorable deer hunt Csar continued to
eat at the first trough and Brutus at the second.
Part of the venison fell to Uncle Tommy's share, which
I aided him to take home; and, in return, he insisted on
my spending the evening at his cabinand then the reader
may be sure we had many a long story on hunting; but he
would rather have described the squatteree itself than hear
all our stories and adventures. The squatteree was a cabin
just fourteen feet by ten, and most accurately built of small
round saplings, very much alike in diameter and looks, and
nicely dressed at the corners. It was, indeed, a darling
little miniaturo cabin, and would have done to a tittle for
rabblerousing in the late presidential campaign. Old Dick
could easily have drawn it, and Uncle Tommy, whose heart
was the old General's, would have driven!
A large space inside was occupied by a bed-apparatus
constructed as follows:uprights, at their lower ends, were
nailed to cleets on the floor, and on the uprights were
pegged
a side and foot piece;the logs of the cabin making
unnecessary a second rail and head piece. Next was a
sacking of clapboards pinned down; and then a very thick
straw bed, and over that a sumptuous feather bed; the
whole very comfortable for the good old folks, especially as
Uncle Tommy used to say of themselves, that they were
old and tough.
Opposite the bed stood the bureau; the door opening into
the cabin between the two, and a narrow aisle or passage
being left to the cooking and eating end of the nest.
Adjoining
the bureau was the puncheon table with its white
oak legs; and which served for eating, sewing, reading,
and indeed, all domestic uses; whilst opposite the table,
and at the foot of the bed, were shelves for crockery and
every article of squatter house keeping Over the fire-place
was an extraordinarily wide mantel, sustaining canister
behind
canister and bowl upon bowl and bags, some of linen
and some of paper; and having above itself two racks one
supporting an enormously long duck gun, and the other,
Old Beta black surly looking rifle, with the
appurte-nances
of horns pouches, loaders tomahawks and knives
pendant from the hooks. There hung, also, several pairs
of moccasins, and two sets of leggins: an old pair of green
baize, and a new pair of blue cloth.
Over the table and bureau were shelves, but mainly for
the library. The books were principally books of divinity
and church history, and also of prayer and devotion; but
yet were on the shelves Don Quixotte, Robinson Crusoe,
Paradise Lost Border Tales Cooper's Works, Thomson's
Seasons, and Young's Night Thoughts The bureau top
was consecrated to Bibles and Hymn Books; and here was
piled the famous Scott's Commentary, in five volumes
quarto
,
and so often read, from kiver to kiver! Indeed, from
their appearance, one would almost have judged them to
have been read clean through the kivers!
The neatness, the quiet, the cleanliness, the comfort, the
wild independence of this nest of a cabin;the hunt of the
day;the stories;all, all were so like the dreams of my
boyhood! How happy Uncle Tommy, now more than
seventy years old! and Aunt Nancy, now more than sixty!
Happy in themselves, in one another, in their home, and in
their scriptural hopes of the future life!
But the arrangement for getting water, when the old
lady should be alone, and in wet weather, without leaving
the cabin!that was the nicety. The nest was a few yards
below a beautiful fountain, and over its running stream;
then in the floor a light puncheon was fixed as a trap, so
that with a calabash at the end of a proper pole Aunt Nancy
could dip as from an artificial reservoir!and all without
a water tax!
Our supper to-night was of coffee, corn bread, butter,
eggs, short-cakes, and venison steaks! Yes, venison
steaks!Away with your Astor House, and Merchants'
Hotel, and Dandies' Taverns; if you
do
want to know how
venison steaks
do
tastego to Aunt Nancy! We feel
tempted to give Uncle Tommy's murakalus escape in
fire-hunting! how he levelled his rifle at a beast's eyes,
and found in time it was light streaming through a negro
hut, where, on Christmas eve, the merry rascals were
dancing
away to a cornstalk fiddle and a calabash banjo. But
we must hasten to our
Fifth and last amusement during the holidays. Usually
on the Sabbath we attended our own meeting in the Welden
Settlement; but bad roads and some other accidents often
kept us at home; when our three families assembled at
Uncle John's, where he read the Scriptures, and made or
read a prayer, with occasional help from Uncle Tommy,
9*
while Glenville and Carlton conducted the choir and read
sermons and tracts.
Sometimes, however, we attended meeting at Mr.
Sturgis'
,
out of compliment to our neighbour and Uncle Tommy;
never
, indeed, for fun, although we usually were more
amused than profited; and always came back more and
more convinced that a learned, talented and pious ministry
was, after all,
not
quite so great a curse as many deem it.
But of this the reader may, after reading the ecclesiastical
parts and chapters of this History, judge for himself. And
here we beg leave to affirm that our accounts of certain
sacred
matters is reduced and very much below the truth;
for while truthfulness is important in some writings, if on
these matters ours were truth-
full
, we should hardly be
credited
.
We dare not do our pictures up to life: and hence,
while they are by no means truthless, they are yet less than
the truth.
Neighbour Sturgis, it will be remembered, lived opposite
the tannery, and on the top of a bluff rising from our creek.
Compared with most cabins his was good and spacious;
and to accommodate some pet swine and a flock of tame
geese, openings under his house were left, whither the
favourites
could retire for sleep, or as a retreat from unusual
sun, rain, or wind. Here, whilst swine and geese were
content with their several limits, gruntings and cacklings
were modest and expressive of enjoyment: although joy
itself would often squeal and scream too boisterously for
some congregations. But if wantonness induced either
piggy or goosey to pass the border; or if the dogs playfully
ran in nosing up the pigs, slapping a tail against a strutty
gander or a silly goose, then would the commingled din of
bark, howl, grunt, squawk, squeal and cackle, furnish a
better
answer than the jest book itself to the question, What
makes more moise than a she-swine caught in a gate?
Answer, Old man Sturgis' pet-pen in a riot.
Now, in the room exactly over the pet-pen, meetins was
held! The seats were long benches with very ricketty
limbs, expanded two a piece at each end, and double planks
resting on rude chunksall wishing to obey at once the
great law of gravity, but prevented by their own
inequalities
,
and those of the floor. Hence during sarvice, as
folks were constantly shifting centres of motion and
gravity
,
no despicable noise of chunks and bench-legs was
maintained, in addition to all other noises rational and
instinctive
.
The pulpit was neither marble nor mahogany, being a
tough chair with two upright back pieces like plough
handles
,
and cross bars to suit: and its seat was (or were)
laced hickory withes, and wonderfully smooth and
glistening
from the attrition of linsey garments, tow
inexpressibles
,
and oily buckskin unmentionables. And not
in
, but
behind
this pulpit stood the preacher, placing his hymn
book on its polished seat, and holding on to the two handles
to squeeze by, in his energy or embarrassments. Hence
he never thumped his pulpit in the manner of the Rev.
Doctor Slapfist; but when necessary he raised the pulpit
itself, and with it thumped the floormaking of course just
four times the impression with its four legs that the Doctor
does with his single hand.
The Rev. Diptin Menniwaters usually preached here;
but on New-Year's Sabbath all Glenville went by invitation
to hear a new preacher: although in the Purchase, where
preachers of a sort are plenty as acorns or beach nuts, a
new one frequently held forth, and held on too, greatly to
the wonder of the hearers, and the disturbance of the
pet-pen
,
at our neighbour's of the bluff. The new preacher
today
,
doubtless apprised of the strangers' coming, in order
to create confidence, and ward off any false shame and
unworthy
fear of man, struck off, after prayer and singing,
with an open avowal of enmity to all learning and learned
preachers, thus:
Brethurn and sisturn, it's a powerful great work, this
here preaching of the gospul, as the great apostul hisself
allows in them words of hissin what's jist come into my
mind; for I never know'd what to preach about till I riz up
them words of hissin, `who is sufficient for all these
here things,' as near about as I recollect them.
Thare's some folks--(glancing towards us)
howsomever
,
what thinks preachers must be high larn'd, afore they
kin tell sinners as how they must be saved or be 'tarnally
lost; but it ain't so I allow(chair thumped here and
answered
by a squawk below)no, no! this apostul of ourn
what spoke the text, never rubbed his back agin a collige,
nor toted about no sheepskinsno, never!(thump!
thump! squawk and two grunts.) No, no, dear brethurn
and sisturn(squeak)larnin's not sufficient for them
things; as the apostul says, `who is sufficient for them.'
Oh worldlins! how you'd a perished in your sins if the
fust preachers had a stay'd till they got sheepskins. No!
no! no! I say, gim me the sperit. (Squeals and extra
gruntings in the swine's territory, and more animated
squawks and cackles, as the preacher waxed warmer.)
No! I don't pretend to no larnin whatsomever, but depends
on the sperit like Poll; (squee-e-el:) and what's to hinder
me a sayin, oh! undun worldlins! that you must be saved
or 'tarnally lostyes, lost for ever an dever!(things
below
evidently getting on to their legs and flapping.) No!
no! no! oh! poor lost worldlins. I can say as well as the
best on them sheepskins, if you don't git relijin and be
saved, you'll be lost, teetolly and 'tarnally forever an
dever-ah
!
I know's I'm nuthen but poor Philip, and that I only
has to go by the sperit-ah! but as long as I live, I kin
holler
out: (voice to the word)and cry aloud and spare not,
(squ-aw-awk) O! no, brethurn and sisturn-ah! and al
evin high larn'd folks that's in the gaul, and maybe won't
thank me for it no how-ah! O! ho! o-ah! I poor
Philipah
,
what's moved to cry out and spare not-ah!(sque-e-el;)
what was takin from tendin critturs like David-ah, and
ain't no prophet, nor no son of a prophet-ah. O! ho-o-ah,
how happy I am to raise my poor feeble-ah, dying-ah,
voice-ah, and spendin my last breath, in this here blessed
work; a warnin, and crying aloud; o-ho!-o-ah! repent
repent, poor worldlins and be saved, or you'll all be lost,
and perish for-ever-an-dever-ah.
Here the storm above was getting to its height, although
poor Philip kept on some ten minutes more, waxing
louder
and hoarser, with endless repetitions and strong
aspirations
in a hundred places occasioned by his catching breath,
and which we have several times marked with an -
ah!
[15]
[15]
The more frequent this syllable or such aspiration occurs in a torrent
of boisterous words, the more is the preaching supposed to be from the
heart, and, therefore, inspired: for nobody, it is supposed, would make
such a fool of himself if he could help it.
He also began spanking one thigh with a hand, and
ever and anon battering the floor with his pulpit, until he
was compelled at last to place one hand under his jaw, and
and partly up his cheek to support his jawing tackle.
And, in the meanwhile, the fraternity below, after much
irregular
outcrying, had at length joined all their instruments
and voices, and to so good a purpose as at times nearly to
overwhelm the preacher. Two dogs also, half wolf and
half cur, now presented themselves at the door, and with
elevated brows and cocked ears, stood wistfully looking at
the parson, to know what he wished them to attack or hunt:
but on finding he was not halloing for them, and being now
too excited to be still, away they sprang towards the forest
yelping and howling and determined to hunt for themselves.
And shortly after the first hurricane ending, Poor Philip
hitting a favorite vein, went on with a train of reasoning
(designing to show that native wit was as good as college
logic) about cause and effect: but while he was again
cheered from below in the manner of an English audience
clapping an abolitionist, we shall not, by recording the
applause
,
interrupt the narrative.
Nono: nobody can make nuthin. Thare's only one
what makes, and he made these here woods; he made
these here trees; and them bushes; he made yonders sun
and yonders moonand all them 'are stars what shines
at night in the firmamint above our heads like fires;and
andhe madeyeshe made them powerful big rivers
a runnin down thare to Orleansand the sea, and all the
fishes, and the one what a sorter swallerd the prophit what
was chuck'd out and swallerdandandyesand all
them 'are deer, and them 'are barr, and them hossis what's
tied out thare. (Had Dick been there he would now
unquestionably
have slipped his bridle.) And so you
understand
,
worldlins, how no man could a ever made anything.
And haven't we proof from nater that they was made, and
didn't come as high larn'd folks' sez, and grow of theirselves
out of forty atims by chance.
Nono, worldlins, you couldn't, the most high larn'd
ither, could'nt make any of them thare thingsyou couldn't
make woodsyou couldn't make treesyou couldn't make
fishesno, you couldn't make airthyou couldn't make air
you couldn't make fireyou couldn't makehem!no
you couldn'tmake water. (Sorry are we to record, but
Mr. Carlton here was guilty of sniggering; and even Uncle
John, in spite of his official dignity, did look as if he
would
laugh when meeting was out. Poor Philip, however,
quickly emerged and went on.) Nonot one of you could
make a spring branch nor the like.
Ah! poor Philip had you only had a little of the learning
you despised! Had you, at least, only seen Miss Carbon's
Chemistry for Boarding Schools of Young Ladies! But
did not Philip make us sweat for our sins, for he went on:
Yes! yes! some folks laff in meetin, but wait till they
gits to hl, and maybe they'll laff tother side of their
mouth. The fire down thare's hot, I allow, and will scorch
off folks's ruffles and melt their goold buttins, and the devel
and his angils will pelt them with red hot balls of brimrock
and fire!
But the two dogs had just now returned from an
unsuccessful
hunt, and forthwith they plunged headlong into the pit
below
;
and then, the barking and yelping of the dogs; the
scampering and squealing of the pigs; the flapping of
screaming geese's wings, and the squawking of insulted
ganders, together with the hoarse and continued roaring of
the preacher, produced a tempest rarely equalled in the best
organized fanatical assemblies here, and never surely
excelled
.
And the instant meeting was over, we of Glenville
hurried
away glad to escape from the noise of bedlam and the
almost
papistical curses of poor Philip.
SECOND YEAR.
CHAPTER XXII.
Go to them, with this bonnet in thy hand
Or, say to them
Thou art their soldier, and being bred in broils,
Hast not the soft way, which thou dost confess
Were fit for thee to use, as they to claim.
In asking their good loves; but thou wilt frame
Thyself, forsooth, hereafter theirs, so far
As thou hast power, and person.'
Our
second summer opened with the electioneering
campaign of Mr. Glenville, the
people's
candidate for a seat
in the next legislature. His opponent, in all intellectual
respects, was unqualified for the seat, being destitute of
important
knowledges, void of tact and skill, and having
indeed
for
he had been our representative beforeonly
exposed
himself and us to perpetual ridicule. He could read
and write, and perhaps cipher a little, and therefore, was
all along considered a smart fellow, till it was discovered
we had one in the district, a powerful heap smarter
John Glenville, Esq., of Glenville. For John read without
spelling the hard words, wrote like engraving, and could
kalkilate in his head faster nor Jerry Simpson with
chalk or coal, although Jerry had been a schoolmaster.
And our neighbor Ashford offered to stake five barrels of
corn, thatJohnny was jist the powerfullest smartest
feller
in the hole universal county, and could out sifer Jerry
or any other man all to smash.
Glenville's ability, however, would have prejudiced our
cause, had any doubt existed as to his moral integrity; for,
a bad man out there was very properly dreaded in
proportion
to his cleverness,
[16]
[16]
In the English sense
and therefore, power to harm.
Indeed
,
we always preferred an ignorant bad man to a
talented
one; and hence attempts were usually made to ruin
the moral character of a smart candidate; since unhappily
smartness and wickedness were supposed to be generally
coupled, and incompetence and goodness.
Our opponents, therefore, neither insisted that Jerry was
smarter than John, nor attacked John's character: but they
contended that Jerry could do no harm if he did no
good, but that John could if he would, and would if he
took a bad turn; also, that Jerry had been tried once and
did no harm, but that John had never been tried and so no
one could exactly tell what he would be till he was tried.
To this was answered, that Jerry could do no good if he
would, and had often voted so as to keep others from doing
us any good, and so had prevented good if he had done no
evil; that John if able to do harm, was also able to do good,
and as he had never done harm in private life, it was
reasonable
to believe he would do none in public life; and
that as Jerry had had a trial and did no good, so John ought
to have one too, and if he did harm, we could send Jerry
the year after.
John was then attacked on the score of pride and
aristocracy
;
and, as usual, all the sins of his family were laid
at Glenville's door, especially his sisters' rufflesour metal
buttonsthe carpet wall; and above all, Carlton's
irreverent
sniggering in meeting. But then, most who had met
us at Susan Ashford's wedding said we warnt so stuck
up as folks said; and that mammy Ashford herself thought
it was not a bit proud to have a carpet wall, or the like,
and that Mr. Carltin was a right down clever feller,
powerful
funny, and naterally addicted to laffin. And to crown
all, Mr. Ashford himself, and belonging to poor Philip's
sect, publicly avowed that he hisself had actially laff'd in
meetinfor the water came so sudden likeonly he kept
his face kivered with his hat, and nobody hadn't seen
him.
The enemy then affirmed that Glenville himself had
laughed: but he procured certificates from every body at
church to this point that nobody had
seen
or
heard
John
Glenville laughing; and these were read wherever Jerry's
party had made the charge.
[17]
[17]
However, since it can do no harm now, Glenville
did
laugh; but
nobody either
saw
or
heard
him but myselfand of course I did not
sign any certificate.
For any silly charge, if
uncontradicted
out there, and
maybe
in heredefeats an
election
:
either because the charge is deemed an offset against
the candidate, or people like to see their candidate in
earnest
,
and his rebutting allegations looks like zeal for their
interest, and shows a due sense in his mind of popular
favour. Beside, if one neglect a trifling charge, his
enemies
will soon bring larger and more plausible ones
whereas his alertness scares them.
At last it was boldly alleged that John
would
have
laughed if he had not expected to be a candidate! But to
this it was triumphantly replied that Jerry
would
have
laughed if he had been at meetinfor Squire Chippy and
Col. Skelpum gave two separate certificates, that Jerry
Simpson
had
laughed when he heard tell of it!! Hence
poor Philip's sermon was celebrated over all our district;
and everywhere was spoken and even spouted the
sentence
no one couldn't make airth, and so through all
the four old-fashioned chemical elements: till all men were
ashamed to bring even against poor Carltin a charge,
to which all plainly showed, if they had been at meeting,
they would have been equally liable themselves. And so
our party triumphed over what once seriously threatened
to defeat us.
The price of liberty, eternal vigilance, is well paid in a
New Purchase. With us it was watched by all classes,
and throughout the year: it was indeed the universal
business
.
Our offices all, from Governor down to a deputy
constable's deputy and fence-viewer's clerk's first assistant,
were in the direct gift of the people. We even elected
magistrates
,
clerks of court, and the judges presiding and
associate
!
And some who knew better, yet for
rabblerousing
purposes, gravely contended that trustees of colleges,
and all presidents, professors, and teachers should be
elected directly by the people!
Our social state, therefore, was for ever in ferment; for
ever was some election, doing, being done, done or going to
be done; and each was as bitterly contested as that of
president
or governor. In all directions candidates were
perpetually
scouring the country with hats, saddle-bags, and
pockets crammed with certificates, defending and accusing,
defaming and clearing up, making licentious speeches,
treating to corn whiskey, violating the Sabbath, and
cursing
the existing administration or the administration's wife
and wife's father! And every body expected at some
time to be a candidate for something; or that his uncle
would be; or his cousin, or his cousin's wife's cousin's
friend would be: so that every body, and every body's
relations, and every body's relations' friends, were for ever
electioneering, till the state of nasty, pitiful intrigues and
licentious slanders and fierce hostility, was like a rotten
carcass where maggots are, each for himself and against
his neighbour, wriggling and worming about!
Men were turned into mutual spies, and watched and
treasured and reported and commented upon, looks, words
and actions, even the most trifling and innocent! And we
were divided, house against house! and man against man;
and settlements, politically considered, were clannish and
filled with animosity. The sovereign people was, indeed,
feared by the candidate who truckled to-day, and most
heartily despised when he ruled to-morrow.
The very boys verging on manhood were aware of their
future political importance; and even several years before
voting, they were feared, petted, courted and cajoled,
becoming
of course conceited, unmannerly and disrespectful. Their
morals were consequently often sadly hurt; and boys then
voted fraudulently. Standing either
over
the No. 21 pasted
in the shoe or
between
No. 21 in the hat, and No 22 in
the shoe, they would sometimes deliberately swear, when
challenged as to age that they were over 21, or
between
21
and 22!! Such depraved lads, destitute of reverence, will
talk loud and long and confidently, in any company
contradicting
and even rebuking their bettersand all the time a
rabblerouser
[18]
[18]
New Purchase name for a demagogue.
affects to listen and admire such firmness
and independence of spirit!! Get out! you scornful puppy!
and do not prate to me about religious cant; can any thing
come up to the cant and whine of a selfish, godless
rabblerouser
?
And dare such a one say that evangelical
missionaries
are not safer guides, and better friends to the
people thanHe? Out with you, atheist.
We had of course in the Purchase a passion for
stump-speeching
.
But recollect, we often mount the stump only
figuratively: and very good stump-speeches are delivered
from a table, a chair, a whiskey barrel, and the like.
Sometimes
we make our best stump speeches on horse-back. In
this case, when the horse is excited by our eloquence, or
more commonly by mischievous boys, more
action
goes
with the speech than even Demosthenes inculcatedoften
it becomes altogether circumambulatory.
Once a candidate stood near the tail of Isam Greenbriar's
ox cart at Woodville, when some of his opponents,(
perhaps
some of his own friends, for the joke was tempting)
noiselessly drew out the forward pins, when at the most
unexpected instant, ay, in the very climax of his most
ferocious effervescence, Mr. Rhodomontade was canted
into the dirt!
Again, our candidate for fence-viewer, with some half
dozen friends, was once hard at work with certificates and
speeches in Sam Dreadnought's wagon; when Sam,
having
several miles to drive before dark, and having already
waited two good hours for matters to end, suddenly leaped
on his saddle horse, and then, at a word and a crack,
away dashed the team loaded with politics, very much to
the amusement of the people, but much to the discomfiture
of our candidate.
Nothing surpasses the munificent promises and at the
same time the external and grovelling humility of a genuine
rabblerouser, just before an election. He shakes hands
with every body, friend and foe; he has agents to treat at
his expense at every doggery;
[19]
[19]
New Purchase term for a grog shop or low tavern.
and in his own person he
deals out whiskey and gingerbread, as we have seen, to a
long line of
independent
voters marching past him with
drum and fife to the polls; and he drinks out of any
drunken vagabond's bottle, laughing at his beastly jokes,
putting his arm round his filthy neck, and allows himself
thus to be slobbered upon, while patting the brute on the
back and being patted in turn!
Yet have we noble gentlemen who, when candidates,
are courteous indeed, but who will not do base things, nor
make absurd and wicked promises, and who when defeated
back out with manly scorn of licentious opponents. One
such high minded individual in order to show the folly of
great promises, came out the year after a defeat, saying he
had altered his purposes, and now was a candidate again,
and would if elected exert his utmost efforts to force the
legislature
to abolish the fever and ague, and to pass a bill
to find a gold mine on every poor man's quarter section.
I forgot whether he was now elected; but he deserved
to be.
Glenville, though full of tact, was independent; although
we did give credit for kip and neats-leather, even where it
was doubtful whether our political friends would pay, and
bought raw hides at higher prices than were paid at
Spiceburgh
and Woodville. And Glenville did submit to, or rather
he could not prevent a party with him in a canoe from
upsetting
the boat in the middle of Shining River; and who
thus gave the candidate what they called apolitical
baptising
:
but whilst this was no dry joke, our friend still, on
swimming to land with the others, joined in the laugh.
This too was a fair type of his immersion into the troubled
waters of political life; and the way he endured the
ducking
so established his reputation above Jerry's, that at the
ensuing election a few weeks after, Mr. G. was successful
by a clean majority of 171 votes!
Politicians, even in here, I am informed, are also very
frequently immersed and into
puddles;
from which they
rarely ever do flounder out, and when they do, it is said,
they look nasty and soiled, and have dirty ways, all the rest
of their lives! But maybe the less said on this point the
sooner mended; and therefore, as Mr. Glenville is now
the people's man, the world expects his history, and we
proceed to treat of the same in three chapters.
CHAPTER XXIII.
I'll read you matter deep and dangerous,
As full of peril, and advent'rous spirit,
As to o'erwalk a current, roaring loud,
On the unsteadfast footing of a spear.
Mr. Glenville
was about my age, or rather I was about
his age; or to be as definite as a down east school book, we
were both about the same age, and were born in A. D. 179;
and hence have already lived part of two centuries,
being as old as the current century added to the fraction of
the other.
He was born, and educated for some years, in
Philadelphia
.
His principal teacher was Mr. Moulder, who
superintended
an old-fashioned orthodox
quaker
school; in
which morals were far better and more successfully
cultivated
than in modern
quackery
schools, where morals is
made a
separate
matter. And in this primitive school John
imbibed much of the Yea and Nay in his character, or his
right-up-and-downedness; a compound conducing greatly
to his safety and happiness in the strifes, dangers and
perplexities
of the wilderness. He had been destined to the
counting house, but the removal of his friends to the west,
changed his destiny; and hence, being a good elementary
mathematician and well acquainted with theoretical
surveying
,
he was invited by Gen. Duff Green, then of Kentucky,
to accompany a party to the Upper Missouri as assistant
surveyor; which invitation was accepted.
This suited our hero's love of adventure and gave an
opportunity
of seeingthe world. Not the world as seen by
a trip to Paris or London, but the world natural and proper;
the world in its native convexity, its
own
ravines and
mountains
,
its virgin soil, its primitive wilds, its unworn
prairies
!
To float in birch-bark canoes on the swelling bosom of
free waters!waters never degraded with bearing loads of
merchandise, or prostituted in a part diverted to turn mills,
or fill canals, or in any way to be a slave, and then to be let
go discoloured with coal, or saw dust, or flour, or dyestuffs,
marks of bondagethat they may hurry away, sullen and
indignant to hide their dishonoured waves in the ocean!
He went to see the world as the Omnipotent made it and
the deluge left it! He went to hear the thunder-tramp of
the wild congregationsthe horse and the buffalo,
shaking
the prairie-plains that heaved up proud to bear on their
free heart the untamed, free, bounding, glorious herds! He
went to look at the sun rising and setting on opposite sides
of one and the same field; and where the rain-bow spans
half a continent and curves round the terrestrial semicircle!
He went to see the smoke of a wigwam! where death flies
on the wing of a stone headed arrow, and the Indian is in
the drapery of untouched forests and midst the fragrance of
the ungardened, many coloured, ever-varied flowers!
What change from the smokes and smells of a city!the
outcry, war, confusion of its anxious, crowded, jostled,
envious
,
jealous, rivalous population!its contrasts of moneyed
consequence and povertysmitten dependence!its rolling
vehicles of travelling ennui, and hobbling crutch of rheumatic
beggary!and its saloons of boisterous mirth adjoining the
sad enclosure of silent tombstones! Oh! the change
from dark, damp, stifling pent holes of alleys and courts,
where filth exhales its stench without the sun!to walk
abroad, run, leap, ride, hunt and shout, amid the unwrought,
unsubdued, boundless world of primitive forest, flood, and
prairie!
After a few weeks, Glenville was detached from the
General's party, and sent with the principal surveyor and
one hunter to complete a survey, with directions to rejoin
the main body some two hundred miles down the Missouri,
after the accomplishment of the work. The trio, therefore,
proceeded to the scene of their labour, which was more
than fifty miles beyond the white settlements, and
bordering
on the hunting grounds of the Indians.
One morning, when preparing breakfast on the bank of a
river tributary to the Missouri, a large party of Indians
appeared
on the opposite bank, who, on espying our surveyors,
came over to visit their camp, warriors and warriors'
squaws, all wading with red and bare legs; and then,
pleased with their reception and some small presents, they
insisted that our friends should now go and take breakfast
on the other side; a request that could not be declined
without engendering distrust. Accordingly, our trio mounted
their horses and followed their wading friends across the
river.
Happy that the appetite is often strong! and yet strong
as it was, it was almost too weak for the occasion. The
breakfast began with a drink of whiskey and
complimentary
smoking, after which came the principal viand, to wit:
a soup, or hash, or swill, made of river water and
deer-meat
and deer-entrails all poured from a large iron kettle
and smoking hot intoan earthen dish? No. A
calabash
?
No: but into a sugar trough!a wooden trough!!
and about as large as piggy uses in his early days, when
fattening for a roast. Had the thing been as clean, our
surveyors would never have flinched; but the trough was
coated with oleaginous matter both within and without;
and a portion of the interior coat, now melted by the
absorption
of free caloric, was contributing a yellow oily
richness and flavour to the savoury mess! And on the
crust more remote from heat frolicked
larvae
[20]
[20]
Little elfs or hob-goblins.
with nice
white bodies and uncouth dark heads, careless of comrades
floating lifeless in the boiling gulf below! Had Uncle
Tommy been now narrating, he would have improved the
occasion to animadvert on the beastliness of a drunken
riot, where some are torpid under the table, and others
flourishing glasses above it; nay, he would have gone on
to insist that grubs and such like are to be found even in
the most fashionable places: but we content ourselves
with furnishing the text.
From this aboriginal mess both red and white men fished
up pieces of venison, with sharp sticks, and with tin cups
and greasy gourds they ladled out broth till all was
exhausted
,
except some lifeless things in a little puddle of
liquid
matter at the bottom, and a portion of entrail lodged on
the side of the trough. Our folks, who had, indeed, seen
a thing or two in cabin cookery, were nearly sickened
now; for spite of clenching the teeth in sucking broth,
they were confident more than once, that articles designed
to be excluded, had
wormed
through the enclosure. It
required
a pint of whiskey extra during the day, quids
innumerable
,
and countless cigars to do away the odor and the
taste: and Glenville used to say the memory of that Indian
breakfast would serve him for ever! And yet why not
apply
de gustibus non
, to this breakfast? The classic Romans
delighted in snails; the sacred Jews in grasshoppers. The
Celestials eat rats and dogs, and the elastic Parisians
devour
Vol. I.10
frogs, and sometimes cats. And may not American
Indians eat, without disparagement, entrails, brown and
yellow grease, and fly-blows? Depend on it, reader, this
eating, is, after all, a mere matter of taste.
Not many days after this breakfast, our people met in a
prairie a party of Osages, and mostly mounted on small,
but very active horses. The chief ordered his troop to
halt, and all dismounting, he made signs for the whites to
advance; upon which he stepped up to Glenvillethe
Mercury of the three, and began an unintelligible gabble of
English and Osage. At length he felt about Glenville's
person, with his hands, and even into his bosom and pockets,
till our friends became a little alarmed: when Glenville,
remembering what he had heard, that nothing so quickly
disarms and even makes a friend of a hostile Indian, as the
show of courage, began to look angry, uttered words of
indignation
and even jerked away the chiefs hand. Upon
this the warrior stepping back, laughed long and loud, and
with manifest contempt looked at the dwarf dimensions of
the white but with approbation at his spunk; both natural
feelings, when he beheld a little white man, five feet
seven, and weighing nearly nearly 120lbs avoirdupois,
boldly
resisting and repelling a big red one, more than six feet
three, and weighing about 235lbs! In a few moments,
however
,
the Indian again advanced, but with the greatest
good-nature; and while he now patted Glenville with one
hand on the back, with the other he felt in our hero's side
pocket, whence he soon abstracted a small knife and
immediately
transferred the same to his own pouch. After that,
going to his pony, he returned with a magnificent buffalo
robe wrought with rude outlines of beasts and Indians;
which, throwing down before Glenville as a fair exchange
of presents, he once more went to his horse, and then
leaping
on the animal's back, the chieftain gave the sign, and
away the free spirits of the brave were again galloping to
wards the hazy line of the horizon!
The robe, during my sojourn in Glenville, was in the
winter the outer cover of our bed. And to that was owing,
one of my curious dreams:a vast buffalo bull stripped of
his skin and charging with his horns upon a gigantic
Indian
in an open prairie, while the Indian kept the bull at
bay with a sugar trough in one hand, and a great dirk knife
in the other. Indeed, if, when in a young gentleman's
debating
society at the discussion of the original and novel
question, whether the savage life be preferable to the
civilized
,
if then, I am irresistibly impelled to vote in the
affirmative
,
it is owing to my constitutional tendencies, having
been strengthened by sleeping two entire winters under
that buffalo robe. Only think! reader,to sleep two
winters, in a log cabin, in a bran New Purchase, near a
chieftain and a warrior's grave enclosed with logs and
marked by a stake painted red; and under the hairy hide of
an enormous prairie bull!a bull killed by a gigantic Osage
chief!a hide dressed by his squaw, the queen, or his
papooses
,
the princesses! a robe bestowed as a king's
reward
for my brother-in-law's courage!! Take care. I
feel the effect even nowhurrawaw-aw for the savage life.
It is carried in the affirmative by acclamation
let
me go.
I
must
go, and at least
draw a bead
on something with my
rifle! flash! bang!
The surveyor's party, having in a few weeks finished
their work, commenced descending the Missouri in a canoe,
intending to reach the place where they had left their horses;
after which they would proceed by land to the rendezvous.
One night as they were borne down rapidly by a very
strong current, after having by the dim starlight barely
escaped
many real snags, planters, drifts and the like, and
after having imagined in the obscurity a hundred others,
they were at length driving towards a dark mass; but
whether real or not could at first be only conjectured. Alas!
it was no fancy; but before the direction of the canoe could
be altered, it was driven violently against a drift-island, and
upsetting, was carried directly under it, and so effectually
hid or destroyed as never to be seen again. One man at the
instant of collision, leaped upon the island: the others
were thrown into the water; but they succeeded, although
torn and bruised in the attempt, and with much difficulty, in
gaining the floating mass and getting on it. All their
property
,
provisions, clothes, surveying instruments, guns, &c.
were lost, except the rifle which the hunter alway kept in
his hand, the clothes on their persons, and the notes and
records of the surveys which Mr. Glenville had accidentally
put early that evening into his hat and pockets!
This, reader, was what is termed out therea nasty
fix; and yet our friends were still moving, not indeed very
fast, for extemporaneous islands move at all times sullenly,
and often come to an anchor suddenly, and there remain for
a week, a year, and sometimes they never float again. Still,
it deserves to be calleda fix; for first they were fixed
absolutely
on the drift, and relatively as to the banks; again,
it was now late in the fall, and a very cold night was fixing
their clothes into ice or ice upon them; and lastly, they
were fixed by their sudden unfix from the canoe, and by
being
hungry, wet, and cold, and yet destitute of all affixes,
suffixes andfixins. And so this curious fixation of our
heroes may aid Webster in his subsequent attempts to fix
the American-English by unfixing the English-English.
The comrades now made a survey of their territory, and
found they owned an island of logs, tree-tops and brush,
matted and laced every way, with an alluvion of earth, sand
and weeds; the whole
running
, at present, due north and
south, one hundred yards, with easting and westing of
nearly fifty yards. No sign of human habitation was visible
nor trace of living animal; and it soon became morally
certain the island was desert: and hence our friends began
to devise means of abandoning the involuntary ownership.
But the sole means appeared to be by swimming: and in that
was great hazard, yet it must be done, unless they should
wait for accidental deliverance; or till the party below
disappointed
at their non-arrival, should ascend the river to
search for them. After a gloomy council it was
unanimously
decided to swim away from their island.
The hunter immediately and voluntarily offered to
adventure
the first, promising, on reaching the shore, to stand
at the best landing point, and there shout at intervals as a
guide to the others. Contrary to all entreaties and
dehortations
,
he was resolved to swim with his riflethat weapon
being, in fact, always in his hands like an integral part of
his body. His only reply wasShe's(rifles in natural
grammar are
she's;
to a true woodsman a rifle is like a
beloved
sister; and he no more thinks of
he
-ing and
him
-ing,
or even
it
-ing the one than the other)she's bin too long
in the family, boys, to be desarted without no attempt to
save her; no, no, it's not the fust time she's been swimm'd
over a river; uncle Bill, arter that bloody fight with the
Injins, jumped down the cliff with her and swimm'd her
clean over the Ohio in his hand, and I kin outrassel and
outswim uncle Bill any dayno nowe sink or swim
together
:
so good bye, boys, here goes, I'll holler as soon as
I git foothold. The splashing of the water drowned the
rest; and away with his heavy rifle in one hand, and
striking
out with the other, swam the bold hunter, till borne down
by the fierce current he had soon passed out of sight and
hearing.
With intense anxiety the remaining two waited for their
comrade's promised shout; but no noise came save the
rushing of the boiling and angry water past and under the
drift-wood. Twenty long minutes had elapsed, and yet no
voiceten moreand all silence, except the waters!
Could it be, as they had all along dreaded, that the hunter
was indeed sunk with his favourite gun!or had he been
carried one or more miles down before he could land? The
force of the current rendered this probable; and, therefore,
they would wait an hour, to give him time to walk up the
bank opposite the island and shout. But when that long
and dreadful hour had elapsed, and no voice of the living
comrade yet came across the dark and tumultuous waves,
the agony of the hunter's only brother (for such was the
surveyor on the drift with Glenville,)became irrepressible,
and he said, I
must
see what's become of poor IsaacI
can't stand it any longer, here's my hand, Glenville, my
poor boyfarewell!if I reach the shore I'll holler, if not,
why we must all diefarewell. The next instant the
surveyor was borne away; and the noise of his swimming
becoming fainter and fainter was soon imperceptible, and
John Glenville stood alone!
Reader, my brother-in-law was then, compared with
men, only a boy; and yet he stood there alone and
without
fear! And was there nothing of the morally sublime
in that?a very young man
thus
alone in the middle of the
Missouri, on a dark and cold night; beyond the outskirts of
civilized life; far enough away from his mother's home,
and affectionate sisters; and listening for the shouts of
that second swimmerand without fear? Could
any
body
old or young be in such circumstances, and not be alarmed?
Where was that noble hunter? was he drowned? Would
the second swimmer reach the shore? And if hardy and
strong woodsmen escaped not, could he, a boy, expect to
reach the shore? True, thoughts of his mother now rushed
in uncalled; but these only nerved his purpose, and he
resolved, with God's aid, to use his art and skill for their
sakes; or, if he must perish in the tumultuating flood of
the wilderness, to die putting forth his best exertions to live
hark! what comes like a dying echo?
can
it be!yes,
hark! it comes again, the voice of the second swimmer
there it is again! Thank God
one
is safe, but where is
the other?
Thus encouraged, Glenville prepared for his conflct with
the waves. He was an expert swimmer, and often in early
boyhood had swum from Philadelphia to the opposite island
in the Delaware. Could he, therefore, now preserve his
self-possession, why might he not accomplish a less
distance
in the Missouri; for the shore he knew could not be
more than a quarter of a mile from the drift. Accordingly
he divested himself of all clothes, except shirt and
pantaloons
,
made up the garments taken off into a small
bundle
,
in the midst of which, securing the papers of the
survey
,
he fastened it together with his hat between his
shoulders
:
and then, wading out to the end of a projecting tree, he
earnestly implored God for help, and cast himself boldly
into
the turbid waters of the dark and eddying flood. And
never did he seem to float more buoyant or swim with
greater
ease, without any perturbation permitting the river to
bear him downward on its bosom: and yet directing his
efforts as much as possible, towards the point whence at
intervals was borne to his ears the shouting of his comrade;
till, in some fifteen minutes he landed unhurt and not
greatly
wearied about one hundred yards below the voice,
whither
he instantly hastened, and to his heartfelt joy, was soon
shaking hands not only with the surveyor, but also with the
hunter. Yes! poor fellowhe had found his favourite too
heavy, and one arm, powerful as it was, too weak for his
long battle with a king of floods. Long, long,
very
long
had he held to his gun; but half-suffocated, his strength
failing, and he whirling away at times from the shore
almost
reached, to safe his life he had at last slowly relaxed
his grasp, and his rifle sank. Yet even then
repenting
,
he had twice gone down to the bottom to recover the
weapon: and happily, failed in finding ithis strength
never would have sufficed incumbered again with a gun to
reach the land.
Indeed, when he gained the bank he was barely able to
clamber up, and could scarcely speak or even walk, when
discovered by his brother: who had easily reached the
shore himself, and, after shouting once or twice to
Glenville
,
had gone down on the bank a full quarter of a mile
before finding the hunter. By the aid of the surveyor, the
hunter then had walked up till they had reached the spot
where they were both now met by Glenville; and thus by
the goodness of Providence, our three friends were
delivered
from their peril.
Upon reconnoitering, it was conjectured that they must
be near the squatter's hut, with whom had been left their
horses; and hence taking a course, partly by accident and
partly by observation, not long after they were cheered by
the distant bark of his dogs, and next by the gleam of fire
through the chinks of his cabin. Here, of course, the party
was welcomed, and supplied with whatever was in the
squatter's power to afford for their refreshment; principally,
however, a hearty dram of whiskey, some corn bread and
jerked venison, but above all, a bed of dry skins, and a
heap of blazing logs.
In the morning they obtained supplies of skins and
blankets
,
agreeing to pay their host if he would go with them to
the rendezvous; which he did, and was suitably and
cordially
rewarded. It was now perceived that if the poor
hunter had left his rifle on the drift-island, she could have
been regained by means of a raft: but to tell where she had
been abandoned in the river was impossible. Otherwise
our hunter would have made many a dive for the rescue
of his deer slayer; as it was, he came away
disconsolate
,
and, indeed, as from the grave of a comradealmost
in tears!
CHAPTER XXIV.
Ac veluti summis antiquam in montibus ornum
Cum ferro accisam crebrisque bipennibus instant
Eruere agricol certatim: illa usque minatur,
Et tremefacta comam concusso vertice nutat:
Vulneribus donec paulatim evicta, supremum
Congemuit, traxitque jugis avulsa ruinam.
Our
party reached the rendezvous only a few hours
beyond
the appointed time. Here, as a bee-tree had been
just reported, it was unanimously determined to
commemorate
the deliverance and safe arrival of our three friends by
a special jollification. In other words, it was voted to
obtain
the wild honey; and then, in a compound of honey,
water and whiskey, to toast our undrowned heroes and their
presence of mind and bravery:no small honour, if the
trouble of getting the honey is considered. For, on
following
the aerial trail of the bees, the hive was ascertained to
be in a hollow limb of the largest patriarchal sire of the
foresta tree more than thirty feet in circumference! and
requiring six men at least, touching each other's hands,
to encircle the trunk!
And this is a fair chance to say a word about the
enormous
circumambitudialitariness
(
!
) of many western trees.
It is common to find such from six to seven feet in diameter;
and we have more than once sat on stumps and measured
across three lengths of my cane, nearly ten feet; and
found, on counting the concentric circles, that these
monsters
must have been from seven to eight hundred years
oldan age greater than Noah's, and almost as venerable
as that of Methusaleh! Shall we feel no sublimity in
walking
10*
amid and around such ancients?trees that have tossed
their branches in the sun light and winds of eight centuries!
that have scorned the tempests and tornadoes, whose fury
ages ago prostrated cities and engulfed navies!that have
sheltered wildfowl in their leaves, and hid wild beasts in
their caverns from the dooms-day looking gloom of many
total solar eclipses! and have gleamed in the disastrous
light of comets returning in the rounds of centennary
cycles
!
Such trees, but for the insidious and graceless axe, that
in its powerlessness begged a small handle of the generous
woods, such would yet stand for other centuries to come, at
least decaying, if not growing: they are herculean even in
weakness and dying! And dare finical European tourists
say
we
have no antiquity? Poor souls!poor souls!our
trees were fit for navies, long years before their old things
existed! Ay, when their oldest castles and cities were
unwrought rock and unburnt clay! Our trees belong to the
era of Egyptian architecturethey are coeval with the
pyramids
!
Near the junction of the White River of Indiana and the
Wabash, stands a sycamore fully ninety feet in
circumference
!
Within its hollow can be stabled a dozen horses;
and if a person stand in the centre of the ground circle, and
hold in his hand the middle of a pole fifteen feet long, he
may twirl that pole as he pleases, and yet touch no part of
the inner tree! He may, as did Bishop Hilsbury, mounted
on a horse, ride in at a natural opening, canter round the
area, and trot forth to the world again! But to the
bee-tree
.
It is a proverb, He that would eat the fruit must first
climb the tree and get it: but when that fruit is honey,
he that wants it must first cut the tree down. And that was
the present necessity. No sooner was this resolved,
however
,
than preparation was made for execution; and instantly
six sturdy fellows stood with axes, ready for the work of
destruction. They were all divested of garments excepting
shirts and trowsers; and now, with arms bared to the
shoulders, they took distances around the stupendous tree.
Then the leader of the band, glancing an eye to see if his
neighbour was ready, stepped lightly forward with one leg,
and swinging his weapon, a la Tom Robison, he struck;
and the startled echoes from the tall timber of the dark
dens, were telling each other that the centuries of a
wood-monarch
were numbered! That blow was the signal for
the next axe, and its stroke for the next; till cut after cut
brought it to the leader's second blow: and thus was
completed
the circle of rude harmony; while the lonely cliffs of
the farther shores, and the grim forests on this, were
repeating
to one another the endless and regular notes of the six
death-dealing axes! And never before had the music of
six axes so rung out to enliven the grand solitudes!and a
smaller number was not worthy to bid such a tree fall!
Long was it, however, before the tree gave even the
slightest symptom of alarm. What had it cared for the
notchings of a hundred blows! Yet chip after chip had
leaped from the wounded bodyeach a block of solid wood
and the keen iron teeth were beginning to gnaw upon the
vitals! Alas! oh! noble tree, you tremble! Ah! it is not
the deep and accustomed thunder of the heavens, that shakes
you now!no mighty quaking of the earth! That is a
strange shiveringit is the chill shivering of death! But
what does death mean where existence was deemed
immortal
!
Why are those topmost branches, away off towards
the blue heavens, so agitated! Tree!tree!no wind
stirs them
so
they incline towards the earthaway!
hunters
,
away! away! Hark!the mighty heart is breaking!
And now onward and downward rushes you broad expanse
of top, with the cataract roar of eddying whirlwinds; and
the far-reaching arms have caught the strong and stately
trees; and all are hurrying and leaping and whirling to the
earth, in tempest and fury!
Their
fall is
heard
not! In
the overwhelming thunder of that quivering trunk, and the
thousand crushings of those giant limbs, and the deep groan
of the earth, are lost all other noises, as the slight crack of
our rifles amid the sudden bursting of the electric cloud!
There lies the growth of ages! Once more the sun pours
the tide of all his rays over an acre of virgin soil, barely
discerned by him for centuries!
Well might Glenville feel rewarded and honoured, when
for his sake such a tree lay prostrate at his feet! And yet
in all this was fulfilled the saying,the sublime and
ridiculous
are separated by narrow limits; for, could any thing
be grander than such a tree and such an overthrow? Could
any be meaner than the purpose for which it fell?viz:
To get a gallon of honey to sweeten a keg of whiskey!
CHAPTER XXV.
Provide thee proper palfries, black as jet
To hale thy vengeful wagon swift away,
And find out murderers in their guilty caves.
After
many other trials and adventures Glenville
returned
safe to his home in Kentucky. Here with his wages
he loaded a boat with
produce
, and set float for New
Orleans; intending with the cash realized by the trip, on
his return, to go into Illinois with a stock of goods and
keep store. But at Orleans he was seized with the
yellow fever, and was finally given over by his physician,
and orders issued, in anticipation of death, for his
interment
.
That very night, however, in delirium, and while
his kind yet weary nurse slumbered in a chair, he arose
and finding a basin of water brought to wash him in the
morning, he instantly seized and swallowed the whole
contentsthe only thing deemed wanting to kill him!
And yet when put again into bed, he fell into a calm and
delicious slumber; perspired freely; and when he awoke
the fever was gone, and my friend saved. Let careful
persons
,
therefore, who keep a memorandum book put this
along side the celebrated Scotch-herring-recipe,Cure for
Orleans fever: two quarts of cold water, and cover up in
bed.
Glenville did, indeed, get home and with some money
from a successful sale; but he was worn and emaciated,
and many months passed before he could cross the Ohio
and set up his store. His cup of bitterness was not
drained
;
and evil came now in a form demanding stout heart
and steady nerves. Ay! our dark and illimitable forests
then
hid men of lion hearts, of iron nerves, of sure and
deadly weapons!
Perhaps
such dwell there yet; if so,
wo! to the enemy that rashly arouses them from their
lairs and challenges, where civilized discipline avails not!
and where battle is a thousand conflicts man to man, rifle
to rifle, knife to knife, hatchet to hatchet! And Glenville,
boy as he was, proved himself worthy a name among the
lion-hearted!
We stood once on a solemn spot in the wilderness and
leaned against the very tree where the bloody knife of the
only survivor had rudely and briefly carved the tale of the
tragedy. It stoodn early thus:
18 injins15 witesinjins all kill'd and buried here
14 wites kill'd and buried tooP. T.
Laugh away, men of pomatum and essence, at Hoosiers,
and Corncrackers, and Buckeyes: ay! lace-coats, mow them
down in an open plain with cannister and grape, you safely
encased behind bulwarks; or cut them to pieces with
pigeon breasted, mailed and helmed cuirassiers,but seek
them not as enemies in their native and adopted woods!
The place of your graves will be notched in their trees, and
you will never lie under polished marble, in a fashionable
and decorated cemetery!
But Glenville, in store keeping witnessed a farce before
his tragedy. Among his earthen and sham-Liverpool, were
found some articles, similar to things domesticated in great
houses, and which, although not made unto honour, were in
the present case very unexpectedly elevated in the domestic
economy. These modesties occupied a retired and rather
dusky part of the store; when one day an honest female
Illinois(i. e. a Sucker's wife)in her travels around the
room in search of crocks suddenly exclaimed: Well! I
never! if them yonder with the handles on, aint the nicest
I ever seen!Johnny, what's the price?but I must have
three any how;here Johnny do up
this
white one(
rapping
it with her knuckles)and them two
brown
ones up
thare.
A large purchase, to be sure, of the article; but curiosity
asked no questions: and in due time the trio were packed
and hanging in a meal bag from the horn of the lady's
saddle
;
who, on taking leave, thus addressed our marvelling
shop keeper:
Mr. Glenville, next time you go gallin, jist gimme and
my ole-man a call,we've got a right down smart chance
of a gall to look atgood bye.
Our hero, who had early discovered, that store keeping is
none the worse when the owner is in favour with the softer
sex, did not forget this invitation, and in due season made his
kind friends a visit: and when supper was placed on the
table by the smiling maid and her considerate mother, what
do you think was there?
Corn bread?
Hold your ear this way(a whisper.)
No!he! he! he!
Yes, indeed, and doubledeed!the white one full of
milk!! And after that you know our humblest democrat,
may well look up to the presidency.
It had become about this time necessary for Mr. G. to
visit Louisville. For that purpose, he left his store in
charge of a young man; the latter promising among other
things to sleep in the store, instead of which, however, he
always slept at a neighbouring cabin. Hence what was
feared happened,the store was robbed. Not truly in the
eastern style, of small change in the desk, some half dozen
portable packages, or paltry three dozen yards of
something
;no,
no, the robbery was on the wholesale
principle
commensurate with the vastness of our woods and
prairies
.
The entire stock in trade was carried offbales,
boxes, bags, packages, and even yard-sticks and scales to
sell byyes! and hardware, and software, and brittleware,
ay! crocks with and without handles, and whatever may
have been their standing in society,all,
all
were taken!
so that when the clerk came in the morning to retail to the
Suckers, there was indeed, a beggarly accountnot of
empty boxes, these being mostly carried awaybut of
empty shelves, and empty desks, and empty store. His
occupation was even more completely gone then Othello's.
On the river bank
[21]
[21]
The Big-Fish-River.
were, indeed, traces enough of a
mysterious departure of merchandise; but whether the
embarkation had been in skows, or perogues, and other
troughlike vessels, was uncertain. Nor could it even be
conjectured, for what port the store had been spirited away;
or for what secret cove or recess of tall weeds matted into
texture with sharp briars and thorny bushes!
Previous to Glenville's return, a fellow that had been
noticed lurking in the woods near the store for two days
before the robbery, was recognised in a small village, the
day after, and in suspicious circumstances. He was,
therefore apprehended; when, after a short imprisonment,
he confessed having been employed by some strangers to
steer a flat boat loaded with something or other from
Glenville's
landing. On his return, our merchant went to the
sheriff, who indignant at a villainy that had so
completely
ruined a very young man after years of toil and danger
passed in acquiring his little property, did himself suggest
and offer voluntarily to aid in a scheme to compel the
prisoner
to disclose, at least, where the goods were concealed,
and before they should be removed from the country or
ruined by the damp.
We are not advocates for Lynching, but we do know
that where laws cannot and do not protect backwoodsmen,
they fall back on reserved rights and protect themselves.
Nay, such, instead of laying aside defensive weapons,
after legislators shall have been wheedled, or frightened, or
bribed into vile plans by puling or fanatical moralists to
nurse the wilful and godless murderer on good bread,
wholesome water and occasional soups, all the remainder
of his forfeited dayswe know that such woodmen will
go better armed, to slay and not unrighteously on the spot
every unholy apostate that
maliciously
and
wilfully
strikes
down and stamps on God's image! And when the day
comes that the avenger of a brother's blood wakes in our
landlet no canting infidel or universalist blame those that
now resist the abrogation of divine laws!but let him
blame hypocritical juries, rabblerousing governors, and
all that are now deserting the weak, the innocent, the
unwary
,
the defenceless, and crying God pity and defend
and save and blessthe murderer!
[22]
[22]
Some politicians plead strenuously for the abolishing of Capital
Punishment in all cases, who yet insist on the right of self-defence,
defensive
wars, and the propriety of firing on mobs with powder and
ball! Of course, it is very proper to kill any number of persons
intending
either to rob or murder; but very wicked and impolitic to put any
body to death after his crimes shall
have been committed!
and Shame on
the deadpoor lifeless victim!
The sheriff and Glenville with two fearless and
voluntary
associates prevailed on the jailor to loan them the
prisoner
for a day or two, making known their scheme and
giving
suitable pledges for his redelivery. The loan was
made, and then, on reaching a fit place, the prisoner was
dismounted, and Glenville proposed to him the following:
My friend, we know very well you helped to rob my
store, and that you know well enough where your comrades
are and how the goods can be recovered; now, if
you will tell, not only will we get you out of jail, provided
you will leave the country, but I will give you also ten
dollars; but if you won't tell, why then we'll flog you into
itcome, what do you say?
Well, he be some-thing'd if he know'd; and if he did,
he wasn't going to be lick'd into tellinand he'd sue them
for salt and battery.
Peril, indeed, was in this illegal process; but the party
had good reasons for believing the fellow a desperate
robber
,
and so they seemed to be preparing for a severe
flaggellation
,
when he supposing all was solemn earnest,
said he was ready to confess, and, provided Mr. G. would
forgive and not prosecute, he would conduct the present
party to the plunder, or a part of it. The promise was
readily
given and the fellow was unbound and remounted
without
any trammel, but with this comfortable assurance, that
if he tried to escape or to betray them into any rendezvous
of robbers, he should be instantly shot down, and that
whether
they died themselves for it or not.
[23]
[23]
It was intended only to frighten the man, unless he did actually
betray the party to the robberswhen, of course, it would be life for
life.
Accordingly, away all started through the woods, where
the prisoner yet rode, confident, as if following a blaze, and
stopping only at intervals to look at the sun, or the moss,
or to examine a tree or branch, and shewing if he had one
hundred yards fair start, it would be no easy matter
either to catch or shoot him. At last, a wild turkey was
seen trotting across their course, fully eighty yards off, and
then Glenville, nearly as good a shot as the writer, merely
stopping his horse, levelled and fired from his saddle, when
to his own surprise, as well as that of the others, the bird
fell dead in his tracks! After this the guide would check
his own horse, if he voluntarily stepped faster than the
others, lest he should seem meditating an escape; for if a
moving turkey could be shot, so he seemed to think could
more easily be, a moving man.
The fellow, however, led at length into a deep ravine on
Big Wolf Creek; and there, sure enough, some in a cave
and some in a hollow tree were portions of the merchandise
it being evident also that within a very few hours a still
larger portion had been removed to some other depot! By
the force of additional threats, promises and entreaties, the
rascal named the other robbers, he being merely a
subordinate
;
but as no small hazard would be encountered in
attacking the temporary cabin, where the principal robber
and the remaining goods were, it was determined first to
get additional volunteers and make more suitable
preparation
.
Packing the damaged and soiled goods on their
horses, the sheriff's party returned with their prisoner to
the village of Shanteburg, and redelivered him to the jailor,
intending if his information proved substantially correct to
have the fellow not only liberated, but otherwise rewarded.
Here, also, two others volunteered to join in the robber
hunt; upon which all, with loaded rifles, and knives and
hatchets in their belts, soon mounted, and were plunging
again into the darkness of the forest, now black from a
moonless night. Early on the next morning they came in
sight of the cabin. When within fifty yards, the robber
stepping to the door let his rifle fall in that peculiar manner
that belongs to a practiced marksman, at the same time
warning off his visitors, and solemnly swearing he would
kill the man that first approached his barricade. At the
instant, however, of the man's appearance and even before
he had faily uttered a word, our friends had treed in a
twinkling, and now stood with pointed weapons and keen
eyes towards the bold thief. Glenville, on leaping from
his horse, instead of treeing, stood boldly out and thus
exclaimed
loud enough to be heard by all: Sheriff, you are
all running this risk for me'tis my duty to lead. I'll
attack the scoundrel; if he shoots meavenge my death!
With that he fearlessly advanced with his levelled rifle and
then halting, called to the villain: Throw down your
gunin ten seconds one of us is a dead manone, two,
three: and so the two stood, each with his bead
darkened
by the other's breastthe sheriff's men, also unwilling
to shed blood; yet with a finger every man on his set
triggertill Glenville called sevenwhen the robber
suddenly threw up his muzzle, and cried out, surrendered!
The next instant he was seized and bound. This was the
leader. His main accomplices were not discovered, and
only another portion of the stolen goods, which, together
with the robber, were now conveyed in triumph to
Shanteburg
.
That afternoon the fellow was lodged in jail, and of
necessity in the same room with the subordinate thief: yet,
while all possible care was used to prevent escape, in less
than forty-eight hours both contrived to get out! and from
that hour to the present, neither they, nor the remainder of
the merchandize was ever seen or recovered. It was,
indeed
ascertained that they belonged to a small foraging party
from the grand gang of outlaws, whose head-quarters then
were among the islands and cane-breakers of the Missouri:
and so doubtless they escaped by the aid of concealed
comrades
and all got safe off with Mr. Glenville's balance
in trade, to the army of the confederates. Perhaps they
lived to rob againmay be to murder; and for which latter
service our modern pseudo-philanthropists would pity and
feed them! Many neighbours out there will alway physic
such with lead pillsat least till Reformers have prisons
prepared fit to hold their pets longer than a few hours!
This pleasant adventure, terminated Mr. G's first essay
at store-keeping. It gained him, however, a character, and
no one would have become so popular in the New Purchase,
[24]
[24]
Our part of it.
but for mistaken opinions in the neighbours about Mr.
Carlton's bigbuggery and stuckupness. As it was, Glenville
nearly went over Simpson rough shod. And all these little
affairs aided our firm in sore disappointments and losses;
for then the senior would say
Well!we might have had better luck.
And the junior reply,
Why, yesand another consolation: this is not the
first disappointment, and it wont be the last!
We, in short, thus learned to imitate the sailor, who, in
witnessing a conjuror's tricks, was pitched into the yard by
the accidental blowing up of some gunpowder; but which
supposing to be one of the tricks, he held on to his bench,
and exclaimed: Well!what next?
CHAPTER XXVI.
O Cromwell! Cromwell!
Had I but served my God with half the zeal
I serv'd my King, he would not in mine age
Have left me naked to mine enemies.
Is the way of a transgressor hard? that of a politician is
not much easier. He is usually a slave first, and a
timeserver
afterwards. In the Purchase the sovereign people
are the most uncompromising task masters; and he that
wishes to serve them, had better first take a trip to Egypt
and learn the art of doing brick without straw. In certain
districts, fitness, mental, and moral is a secondary
qualification
in a candidate; he must be a clever fellow in the broad
republican sense. For instance, he must lend his saddle
to a neighbor, and ride himself, bareback; he must buy
other people's produce for cash, and sell his own for trade
or on credit; and, on certain solemn occasions, he must
appear
without a coat, and in domestic muslin shirt-sleeves:
his overalls hung by half a suspender, and a portion of the
above named muslin curiously pouched between his vest and
inexpressibles. His face must wreathe, or wrinkle, with
endless smiles; and his ungloved hand be ready for a
pump-handle shake with friend and foe alike: because a
foe often presents his hand to ascertain if the fellow aint
too darn'd proud to shake hands with a poor man!
Is the man of honour invited to eat? he asks no questions
for conscience' sake, or the stomach'sthe two things being
in many people the same. Is he asked to stay all night? he
never wonders where they will find him a bedthere being
only three in the room, and the family consisting of one old
man, and one old woman, two grown sons, three daughters,
and some little folkshe naturally lies down on the
puncheons
with his certificate wallet for a bolster. Or does
he share a bed with two others?then he recollects it is a
free country, and if one man needs votes, another needs
brimstone. And why turn up a nose at an oderiferous
blanket
?has
a bed any right, natural or political, to more than
one sheet?and why should not the sheet be under and
the blanket above you?Let go your nose! has not a long
succession of your
dear fellow-citizens
slept in the
same bed, and between the same articles; and what, pray,
are you better than they to wish clean things? Yes
but I'm nearly stifled. Tut man!you'll never mind it
when you get to sleep. But it certainly will kill me!
Not it: men of honour are not so easily destroyed.
Would a candidate cough?he puts no hand up, nor
turns aside his head. Must the nose be blown?he draws
out no handkerchief. Would he spit?he neither goes to
the door, nor uses a perfumed cambric, like a first-rate
clergyman. Why?because all such observances are
regarded
as signs of pride, and if you despise them not, your
election is hopeless.
But, Mr. Carlton, we might transmit something offensive
to a gentleman's garments.
Well, what then! he will certainly some time or other
return your favour. Be satisfied, my dear Mr. Eastman, it
is only by giving and taking all sorts of matters out there,
you can, in
some districts
, ever secure your election.
And do any politicians endure all this!
Certainly: and persons who aspire to rule ought surely
first to serve. Many remarkable men in Congress, be it
known, had a long training in some Purchasetheir
meannesses
are not of toadstool growth, if they are of toadstool
flavour.
Reader! are you religious? Then do write a tract to
be scattered any where on election days; and here is your
text or theme:Give diligence to make your calling and
election sure. Among other matters, set forth how it
requires
not one fourth the labour, toil, anxiety, watchfulness
and none of the base sacrifices of time, comfort, and
independence
to save a man's soul as to win an election; and,
how the worldly honour is not worth after all even the
worldly
price paid for it, and much less, the immortal soul
usually
thrown in with the rest to boot.
We, of course, did not do
some
things, and hence Mr.
Glenville was soon permitted to remain in private life;
still we were compelled, for electioneering objects, to
attend
this summer, several Log-Rollings. Folks in the
Purchase had no special days for political gatherings, or at
most, not more than two dozen in a whole year; for, in
lieu of such, every militia muster, cabin-raising,
scow-launching
,
shooting-match, log-rolling and so forth, was
virtually a political assembly, where our great men and
their partisans made stump speeches, and read certificates.
For the benefit of our surplus young lawyers, and other
ambitious gentlemen who have neither trades nor stores,
and who are desirous of rising above the political horizon,
and are meditating to emigrate to the west, we shall here
give a full account of one Grand Log-Rolling, which
Glenville
and Co., attended this season.
On reaching the place, we found a large and motley
assembly
of fellow creaturesmen, women, boys, girls,
horses
,
oxen, dogsall of whom, and which, came either to
aid or listen, except the dogs, and these came simply out
of philanthropy. They spent the time mainly in wagging
their tails, barking at rolling logs, and thrusting in their
noses wherever there was a pretext for seeming busy while
others were so hard at work; and yet, excepting some
three dozen snakes, four skunks, two opossums and a score
or two of insignificant field rats and mice and ground
squirrels
,
the dogs caught nothing the whole blessed day.
Indeed, some secretly thought it would have been just
as well if the musk-cats had been allowed to escape, for,
after their capture, the dogs were not altogether so
agreeable
;
yet no candidate or candidate's friends or even their
enemies kicked or whipped a favourite wag-tail. It was
hardly politic to curl your nose. What was a fellow fit for,
that minded
such
things?was
he
the man to go to the
legislature
and carry skins
[25]
[25]
Sausage sort.
to a bear.
The whole intended field, however, was resounding with all
kinds of cries, noises, and echoes, such as shoutsorders
counterordersencouragementsreproacheswhoas,
gees and hawshold-on's and let-go's, and that's-your sort's
up-with-
him's
to male logs, pull
her
this way, to female
ones, and down-with-it to neutrals; with clatter of axes and
tomahawks; the thunder of rolling trunks; the crash of
brush; the crackling of flames: and, over all, agreeably
to the Music of Nature,
[26]
[26]
Gardiner's.
were heard the shrill outcries
of females; the screeching of boys; the snorting and
winnowing
of horses; and the howling and barking of dogs!
Never was scene more exciting; and our appearance in
working trim, was hailed with the most enthusiastic
cheering
;
which compliment being suitably returned, we
speedily
joined the nearest working party. As for myself, surely
I never did halloa (holler) louder in my life: and I
certainly
never did work harder for a whole entire
hour
,
dresseden
costume, to wit:in tow-trousers, cow-hide boots, and
unbleached hemp linen shirt, but without coat or vest, and
with shirt sleeves rolled above the elbows.
We did not attend the gathering purely out of
rabblerousing
feelings; we wanted to hear the speech of ours John
intended to let off at Jerry: for something was expected
today
of Glenville, and he was only a novice in stump
elocution
,
and so we had, being high larn'd and a leetle
of a politician, made John's first speech ourselves! Had
John been as great a nincompoop as Jerry, he could just as
readily have spoken nonsense off hand; but he knew too
much to speak sense without preparation: and so Mr.
Carlton
had prepared the maiden speech. This, however, our
friend, like some manuscript preachers, delivered more than
once, yet always with variations and additions, till at last
the very theme and text were both changed, and our stump
orator gave towards the end of the campaign a much better
speech than he had commenced with.
Our historian, as has been hinted, did not figure a very
long time with the handspike, having luckily discovered
some pretext for soon joining a squawking and frolicsome
squad of boys, girls and young women, engaged in the
niggerin-off. Where it is designed to make a clearing,
the owner has all the trees, except some six or eight on
an acre, cut down, the others being deadened; that is
girdled by a deep cut two inches wide. If the majority of
the trees are thus girdled, the field is calleda deadning,
otherwise it is a clearing. Now, it is to a clearing the
log-rolling, or, for brevity's sake, a rolin, pertains. In
order to the rolling the owner has had all prostrate trunks
cut into suitable lengths, and the bushy tops preserved for
fuel to the log-heaps; still many trees remain to be
prepared
even on the grand rolling day; and such of course
require the neighbours' axes and hatchets.
In fifty or more places of the clearing, and in many parts
of the same trunk, logs are making, and with wonderful
celerity
by another processan almost noiseless process too,
and requiring, like Yankee factories, only women, girls,
and children. And this is the niggering-off. It is thus
performed. A small space is hacked into the upper side
of the trunk, and in that for awhile is maintained a fire
fed with dry chips and brush; then at right angles, with
the prostrate timber is laid in the fire a stick of some green
wood, dry fuel being yet added at intervals, till the
incumbent
stick, sinking deeper and deeper into the burning spot,
in no very long time, if properly attended, divides or
niggers
the trunk asunder.
The terms of this art are derived from the marvellous
resemblance
the ends of chared logs have to a negro's head
another fact on which abolitionists may dilate with
great pathos in the next batch of popular lectures, on the
wickedness of our prejudices: although, it must be
remembered
that our black rascals out there invented the terms
themselves!
Vol. I.11
The axe is truly a mighty agent in the civilization of new
countries. Fire is a greaterand only in a New Purchase
and in the niggering operation is the famous copy-book
sentence illustrated properlyFire is a bad master, but
a good servant:
its mastership belongs to our log-burnings.
Without the aid of fire, the stoutest heart must be appalled at
the thought of hewing out with the axe a farm from our
forests
;
and yet with the aid of fire even females may achieve
that enterprise.
When the logs are all cut or niggered, they are then
rolled
, but often dragged together, in different parts of the
clearing; and usually to the vicinity of some huge tree
deadened, or perhaps living, and waving its melancholy
arms over the mutilated bodies and mangled limbs of its
slain children and friends. Ah! happy if the tree be dead;
for it is destined, if not dead, to a dreadful endto be
burned alive! Oh! poor tree! thy former friends are
compelled
to become thy worst enemiestheir severed trunks
are gigantic faggots! Alas! the pile rising up, as log after
log rolls heavily against thy quivering column, amid our
labour
,
and shouting, and uproar, that pile, now surrounded,
and crowned with a tangled world of brushwood, is thy
sumptuous and magnific pyre! Monarch! of a thousand
years, thou shalt die a kingly death! Nor would'st thou be
sparedonly to sigh among strange harvests soon to
spring aroundto sigh for the shades and shadows and
touching branches and kissing leaves of departed trees!
Nothou would'st not choose to survive thy race!
The piles are sometimes lighted at the end of the rolling;
oftener by the settler's family at their leisure. To-day,
however, as we were a very large party, and had, therefore,
finished the rolling early in the afternoon, it was resolved
that immediately after the candidates should have done
speaking, all the heaps and piles should be kindled at once.
Now to their praise be it forever
[27]
[27]
In a finite sensethe life of this book
recorded, that both John
and Jerry had, as their friends allowed, worked most
powerful hard and steady: but their enemies must
determine
whether this diligence was out of disinterested love to
the settler, or with a
single
eye to the vote of the settler's
eldest son, who, as his father
accidentally
remarked, would
be entitled to a vote at the next election. Indeed, as the
zealous partizans had closely imitated their respective
candidates
,
more unfigurative, practical and innocent
log-rolling
was done to-day than was ever witnessed; and I
secretly
made up my mind that our next log-rolling in
Glenville
should
happen
just before the fall election; when we
could get the opposing candidates to lead the work. It is
not improbable that our host to-day had had the same
thought; at all events our candidates certainly sweat for
their expected honours; and if John did gain them he
worked for thembut Jerry! alas! he toiled in vain! and
alas! it blistered my hands! but then after this, I was
unanimously voted a right down powerful clever sort of
a feller! and more than one very pretty young woman,
allowed she'd be Mr. Carltin's second wife, when his old
woman died!!
After all, candidates
are
of some use; and the great
majority
can do more good in natural log-rolling than in the
metaphorical sorts common among the dirk and pistol
lawgivers
of
deliberative
assemblies. Nay, a very few
hundreds
of rival and zealous candidates would, in a year or
so, if judiciously driven under proper task-masters, clear a
very considerable territory.
The candidate
Mr. Jerry Simpson declined speaking.
to-day stood not on a stump to make his
address, but on a very large log heap, sustained by a living
oak more than three hundred years old!an incident to
me full of interest. Our first speech, the first of the sort I
ever wrotethe first he ever uttered,our first speech was
poured forth over the ruins of greatnessa prostrate
wilderness
!
The youthful speaker, the dear friend of many years,
stood on a funeral pyre! while above him waved the
sheltering branches of the tree, soon to be sacrificed and
writhe in a tempest of fire! And ours was the first, the
last, the only oration ever made by a Christian under its
protection! the grand old tree seeming to wonder at the
semi-civilization that had wrought such havoc in its domain
while it knew not that the ceasing of Glenville's voice
would be a signal for lighting the fires!
The speech need not be described. It was, of course,
rather ad-captandumish; well written, however, but still
better delivered and handsomely varied. Hence, if it
gained no new votes, it secured the old ones. And that
is no light praise, where a word, a look, a gesture, or even a
smile changes voters; not to lose is then to gain. The
new settlers acted with the strictest impartialitythey
divided
their interest. The father had know'd Jerry's
father, and often heern tell of Jerry himselfand so he
would never d'sart an old friend; but the son, darn'd-his
eyes (a peculiar kind of stitching) if he wouldn't go for
Glenville
;
as cos he hisself was a young man, and so was
totherand as cos he'd give him a sort of start in his
clearing
,
he'd give him a sort of start as a public funkshune'er.
And thus the balance of power was adjusted to a nicety;
and thus, also, if the new comers did neither party any
good
they did them no
harm:
pay enough for a hard day's work
considering. For, certainly, a wide difference must appear
between having
nothing
in your favour and
two somethings
against you, and so it was now; hence John and Jerry felt
(or at least said so) as much gratitude as if they had
received
not a negative quantity, but a positive favour.
Complacent reader, I hope you never sneer at
sovereignty
?
Be well assured it can sneer at you, and always
will, if you descend in any way to be a slave. Save
yourself
for a crisisacquire reputation for honour and
integrity
and
the people will then call upon you. The
present
is the age of small bugs.
The speech ended, and we were divided into Firing
Committees to light the different piles: after which was to
be a grand supper previous to going home. Very soon
then at each heap, were assembled about half a dozen men,
while in all directions were tearing, scampering, screeching,
and yelling women, boys, girls, dogs and puppiessome
carrying fire on clap-board shinglessome with remnants of
burning niggering sticksothers with dry and blazing
woodand the canine helps, some with sticks and chips in
their mouths, and some with the dead snakes and polecats,
so that almost instantly and simultaneously fires were
kindled
in several parts of each, and every heap and pile
throughout the whole clearing. Combustibles had been built
in with the piles; and now a gentle wind was fanning all
into devouring flames. Yet, after the first sudden and
crackling blaze, the fires subsiding became, at a short
distance
,
barely visible; save in parts where dry logs had
become
quickly ignited, and there a taper-pointed intense
flame, shooting up, would remain fixed a few seconds, and
then trembling from its own gathering fury, it would rise
higher and higher, and ever expanding its base as it elevated
the apex.
But by the time our feast was ended, and the shadows
lengthening from the forest told the coming reign of
darkness
,
a hundred-hundred fierce points of taper flame
gleamed in wrath from every crevice, or darted from the
dense clouds of black smoke; and in many places, several
points had united their bases, and were now in one broad
fiery mass, careering in spiral columns of mingled darkness
and light. Now fiercer winds were rushing into the
vacuum
.
The equilibrium disturbed through an aerial cir
cumference of many leagues diameter, the storm spirits
aroused and excited, came flying on the wings of a sudden
earth born tempest!
[28]
[28]
The very kind in which the Philadelphia Storm-king delights: but
he
did not raise ours.
This augmented the number and
intensity
of the flames; and these, augmented, invoked in
their madness more furious winds, till a broad, deep and
awful tide of air poured through the clearing, with the force
and vengeful roar of the hurricane! and up leaped all the
fires in frightful columns and pyramids of living flames
quivering
with wild wrath, and coiling, like demon-serpents,
around and up the mighty trees that sustained the pyres!
Here and there sheets of flame thrown forth horizontally,
and seemingly by an intervening body of smoke, detached
from the mass of fire, resembled clouds on fire and burning
up from their own lightning!
No breath of life could any longer be drawn in that field
of fire! It was abandoned as a wide tumultuating flood,
where unseen and dreadful spirits held a terrific revel
amidst the roar, and crash, and thunder of flaming
whirlwinds
!
Far and wide the forest was grandly illuminated; and
in returning home I often looked back and saw the noble
trees at the pyres, tossing their mighty arms and bowing
their spreading tops for mercy and succouray! like
beings
sending forth cries of agony unheard in that fiery
chaos! Our home was several miles from this clearing, but
the next night, on ascending the bluff on the creek, we
could yet see in that quarter a lurid sky, and now and then
fitful gleams of brightness; and even a week after, as I
passed that clearing, the arena was yet smoking, although
nothing remained of that part of the primeval forest, save
heaps of ashes and a few blackened upright masses that
for so many centuries had been the living bodies of the
lately martyred trees!
CHAPTER XXVII.
A merrier man
Within the limit of becoming mirth
I never spent an hour's talk withal,
So sweet and voluble is his discourse.
Reader
, will you be asked a question?
Certainly.
Do you ever go to the post-office?
What a question!
Well, but are you thankful for a daily mail?
Pshaw! I never think about it.
Just as I supposed. I was such a thoughtless person
myself, once. Now, however, I am thankful to Uncle
Samuel
every time I walk to the post-office.
In our part of the Purchase the nearest office to
Glenville
was at Spiceburgh, always nine miles off, sometimes
two or three more. To that office the mailif such may
be called a dirty, famished, flapping, scrawny pair of little
saddlebags, containing three or four letters in one end, and
half a dozen newspapers in the otherthe mail came
regularly
(in theory) once
a month,
till the Hon. J. Glenville
exerted himself in favour of his constituents, and then it
came very irregularly once in
two weeks
. Sometimes there
was an entire failure in the saddlebags' arrival. And this
was occasioned by the clerk at Woodville office, who,
whenever he discovered no letters for Spiceburgh retained
the papers for private edification, and to be forwarded next
mail: at least Josey Jackson, our post-master, said so
Sometimes our mail failed because of high waters; although
our post-boy, Jack Adams, a spunky little chap, would often
in such cases swim over: but then the half-starved wallet
was twice washed away, and when recovered, the news in
both letters and papers was too diluted and washy for any
practical purpose.
Reader, it was truly sickening, after waiting four
endless
weeks with the most exemplary impatience, and after
toiling, not over, but through a road always nearly
impassable
,
and when passable full of peril to learn that no
mail would arrive till next month; or what was even worse,
that it had indeed come, but with only one letter, and that
maybe for the Big-Bear-wallow settlement!
[29]
[29]
All things out there are big: if two things of the same name are
to be distinguished, one is called big, and the other powerful big.
The faint
hope that sustained one in the lonely and wearisome path
now became despair! and yet, all that wet, long, tangled
way to repass! and no mail again for four other hateful
weeks! No wonder we finally ceased from all
correspondence
,
contenting ourselves with hiring a man, with a
remnant
of sole leather, to bring our newspapers when he
could get them: which luckily he did as often as once in
three months! No wonder during all our western sojourn,
if the world never heard of us: although in this we had a
very ample revenge, as in that time, we heard nothing of
the world, and I think, even cared less.
But this autumn, I expected a letter from my old friend
Clarence; and so, on a delightful September morning, off I
started, confident of finding his letter. The road, also, was
less bad, and with diligence we should get home about the
middle of the afternoon. And Dick, too, was in high
spirits
;
for he always regarded as a holiday, the exchange of
the bark mill for such a jaunt; and he now trotted along
the bottomland with voluntary and most uncommon speed
till of a sudden the old fellow scented, or saw, or heard
something which made him very fidgetty and uneasy.
What could it be? Dick, it was known, had some finical
ways, but he was now manifestly alarmed, and made some
desperate attempts to wheelwhen, sure enough, a strange
figure emerged from the tall rank weeds into the road
before
us, and continued to move in front, and apparently
never having noticed our approach. This figure was
undeniably
human; and yet at bottom it seemed a man, for
there were a man's tow-linen breeches; at top, a woman;
for there was the semblance of a short gown, and, indeed,
a female kerchief on the neck, and a sun-bonnet on the
head! Then again the apparition wore enormous
masculine
leather boots, and under one arm carried a club;
although both of the hands seemed to be holding above the
hips, rolls of woollen cloth, very much like a furled petticoat!
Whether the affair would turn out a man dressed in
woman's
upper articles, or a woman, in man's lower ones, was
yet to be discovered. The suspense, however, was not
long; for at the noise of Dick's sneezing, (who saw how
matters stood, and gave warning by way of delicacy,) the
hands of the figure instantly relaxed their hold on the
linsey
rolls; and down dropped a sudden curtain all round
over breeches
and
boots, in the shape of a veritable
petticoat
!
and before us walked a genuine daughter of the
woods!
The universally favourite attire of females (
indescribables
)
is not, we presume, to be traced to French milliners,
male or female. It originated in the necessities of a new
country, where women must hunt cows hid in tall weeds
and coarse grass, in dewy or frosty mornings. And to that
is owing brief frocks; although out there, such when
allowed
to fall to the natural hang of the articles, shut from
view the indescribablesor very nearly so. Dressed thus
in the husband's boots as well as his thingamies, (the limbs
of which are worn as our fathers wore them within, and
not without the boots,) our fair lady this morning, bade
defiance
11*
to wet grass, running briars, snake-bites, ticks, and
all and every evil incident to cow-hunting!
Of course we exchanged compliments on passing; but
Dick was so dumb-founded at the miraculous transformation
on the sudden fall of the screen, that he shyed and passed
without a word: the truth is, I was all but frightened
myself!
I need not tell all the silly things that entered my mind
at the thought of such an exhibition in certain places and
assembliesbut I was not fairly recovered on reaching
Spiceburgh; and the event had perhaps rather increased my
good-nature, and encouraged the hope of finding a
long-expected
letter. On approaching the cabin-office, and
while
hanging
Dick to a gate post, a glimpse caught of
Josey trying to escape out of a back door into the woods
gave me a sudden pang; for this was Josey's way of getting
off, when there was no letters for his friends, and leaving
the matter of explanation to his wife as he naterally
hated, he said, to see folks so powerful disapinted. But
I was too quick, and so hailed:
Hillo! the house, Josey!
Ah! hillo; how are you? come walk inI was a sort
a steppin round the other waypowerful fine day.
VeryWell, Josey, anything this time?
Wellthere was three letters and some papers kim
day afore yesterdaybut I wan't inand Polly, she put
them awayand I aint heern her say that thare was
anything
for your settlement up thare.
Why, Josey, one
must
be for me; it can't be possible
the letter, that a month ago was to be here, is not come
this mail!
WellI should a sort a think one of them mought be
the letter. Glenville's goin a-head most powerful in this
part of the districtJerry's a clever fellerbut we go
tother
way down here: if Glenville gits in, we'll try old Uncle
Sam, and have the mail twice a month in these here
diggins
.
Yes, but if they manage no better at Woodville or some
other place, we shall only be disappointed twice a month
instead of once.
He! he! he!yeswell, let's go back, Mr. Carltin,
and take a look.
Josey's wife now appeared
en dishabille
,
[30]
[30]
French, for being caught in the sude.
being occupied
with her wash-tub in the space between the cabin and the
kitchen; when Josey, to prepare and smooth the way to
my disappointment, said to his lady:
See here, Polly! don't you think one of them thare
three letters mought be for Mr. Carltin?
Nan! (she
heard
well enough.)
Don't you think one of them thare three letters what kim
day afore yesterday, mought be for Mr. Carltin?
Well, no, I don't jist ezactly mind(remember)but I
a sorter allow maybe prehaps two's for the Snake Run
Sittlemint's
folk's(washing away as if the article was very
hard to get clean)and tother was tuk out more nor an
hour ago.
Which way, Mrs. Jackson,said I, eagerly, as a
glimmer of hope arosewhich way did the person come
perhaps it was Tommy Robison, as I asked him the
other day to call here, and
WellI kind a sorter think as maybe prehaps the man
said the letter was hissinand I actially seed him a readin
on it!
Well, said Josey, very tenderlylet's go into the
back room anyhow, and overhaul the bureaumaybe some
how or nother we mought a overlooked last monthor may
be arter all one of the two's yourn.
The back room was a closet boxed off with poplar boards,
its junctures pasted over with strips of deceased
newspapers
;
and it held a bed for the postmaster and mistress,
anda bureau, of which two drawers were Uncle Sam's
Cabinet, the top drawer for
living
letters and papers, the
second, (descending,) for
dead
ones. Into this sanctum I
was now invited out of compassion, with the privilege of
rummaging for myself.
First, then, the
live
drawer was jerked out, and Josey
and myself began our search with great system and good
judgment, collecting, as a preparatory step, all the living
newpapers into one corner, and which amounted to nearly
two dozen, two or three with envelopes and directions: the
rest, naked, and thumbed and dying:all destined I fear to
the
dead
drawer. This completed,
one
letter only remained,
instead of two, and that sure enough for
Missus Widder Dolly Johnsin, head at Snake-Run
kere of her brother near Spiceburg(
on one corner
)
case he's gone to Orleens, p. m., send it to the Widder
herself.
But what had become of the other letter? Josey here
was much disturbed, as he knew it had not been called for.
At my suggestion, a shaking of each newspaper was
commenced
,
when pretty soon out tumbled the second one,
and that too, for Snake Run. A very scrutinizing search
was next instituted under, and into, and around a half-knit
stocking, and some little calico bags nearly full of squash
or calabash, or cucumber seeds; and even a square box
half full of roasted store coffeebut no chance letter for
me could be discovered. I was about, therefore, to go
away much chagrined, when it occurred, that as a living
letter had been concealed in a dying paper, maybe, a letter
might have been buried alive among the defunct articles
of the next drawer: and accordingly a request was made
for a peep into that tomb. To this, Josey after a
momentary
hesitation, replied: Oh! its no use no howstill, if
it will satisfy a feller crittur, let's have the overhaul:
and with that forth came the repository of departed news
written and printed, and with such a vengeance(for it
stuck a little)that the dead things, many of them,
bounced
into the middle of the room, like criminals' carcasses
when galvanized.
Ah! painful sight! that drawer like other graves (in
some cities) was too full!it contained more than the
living
world! And the frightful way that papers and letters
were huddled, must soon have killed a delicate and
sensitive
thinga love letter, for instance, if by any mischance
it had come down from the upper drawer alive! Well, we
rummagedand shookand tossedand pitched for a good
quarter of an hour, till out leaped a letter,a real living
letter
folded
in a civilized wayand actually superscribed:
Robert Carlton, Esq. Glenville Settlement, &c. &c.
and post-markedPrinceton, N. J.
Josey was, of course, completely mystified, and began
twenty awkward apologies; but, although not a little
provoked
,
I was so rejoiced at the resurrection of my letter,
and Josey was so sorry, and after all, so clever a fellow,
that he was cordially forgiven:
[31]
[31]
My friend, R. Carlton, was not at all influenced by the
consideration
that Josey intended to vote for Glenville.
C. Clarence
.
and that, reader, argues
me not spiteful.
I now prepared to return home: and just then, a young
chap rode by on his way to Johnson's store; for Spiceburg
was a large village, containing, first, Mr. Johnson's Store;
second, a blacksmith's establishment: and third, Josey
Jackson's post-office, which last was also a tavern, and
now becoming a kind of opposition store: although an
opposition
post-office would have been more serviceable,
both to town and country. The chap named, immediately
hailed me, and made a proposal for me to wait till he had
done his purchases, when we could ride home in company.
As Sam lived in an adjoining settlement, and I really want
ed company, (to say nothing of political news,)I readily
agreed to wait, although we well knew it would be some
hours before the bargains were concluded.
In a New urchase country, going to store is as much
for recreation as business, and preparation is made as for
any other treat or amusement. The store is, too, the place
for news, recent and stalefor gymnastics, wrestling,
pitching
quoits, running,for rifle shootingfor story-telling,
&c.and hence, a purchaser's stay is not in direct ratio
to his intended bargains, but rather in the inverse; a fellow
having only six cents to spend, will sometimes lounge in and
around a store for six hours! Nor must even that be wholly
imputed to the fellow's idleness. It is in part, owing to
his unwillingness to part withcash; and when it is
considered
how very difficult it was then, and maybe now, in
the New Purchase to get hold of silver, then it will appear
that to lay out even a fippenny-bit must have become a matter
for very solemn reflection, and very
lengthy
chaffering. In my
time, rarelyindeed, could two cash dollars be seen circulating
together; and having then no banks, and being suspicious
of all foreign paper, we carried on our operations almost
exclusively by trade. For goods, store-keepers received
the vast bulk of their pay in produce, which was converted
into cash at Louisville, Cincinnati, or more frequently at
New-Orleans. The great house of Glenville and Carlton
paid for all things inleather. Hence, occasionally
when a wood-chopper must have shoes and yet had no
produce
,
but offered to pay in chopping, we, not needing
that article, and being indebted to several neighbours who
did, used to send the man and his axe as the circulating
medium in demand among our own creditors, to
chop out
the
bills against us. Indeed, it was out there some wise
statesmen
of hard currency memory, learned to do without banks,
and therefore, wished to let the neighbors in here have a
taste of their experience: although
cash
seems difficult to
find anywhere, for we of the New Purchase supposed the
searcity owing to the non-existence of banks, while we of
the Old Purchase, attribute the scarcity to their existence.
For my part, I must ever think the leather currency better
than the mere paper one; and that the latter, although not
so often tramped under foot as the other, yet still more
deserves
it.
My friend Sam to-day had come to town with two
silverfippenny-bits
,
and a roll of tow linen; and he intended to
buy four panes of glass, 8 by 10's, half a pound of store,
coffee, eighth of a pound of store-tea, one quarter pound of
gunpowder, and a pound of lead: also, if they could be got
cheap, a string of button moles and a needle. Sam prided
himself on being a hard hand at a bargain, and Mr. Johnson,
I well knew, although an honest man, was a prudent dealer;
and, therefore, I determined to remain in the store and
witness
the trading. The colloquy opened thus, after Sam had
deposited his roll of linen on the counter:
Well, Johnson, you don't want no tow linen to-day, I
allowdo you?
If 'tis good. What do you want for it?
I allow to take half trade and half silveras near about
as we can fix it.
Sam, you're jokingwe don't give cash for anything
but pork and lard.
That's powerful stingywell, what's this piece worth
its powerful fine.
This; (examining)'tis pretty good'tis worth ten
cents in silver. We give twelve in trade.
Ketch a duck asleep!if that 'ere tow linen thare aint
worth fifteen cents in store-tea or coffee ither, I'll bet old
Nan(his rifle)again two-shot gun! Howe'er I'll track
round a littleI wants any how to go over to the
post-office
,
maybe thare's a paper come.
Now this, reader, was all gum; Sam could not read a
word. He intended this as a threat to deal in the
opposition
store, and Mr. Johnson so understood it: in fact he
had anticipated such a move, and for that purpose had
underrated
the linen, intending to rise to the true value as if
induced so to do by Sam's superior dexterity, by which the
linen would be secured and his customer pleased. And
therefore, Mr. J. thus answered:
Sam! Sam! you're a hard Christian: but I've large
payments at Louisville, and you've been a pretty good
customer, and a cent or so aint muchand rather than let
you go to Josey's, I ll give you thirteen cents.
Now this Sam thought just one cent higher than the
linen was worth; yet it was in reality precisely half a cent
lessand that other half cent Johnson intended finally to
give him. Hence whem Sam replied, Well! I raythur
allow as maybe prehaps Josey would a sorter give fourteen
cents; but I don't like to d'sart old friends, and so says I,
jist gimme thirteen and a half cents, and it's trade! it was
what Mr. Johnson was prepared to hear. Accordingly,
after affecting to consult a book of prices, (I think it was
an old counting-house almanac) and after figuring away at
the double rule of three in vulgar fractions, at all which Sam
stared as at a magical operation, Johnson at last looked up'
and scratching his head, said:
Let's seeeight-sixteenths is four-eighths, and that
is one halfand half is two-fourthsand five per cent
and tow linen at a discountwhy, Sam, you'll break a
fellow some day or otherstill I can't lose more than a
fraction of a cent on a yard, and I must not let you go to
Josey's. Well, I'll give thirteen and a half, and it's a
bargain. Now, what will you have?
Well, I'm goin to see how the new skow's comin on
and you may measure the linen till I get back, and then
we'll take it out in something or nuther.
And with that away went Sam, leaving Mr. Johnson to
measure off the piece; for while he affected to fear the
storekeeper would cheat him in price, he never dreamed
that he would either lessen the number of yards or
miscalculate
the sum in his own favour. Nor was his
confidence
abused, for Johnson was an honest man, and had
only used indirection to come at the true price, because of
Sam's perverse sagacity in bargains. I did not, however,
stay to watch the measurement, but buying a sheet of
foolscap, I retired to a back room where I answered
Clarence's
letter, so unexpectedly rescued from the dead,
giving
him among other matters a condensed statement of its
resuscitation.
It was a full hour before Sam's return; and then the
quantum suff. of tea, coffee, glass, &c. &c. being
furnished
,
the balance of trade was found against him, and
he owed the store precisely nine and a quarter cents. In
lieu of this Mr. J. offered to take one of Sam's silver fips,
which although a liberal discount in Sam's favour, he
regarded
as right down Jewish usury; and the storekeeper
was obliged to book the nine and a quarter cents, to be
paid in sang. Nor was this conduct of Sam's so very
surprising, when it is recollected that for one hundred and
twenty-five cents could then be bought a whole acre of
land! bottom land! trees! spice bush! papaws! and all:
hence to ask for six and a fourth cents, was asking a pretty
good slice off an acre! Sam was, therefore, really
indignant.
He now was getting ready to start home, when spying
a spring of button-moles, he remembered he was to buy a
fip'sworth; and supposing a prime bargain was to be had
for cash, he proposed to pay right down one of his silver
pieces for the half of the string, worth in all twenty-five
cents.
Come now, said he, Mr. Johnson, here's the silver
cash money, right slam smack down, for one half jist of
that 'ere leetle bit of a string
Oh! no, Sam, we can't go thatI'll give you so far,
replied Johnson, measuring a minor third.
WellI've traded a most powerful piece of linin here
this morninand I'll be teetotally darned if I won't try
Josey, and see if he won't give me more moles for silver
cash money.
Our storekeeper well knew Josey had no moles, and so
after a feint to retain a customer, he let him go; but no
sooner had he got out of hearing, than our merchant took
down his string of moles, and laughing as he slipped off
nearly half into a drawer, he said to me, Sam will be
back directly, and then I mean to sell him a little more
than the worth of his fip. He then suspended the
diminished
string in its former place, and shortly after Sam
came back, and began:
Well, I don't like, arter all, to d'sart old friends, and so
says I, jist gimme one half of that darn'd leetle stringfor
it's time me and Mr. Carltin was makin tracks home.
Ah! Sam, how shall we live these hard times? but I
suppose if I must, I mustso down with your dust. And
here's a full halfand now take which end you like.
Sam chose; and then the dealer stripped off the half,
amounting to a good eight cents' worth; while our man of
cash pulled out a small dirty deer skin pouch, and untying
its mouth, he emptied all the contents on the counter, viz:
two silver fips, three chaw'd bullits, a damaged rifle
wiper, four inches of pigtail tobacco, and three worn
gun-flints
.
But he was evidently even yet scarcely determined
to part with his cash; for he took up first one and then the
other fip, apparently more than once about to return both to
the pouch, and offer more sang: till at length,
believing
he had got nearly double as many moles as he could
obtain for trade, he handed over, with the air of one
making another's fortune, the worse looking and more
worn fippenny bit; and then the other articles, together with
the button-moles, being put into the pouch along with the
widowed fip, he was ready to ride, and we in a few
moments
more were on our way home.
My comrade was in high glee at the way in which he
had made it off o' Johnson, i. e. the way he had just got
the worth of his money, and which the storekeeper would
have readily given him at once, without so much plague to
his customer's wits, if Sam's own dexterity had not seemed
to make the indirection necessary. I too was in high glee,
hoping to secure an additional vote for our candidate; and
we, therefore, jogged along very harmoniously. Nay, as
it was now becoming dark, I yielded to a proposal for the
sake of company, to go all the way round by the Indian
grave, that being the proper path to Sam's settlement. This
reminds me of my promised tale of the Indian grave; to
which, after ending the present chapter with a pleasant little
adventure of our own this night, the next chapter will be
devoted.
Not long after our quitting the three blazes, and turning
into the unblazed trace at the grave, it became quite dark;
and we were compelled to ride in Indian file, Dick and
myself
in the van, Sam and his quadruped in the rear. Be it
remembered, part of his purchase was (or were?) four
small panes of glass, intended to illuminate their new cabin,
and make its native darkness visible in the day. A sort of
window had, indeed, been made by skipping a log in the
erection; but our friends had begun to be richer, and it
had been lately voted to have a sash of four lights at ten
cents each, it being most specially for this, the twelve
yards of tow-cloth had been woven, and this very day sold
at Spiceburgh. And, even now, Sam, the eldest son,
twenty-one
years old last Spring, was actually riding homeward
with the long coveted glass, done up in two sheets of
coarse demi-paper, and tied across two ways with strong
pack-threadyes, all safe under his arm!
More than once during the afternoon had he introduced
the subject of glass and windows; and every conversation
would begin and end with a self-complacent, and rather
lofty look at the articles under his armthe glass by which
their cabin was to be elevated in the scale of architecture,
[32]
[32]
Cabins are at first dark, like Grecian temples: afterwards, when
sashed, they enjoy a religious and dim light like Gothic cathedrals
especially if two
glasses
are oiled
paper
.
and the family established among the forest aristocracy!
Once or twice as we passed an old cabin without a sash
window, Sam would commence
`Mr. Carltin, I allow this here glass here of ourn's near
about the right sizeaint it?
I think so.
Wellit will look a sort a powerfulhey?
Verywe had a sash made last summer and it helps
matters
powerful
.
He! he! he!(a giggle of exquisite satisfaction
like the cackle of a hen that has laid a new egg, or the
mild squawking of geese just emerging into the dusty road
from a hole in a grain field fence)he! he! he!Mr.
Carltin, aint it a sort a funny them ere settlers what's been
in the Purchus longer nor us aint got no sashes?I allow,
it looks a sort a idle in 'em.
But now as we rode in the dark a fire suddenly gleamed
from the crevices of a cabin, upon which, Sam with
wonderful
anticipative exultation halloed from the rear
Hillow! Mr. Carltinthat's Bill Tomsin's cabin!
what a most powerful heap of shine his 'ere fire would
make through this here glass of ourn if they was all in a
winder
To this Mr. C. made no reply, for, at the instant his
neighbour's thoughtless, blundering brute
[33]
[33]
Terms applicable to common horsesnot to Dick.
of a horse tripped
over a root on to his nose! and away went his rider, not
indeed out of the saddle, but off from the blanket, his only
saddle! and alas! alas! away went the brittle eight by
ten's!and in spite of the forty cents paid in tow linen, in
spite of Sam's chagrin and almost superhuman efforts to
save them, in spite of the woful disappointment of the
expectants
at home, the whole four panes, were all and each,
and every, so cracked and broken as to defy all
emendations
from dough or putty! Yes! in one short moment,
and that a moment of triumph, all visions were dissipated
visions of a window from without, and visions through
one from within!
Poor Sam! he was not hurt by the fall: although, I do
believe for a moment he wished it had been his arm and
not the glass. And certainly, had I not been present, he
would have abused his unlucky horse in very irreverent
terms, calling him as it was:
A most powerful rottin darn'd ole carrinfor to go to
stumblin and smashin
glass
that 'are away!!
I tried to console my neighbour in the most approved
way, by telling misfortunes of my own, and at last did bring
on a faint laugh(much like one a person makes in trying
not to cry)by narrating the fall of our waiter of glasses
but still, forty cents worth of good tow-linen was no trifle
for folks in my comrade's humble circumstances to lose;
and I did so pity him as to say if he would ride home with
me, we would give him an extra pane procured to mend
our own sash in case of accident, and also, three sheets of
paper, which, when oiled and fixed according to directions,
would answer almost as well as glass itself. This cheered
him up a good deal; and on reaching uncle John's, a search
was instituted, and to our great satisfaction two panes were
discovered, which were both cordially bestowed on our
friend; and also two sheets of foolscap, with directions how
to oil or grease and paste them on the sash, and to secure,
by two strings diagonally fastened, or as he better
understood
itkattekorner'd-like.
Sam never forgot this small kindness. Hence, as you
may easily think, reader, not only did he vote our way, but
he became an active and rather violent partizan in
electioneering
,
everywhere giving, too, a magnific version of
the glass and paper story. Nay, on the election day he
overheard a person saying to anotherYes, John
Glenville's
well enoughif he hadn't stuck up folks around him
and that brother-in-law of hissin, Carltin's a reel 'ristekrat
and hates poor folks like pisin:upon which what
does Sam do, but forthwith strip off his coat and break in
with his doubled fists as follows:
See! here, I say, mister! you're a most powerful
darn'd liar!now jist shut up'cos case you jist go for
to say that say aginif I don't row you up salt crick in
less nor no time, my name's not Sam Townsend.
Happily, my complimentary neighbour had no wish for
that pleasant little excursionup crick, and no farther
disturbance ensued. I would merely add, that passing
Sam's cabin a few days after his mishap, I had the pleasure
of seeing the sash in its place, with two glasses in the
lower tier and two papers in the upper: and to be sure the
papers were sufficiently greased; indeed, so well, as to
keep out light as well as water and air; although, in spite
of our use of diagonal, and it's being rendered into
popular
language, kattekorner'd like, the strings were
inclined
to perpendicular to the sides, and crossed each
other almost at right angles, and not very far from the
centre.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
neque semper arcum
Tendit Apollo.
Pleasure after Pain.
When
the Indian tribe were departing from the New
Purchase, a distinguished chieftain had suddenly died, and
been buried in aboriginal style in the spot known in our
settlements as the Indian grave. That spot I could never
pass without feeling myself on hallowed ground, often
contemplating
the scene with indescribable emotionay,
more than once with unbidden tears. The burial place
itself
was a beautiful natural mound, abrupt on the side
towards
the county road, but otherwise of a regular shape
and gradual swell, being hardly indeed supposed a mound
on the approach by the Glenville path. On the summit of
this mound was the grave. It was inclosed by a fence of
small logs and covered with poles: while a rough post
carved with Indian hieroglyphics and its point or top
painted
red, marked where the warrior's head rested.
This place was too far from Glenville for a walk, and
we never hunted in that direction, but, even when hurrying
on a journey, as I rode by. I could not pass till I paused
some moments to gaze, and with a melancholy soul, on this
resting place of the savage king; and with the most
profound
sadness and shame, after learning that this wild and
lonely and regal grave had been violated!
Around that grave had stood a band of exiles and
houseless
wandererschildren of the forest! Trusting to the
white man's faith, they had asked a few yards of earth,
where but the day before the whole mighty wilderness
had been theirsa few yards where they might lay in his
rest their chief, their lawgiver, their father! Yes! yes!
there bitter agony of the soul had been felt, although
proudly
,
perhaps, sternly concealed! Mournful enough to bury
a king and a patriarch in a borrowed grave; yet was it
some alleviation that he was to lie in no dishonoured ground!
If there was sadness, there was grandeur too, in the
thought, that his was the only grave, and that it made
venerable
and sanctuary-like so large a forest space!ay,
that for long years to come white men's children would
point and say, Behold that little mound yonder!that is
the grave of Blue Fire!the mighty Indian warrior and
chief! That grave would remain a monument, speaking
to successive generations of the pale faces and saying
This was all once the red man's land!
What would that tribe of mourning warriors have felt?
what would they not have done, had some fierce and proud
apparition from their spirit-land, revealed that the base
sons of white men would despoil that grave of its treasure,
even before the impress of the departing exiles' feet should
be covered by the fall of the coming autumn's leaves?
Yet so it was. Reader! the poor Indian is often cursed
for his indiscriminate massacreshas he no provocations?
Do not civilized and nominal Christian men, with deadly
weapons, watch near the sepulchres of their fathers and
sons to wreak sudden vengeance on the robbers of the
tomb? And dare we condemn the poor, hunted, defrauded
Indian, who, finding his father's grave desecrated and
rifled, cools the phrenzy rage of his burning soul in a bath
of white man's blood?
Once on my way to Timberopolis, I sat gazing and
dreaming on my horse, near that sad mound; when, not
without an emotion of fear, I saw appear a large party of
mounted Indians, going, as it afterwards was discovered, to
visit the Potawatamies living on a reservation in the north.
The party did not halt at the grave, as probably they would
have done, if no pale face had been there to notice: if
they had, although no sign apparently could lead to the
discovery
that the sacred deposit was gone, yet should I have
felt, if not afraid, yet truly ashamed. Our way being for
several hours in their direction, we often passed and
repassed
one another, and occasionally I rode among the
party
,
and held a conversation with a half breed that could use
a little Englishtill at last, they encamping on the bank
of the beauteous and silvery river, once their own! we
partedmy way leading across the stream and their path
still further up on its bank. I felt a strange wish to plunge
with them into the dark, tangled wilds of that vast forest,
where no white man yet livedso strong is the love of the
uncivilized in some hearts!
But to our story. Several years prior to our arrival in
the Purchase, two young men, whose youth and ignorance
is their best apology, students of Dr. Sylvan's, on
hearing
of the burial of Blue Fire, determined so soon as the
Indians
should resume their march for the Mississippi, to take
up the body; partly for anatomical purposes and partly out
of rash boldness; for some nerve was necessary to the
work, while many lagging Indians were yet straggling in
the woods. And unhappily for our honour they succeeded;
but not until after a very remarkable interruption and
temporary
defeat. And that defeat is my story. It shall be
given, however, in the words of the renowned
Hunting-Shirt-Andy
,
the leader of the party that terrified the
resurrectionists
,
and almost to insanity, and from whose lips we
ourselves received the narrative.
Be it premised, that at the time of our story, not more
than three cabins were between Woodville and the river;
that on their side the river, the nearest house from the
grave, (on our side) was more than three miles, and
Vol. I.12
beyond a wide bayou and marsh,it being
absolutely
necessary in passing and repassing to and from
Woodville to cross the river. In many places were fords,
and near them also dangerous holes from four to six feet
deep; and into these, not only inexperienced travellers, but
even we neighbourhood people often plunged; and hence
escape from them to a terrified man running from savages
would be almost miraculous. On our side, the cabin
nearest
the grave was two miles up the river, so that if any
Indians came unexpectedly upon the young fellows, they
would be in hazard of meeting a pretty summary vengeance
and not, I must say, wholly undeserved.
Our narrator was called Hunting-Shirt-Andy, mainly
because
he lived like an Indian, and always wore a very
wonderful leather hunting shirt(his second hide or skin)
most curiously frilled, and elaborately ornamented with bits
of skin, birds' and beasts' claws, and porcupine quills dyed
red, and green, and yellow; and also to distinguish him from
his second cousin White-Andy, so named because he lived
like the rest of us civilized woodsmen in a cabin. The
story was given in Uncle John's cabin, at the united
request
of myself and the others, and is as follows:
Hunting-Shirt-Andy's Story
.
Well, Mistur Carltin, if you reely wants to hear about
them two young fellers, I don't kere to tell about that Blue
Fire scrape; but case you put it in your book, don't let on
about thare namsesas the doctor's nevy is a most
powerful
clever feller and tended me arter in the agy, and
charged me most nuthin at all, although he kim more nor
once all the way over more nor twenty milesand the
tother one what got most sker'd, is a sort of catawampus,
(spiteful) and maybe underhand wouldn't stick to do you
a mischief if he thought you made a laff on himalbeit,
he's been laffed at a powerful heap afore.
Well, we heern the two was a comin to git up Blue
Fire, and bile him for a natumy, as they call'd it; and all
us neighbours was powerful mad about it; as cos couldn't
they allow the poor Injin to lay in his grave; and as cos the
Injins still a sort a squattin and campin round, mought
hear on it, and it mought n't be so good for folks's consarns
then. And so we talks over the thing, and allowed we'd
make the chaps let Blue Fire lay; and so, says I to Bill
Roland, Bill, says I, let's you and me make on to be Injins,
and skere them doctur fellers; and don't let them go for to
bile the poor red savage for the natumy. Agreed, says
Bill, and then we goes and gits ole man Ashford, and fixes
up like reel gineine Injins, and paints our faces red and
clean up our arms, away up here (showing,) and all on us
gits on blankits and leggins and moksins, and teetotally
greases our hair back soslick-like, and I gits a bit of tin
round my hat, and we takes our tomhoks and rifles and
puts off and lies hid near the grave. 'Twas just thare, Mr.
Carltin, along by the black walnut stump what I cut down
the very next day arter for rails for Bill Tomsin's yard.
Well, thare we all on us lays down in the bushes on our
bellies, a little over fifty yards from the grave; for we
know'd the young fellers was to come at sich a time; cos
they kim to Squire Brushwood's the night afore; and the
Squire he sends up his little gal to ole man Ashford's afore
sun-up to sort a let us know: and so we was all ready,
when what should we spy a comin but the two young
doctor
chaps with a couple of hossis, and a meal-bag, and a
spade, and a hoe.
Well, we lays teetotally still, and they goes fust and
fassens their hossis to the swinging branch of that thare
sugar
west o' the place, and then goes and begins a takin
down the pen, and when they gits it down, they off's coats
and begins a diggin like the very divil.
[34]
[34]
Soft way of swearing out there.
And jist then we
raises up a sort a on our kneeses; and all draws a bead
at that knot in that thare beech at the tail ind of the grave;
I'll show you the knot any day, and you'll see its more nor
half a foot good above their heads when they stood up agin
the beach, although they arterwards tried to make the knot
out only two inches above their heads; and then I gives a
leetle bark, like a growling Injinand up they pops both on
'em, right under the beach, and looks about most powerful
skittish, and then we lets fly three balls crack-wack right
into the knot, and makes bark peel right sharp in that 'are
quarter; and then out jumps we and raises the yell, with
tomhoks agoin to fling
At this very moment our narrator was interrupted by a
terrific burst of thunder, which shook our cabin with much
violence, and caused the dry clay of the chinking to curl up
in dust around us like smoke! To persons shut up from the
view of the horizon, it had seemed a very fair afternoon
early in July; but while we listened to Andy, a single
cloud surcharged with lightning came over our clearing, and
using a tall tree within a few yards of our cabin as
conductor
,
it had darted its fiery bolt, which shivered the tree into
pieces, and filled us with a momentary, yet very intense
fear: and then, it rapidly passing, our few rods of sky was
clear and brilliant as before. After a short and revereful
pause, Andy resumed:
That's a most mighty powerful big clap of thunder, and
most mighty near! but it's not a bit more skery than our
bullits above them two young doctors' heads and the reel
Injiny yells us three screeched out! The way they drops
tools and made tracks was funny, Mr. Carltin, I tell you!
You see! I've seed runnin in my days that's sartinbut if
them chaps didn't git along as if old Sattin was ahind 'em,
then I allow I never killed no deer, and that would be a
wapper!
Wellthey divides, and the doctor's nevy, he tuk
strate up stream; and ole man Ashford and Bill, they
pretends they was a follerin himhowsom'er they couldn't
a ketch'd up no howand so the nevy he runs clare up two
miles and gits safe into Pete's shanty on the bottum, and
sker'd Pete hisself so powerful he was afeer'd to come
down, till we sends up and lets Pete into the secret.
But tother chap, he was so sker'd he didn't see where
he runn'd, and kept right study ahead slash through weeds
and briars to the riverand me slam smack arter him, as cos
I was afeerd he'd run in and git drownded; for thar's where
the water is deepish, and jist about where you swim'd your
hoss, Mr. Carltinand so I runs and hollers like a
screech-owl
`stop!doctur!staw-u-up!'
But the more I
hollers
,
the more he legs it; case he was more nor ever sker'd
to hear a Injin holler InglishGraminy! Mr. Carltin, if he
didn't make brush crack and streak off like a herd of
buffalo
!and
me all the time a keepin arter, as I was
sentimentally
afeer'd now he'd git drownded; but, darn my
leather shirt(Andy
would
put this profane stitch into his
shirt when he was excited)darn my leather shirt, if arter
all I could make him stop; and in he splash'd kerslush,
like a hurt buffalo bull, and waded and swim'd and splash'd
and scrabbled even ahead rite strate across and up tother
bankwhen he stops for the furst time to blow and takes a
look back! And then he sees me a standin on our side and
without no gun, a bekenin on him to stop; for I was too
powerful weak a laffin to holler any morebut darn my
leather shirt, if the blasted fool didn't set off agin like a
tarrified
barr, and wades clean in all through the bio! and
the buttermilk slash tother side! and never stopt again till
he kim to the three mile cabin! and thare he tells them
as how the Injins had all got back agin, and had killed
tother doctur and tuk his skulp!! And you may naterally
allow, Mr. Carltin, the hull settlement over thare was a sort
a sker'd, and sent out scouts and hunters to see: but when
it was found how it all was ezactly, then if they warn't a
mighty powerful heap of laffin, I never kill'd no deer.
Howsever the Doctor's nevy was good pluck; for he
gits another chap to help, and two days arter when we warn't
a watchin, he digs out the poor Ingin and totes him over to
Woodville, and biled him up for a natumy for their shop
arter alland so that's the hull story, Mr. Carltin;but I
must be a sorter goin. I'll fetch that jerked vensin about
next weekand them 'are deer skins:but afore I starts,
wont you jist play us a toone on that flute of yourn, Mr.
Carltin?
Most certainly, AndyI'll play you a dozen if you
can stay,what will you have?
Well!let's seethare's one I don't mind it's name
nowbut a powerful toone; I heard Mr. Johnsin fiddlin
on it at Spiceburghbut thare's somethin about river in it,
and it was talkin of the young doctur's splunge, made me
think of the toone.
Was it this, Andy?(Mr. C. plays.)
That's him! that's the dentikul toone!let's see
what do you call him?
Over the river to Charlie. And accordingly this
powerful toone was done now in first rate double-shuffle
style, with very curious extempore variations, and very
alarming embellishments; while all the time Andy patted
the puncheons with his moccasin'd feet, and seemed barely
able to refrain from leaping up and dancing; till the music
ending, he remarked:
Ie! Ie! darn my leather shirt if I didn't know 'twas
river somethin!and by jingo, Mr. Carltin, if you don't
jist about know the sling of it, about as good as Mr.
Johnsin
and
maybe a leetle bit bettererand the way he makes
it hum on the fiddle!I tell you what!! Well, well,I
must be goin, but I should like to stay and git you to play
that 'ere meetin toone, Pisger,(
Pisgah
, a great favourite
then with our religious world, but which had better been
named, Gumsnorter
[35]
[35]
Unless classic musicians prefer that, or a like term for the genus.
but I can't stopI'm offgood-bye,
folks.
And off he was sure enough; while I treated him during
his exit with Yankee-doodle. And this compliment Andy
felt so much, that he began capering, and yelping, and
tossing
his legs and arms, till he reached our bars, which he
cleared like a bounding buck at a flying leap: but within
the bushes beyond he paused a moment, and gave, first, an
Indian grunt and bark, and then such a yell!it rung in my
ears for twenty-four hours? Then once more he leaped
away, shaking the bushes, scattering old leaves, making
brush crack, and at the same time screaming outSta-up
doctur!sta-a-a-aup! in all which he designed a scenic
exhibition of his late story; playing like other celebrated
actors different parts, first, his own Indian character, and
secondly, the flight of the young doctor.
Reader!do you believe life is all moping in the West?
Now be well assured we
have
other recreations there than
going to churchthe only one certain
hic
vel
haec
English
tourists grant to us and never use themselves!
CHAPTER XXIX.
Quack! Quack!! Quack!!!
Vide Voices of Natural History
.
Vol
. X.
Not
many weeks after Hunting-shirt-Andy's visit, a
very great and yet very little stranger, for some time
expected
,
arrived at Glenville. Hername not before, but after
this arrival, was Elizabeth Carlton: and she bounced
in among us, after all, by surprise, and about two o'clock
one morning. A curious figure somewhere had been
missed, and the young lady gave an unexpected notice in
some mysterious way of her intention to join our colony,
precisely one week too soon: a common case I am
informed
with all that have the right of primogeniture;
others, are better arithmeticians.
It had been arranged that our worthy friend Dr. Sylvan
of Woodville, should honour Glenville with a visit on this
occasion: but now, about nine o'clock, P. M., Dick was
scampering away at the nominal rate of six miles per hour,
towards Spiceburgh, with a pressing invitation for the
company
of the learned Professor Pillbox, a member of the
faculty, and who boarded with our friend Josey, P. M.
[36]
[36]
Let no one think Josey was P. M. in both senses: the sentence might
have been altered to prevent this injurious mistake, but it was found
easier to add a note.
This change of medical gentlemen arose from the urgency
of the case, as Spiceburgh was not so far as Woodville.
No one in this
very
enlightened era can possibly think we
trusted Dick to deliver the request(although if a
four-legged
being could have done so, Dick was he or it)but
still, to prevent misapprehension and the sarcasm of the
increasing critical acumen of the times, we now state that
John Glenville went with Dick; and hence, about three
o'clock in the morning, they returned, having secured the
professor and another horse.
This person(of course, the doctor)not being
honoured
with any other skin or parchment than the one he was
born in, we, like the Great Unknown, the North American
College of Health of Yankeysville, do, by the native right
of every white-born American, our ownselves dignify with
the title of Professor. And never was title more
appropriate
,
as he professed even more than Brandreth's Pills! He
could cure warts!eradicate corns!remove pimples!
and obliterate moles and freckles. He knew how to
destory
beards so as to prevent shavingand how to fertilize
the most barren skull till it would produce a large crop of
black hair, in case you perferred that to red, yellow, or
flaxy! Ay, he had never-failing remedies for fevers of
every type, grade, and colourintermittent, remittent,
nonitent
,
bilious, antibilious, rebellious, red, saffron and yellow!
Hence, the Professor utterly and most indignantly scouted
Thompsonianism and all other loud-screaming quackeries of
our quacking epoch:and setting the highest value on
number one, he cared not for number six.
His language, in bold contrast to his figure, was by that
very comparison heightened in its magniloquence; we
mean his medical diction, for other he rarely indulged in,
because language about common affairs was too small for his
large utterance. His were lofty words, and demanded a
lofty subject; and that his profession was, and admitted an
amazing technical grandiloquence. Professor Pillbox, M. D.,
was exactly one yard, one foot and ten incheslow. The
Professor's horse, on the contrary, was remarkably high,
large and spirited. When, therefore, the Professor was
seated on his saddle, and safely ensconced between two
hugeous leathern cartouch-boxes made for bottles, barks,
lint, forceps, &c., and above all, for the pills and powders,
and the like cartridges, for his principal execution, he
seemed
not dissimilar to a monkey-shaped excrescence growing
to the back of the steed! Now his modus loquendi was
truly gigantic! and not only did he always spout forth the
hardest technicalities, but even these laden with
additimentalities
and elongated elaborifications of sesquipedalia:
which last he would freely have bought of us if not for
silver
,
yet for trade and in exchange for what he always
styled his medicamentums!
Poultices, with Professor Pillbox, were always cataplasms
and the patient who had only barked his shins, was
always
greatly terrified on hearing that there was manifest
12*
symptomatic manifestationst hrough the outer exterior
epidermis
of his having infracted the tibia!for the poor
wretch at once gave over his legs as ruined after that
awful
sentence on them! Doses of salts were never mixed
with water and swallowed in our Professor's practice, but
he prepared an aquatical solution of the sulphate of
magnesia
,
and thenexhibited it!i. e. made the patient
look at it
before he drank. In this way the disagreeable
taste was properly increased, and so, to speak in style, the
medicamentum seemed to act with still greater potential
efficacity:for indeed, some robustious stomachs out there
that would never have budged at the plain dose, were pretty
well stirred by an aquatical solution!proving the virtue
of words.
Our friend never bled a manhe only opened a vein!
nor did he ever feel a pulse without parading a huge
silver watch, and seeming, with the care-worn and ominous
brow of Jupiter, (in Virgil,) to be counting the motions of
the second hand:a curious contrast to Death with an
hour-glass! although to some nervous patients nearly as
frightful.
One of our neighbour women, who was often ailing, used
to send for Aunt Kitty to tell her what the Doctor meant;
whence Aunt Kitty came to be regarded nearly as high
larn'd as the little doctur hisself, and was elsewhere in
demand as the little doctur's intarpretur: but she always
resisted persuasions to set up docterin herself, telling
the folks one old woman was enough in the Purchase.
An honest woodsman went once with a severe tooth-ache
to Spiceburgh, when the Professor, after a long examination
of the patient's mouth, declared with a very solemn little
phiz that, an operation in dental surgery seemed
necessary
in order to extract two of the principal molares!
At which the affrighted sufferer said, he was in
powerful
pain, and didn't kere to let the Doctur pull out a couple
of his darn'd rottin back 'teethbut he'd rather bear the
tooth-ache a hull year nor have the
dentul suggery
or the
principul mol'lerees
ither done on his mouth.
[37]
[37]
Finally, one tooth was pulled, the other broken offand half and
half, is all
Steam doctoring
doescures one and kills another!
The Professor did not rely on symtoms
in
the morbid
body itself: for instance, he rested not satisfied with the
inspection of the tongue, which he always had
protruded
instead of vulgarly
put-out
of the mouth; but he wisely
kept two keen eyes out on the watch for external
symptoms
,being
well disposed to that way of judging, which
determines, if a saddle is
under
the bed, that the person
in
the bed is sick, or dead, from eating the horse. Hence, on
the present occasion, he came at once to a very infallible
judgment of the case, wholly by external symptoms; for
on hearing an infantile cry, which had commenced just an
hour before his arrival, and broken out at intervals since,
he instantly concluded, and without feeling any body's
pulse,or inspecting any body's tongue, or asking a question,
but with a very grand and imposing air, saidthat the
lady was as well as could be expected! But he learned,
however, a very useful piece of knowledge, viz.that
there is at least another thing beside time and tide that
waits for nobody.
Still, it was quite edifying to witness the anxious
bustling
,
and to hear the learned remarks of our dwarf
Esculapius
;
who, among other things, was constrained to
acknowledge
thatunassisted nature had yet mighteous
potential efficacity of her own intrinsic internal force, and
that she sometimes required only the co-elaborative aid of
a skilful practitioner to conduct to a felicitary tendency
her wonderful designs! Hence he would only order
now the exhibition of a few grains of his soporific
sleep-producing
powder, to induce a state of somnorific
quiescence
!!because
he was decidedly of opinion that with
proper care and no misfortunate reactions, the lady would
without dubiety become convalescent in the ordinary
time!!!
And, would you believe it, dear reader?all came to
pass precisely as he predicted!and stranger yet to tell,
without the aid of the soporific powder! For that, by a
a blameable negligence, Mr. C. himself, who was charged
withthe exhibition, never mixed!! But then to atone
and for fear some living creature might accidentally
swallow
the exhibition all at once, and so sleep too long, we
very considerately the next day put the whole paper of
somnorific quiescence into the fire.
In the morning, after a very early breakfast, Professor
Pillbox, having received the usual fee for his invaluable
aid in enliving the western solitudes, leaped with amazing
agility on his mountainous horse; which he, indeed, styled
a quadrupedal conveyancer; and was quickly peering
over his cartouch-boxes on the way to Spiceburgh.
But, reader!beware of calling this mighty little
personage
a quack: for he had, if not a diploma from a college,
a regular
license
from the State! Oh! the potential
efficacity
of a true Republican legislature! What can it not
achieve? By a mere vote, or a legal wish and volition, it
can out of nothingyes,
ex-nihilo!
or next to nothing
create any and every man a lawyera physician!a
teacher!or even a
Jack-ass!!
And these creations all
become the greatest of their sorts!greater even than the
very legislators that first made them!streams getting
higher than their fountain!
No, no, reader, our Professor, like others of the kind,
had so great an abhorrence of quackery, that he would not
allow Josey Jackson, his landlord, to keep a single duck!
And two years after the Hon. J. Glenville's services ended,
when Professor Pillbox himself was sent to the House, he
had influence sufficient to procure by a unanimous vote,
the passage of the following resolution, and which
remained
in full force when we left the Purchase:viz.
Resolved:that no
quacks
but those that are
licensed
,
shall recover the amount of their medical fees by law.
Vide Journals of the House, VI. Fol. p. 95.
CHAPTER XXX.
Instant in season and out of season.
The
future historian of the Western church may learn,
from this chapter, that the company of believers of which
Mr. Hilsbury was a bishop, whenever about three or four
such can be found, form an ecclesiastical court, with
spiritual
jurisdiction over a given district. A court of this
kind was constituted his autumn in Glenville at the
episcopal
residence. The smallest legitimate number of clergy
composed it, and every reverend gentleman was honoured
with an office:Mr. Hilsbury was made President, Mr.
Shrub, of Timberopolis, Clerk, and Mr. Merry, (a bishop,
in transitu,) Treasurer. And thus was shown, after all,
the practicability of Locke's celebrated Fundamental
Constitution
of Carolina, found impracticable in Sayle's
province
,the
offices and dignities requiring every man in the
colony.
Mr. Welden, Sen., and some other excellent old
woodsmen
,
had seats as lay delegates. These, however, managed
only the secular business of the Assembly; for instance,
such as to bring in a pitcher of water, keep a small fire
alive on the hearth, and contribute each twenty-five cents
cash
to the sub-treasury. Farther east, I am told, lay
delegates
are even more useful, volunteering to let down
bars, open gates and the like, between the lodgings of the
clergy and the chapel where the court is in session.
Normally
,
it is
said
, the lay and clerical delegates are on equal
footing in the House, both having a right to talk either
sense or nonsense as long as they see fit; and yet, in
practice
,
the lay members are not considered as on a par with
the clerical ones. For instance, in debates, discussions
and so forth, the commoners are never calledbrother,
except collectively under the appellation, brethren; and
even then prime reference is intended to the clergy. But
the commoners are termed variously, as the worthy
person
or memberthe good old man that has just spoken
Esquire CleverlyLawyer Counselton, &c. &c.:
yet mostly they are all spoken to and about as plain
Mister.
In my wanderings I have, indeed, stumbled into
assemblies
of their sort composed of Misters and Brothers, where
qualified lay gentlemen chose freely to exercise their
privileges
,
and where the person or the worthy old man
has so spoken and argued a subject as to lead the assembly
to adopt measures much more common-sense-like and
democratical
than some, and especially the younger
brethren
at first contemplated. Nay, an acute and eloquent
Mister occasionally would be seen to demolish a rash
brother; or in our parlance out thereto use him up.
Hence, being myself a reformed democrat, this admixture
of Misters and Brothers in ecclesiastical Houses, did upon
the whole then strike me as the best and very best form of
religious associations for our republican institutions; and
then it occurred that if the lay delegates would always
qualify themselves properly and use judiciously and boldly
all their ecclesiastical privileges, that both State and
Church would even be more benefitted than ever by these
true republican bodies.
[38]
[38]
The clergy of such bodies do earnestly insist on all this in their
lay delegates, both for religious, and secular and state reasons: and,
it may be added, that when the reader ascertains what ecclesiastical
bodies have done most for civil liberty and universal freedom, he can
venture to guess at the body in our text.
We beg leave now to introduce more especially to the
reader
,
the President of the Court, the Rt. Rev. Brother Bishop
Hilsbury. Besides being pastor of the Welden Parish, he was
missionary bishop over a vast diocese, through which he
was ever riding, preaching, lecturing, praying and
catechising
,
and beyond which he often made excursions, to
bestow
gratuitous and extra labour on the Macedoniansi. e.
wilderness folks that had no bishop to care for them. His
public discourses averaged, therefore, one a day, to say
nothing of baptisms, visits to sick, funeral services, cum
multis aliis: and the miles he rode were about one hundred
each week, or somewhere near five thousand annually!
indeed, like other laborious missionaries in the West, he
lived on horseback. And when at home, a few days each
month, he retired not to his study, as he fain would have
done, but he betook himself to his cornfield: and not
rarely
he wielded an axe in his clearing or deadening
working
,
in short, not like a nigger, but a galley slave.
Negroes
,
under kind and judicious masters, work only little
more than the half of every day; a western bishop works
all day and part of the night. Brother Hilsbury was in
many perilsin the wildernessin the floodand among
false brethren; we subjoin a specimen of each sort: and
Firstlywe are to discourse of the Wilderness. Part
of an unsettled forest was once to be crossed by him to
reach a new settlement where he had engaged to bestow
some extra clerical labour. The path was nearly
impassable
;
and at sunset he was alone in the wilds, and more
than fourteen miles from the intended place. About dark,
he came to a deserted Indian hovel, where he resolved to
put up, rather than camp-out or travel in the dark;
and accordingly he dismounted, stripped his horse and
secured
him by halter and bridle; and then had barely time
to get under the shelter of the half-roofless shantee, before
a tempest, long gathering its pitchy blackness, burst around
in floods of rain and flashes of keen fire with its appalling
thunder. By the glare, however, of the lightning, a rude
clap-board bedstead was discerned fastened to a side of the
hut, and on this fixture, after feeling with the end of his
whip if any chance snake was coiled in that nest, our
primitive bishop laid his saddle and other gear; and then
on and surrounded by these, passed that dreary night as
comfortably aspossible; and hungry, wet, and
melancholy
.
Having thus spoken briefly
to
our first head, we pass
to the consideration of the second thing proposed, which
was
Peril by Flood. Here, by way of preface, it may be
remarked
,
that reverend gentlemen intended for New
Purchase
bishoprics, ought unto all their Christian gifts and
graces to addthe art of swimming. For want of this,
Bishop H. was in jeopardy oft of his life. Indeed,
considering
his inability to swim, he was, my dear brethren, a
little rash; for in his company we have several times come
to creeks broad and muddy with back-water from a
neighbouring river, where the speaker, although a swimmed,
refused to enter; but our bishop either having more faith
or more courage, would, spite of all remonstrances, plunge
in, horse foremost, venturing on till the turbid waves
reached
his saddle skirts and the tail(of his horse)began to
float! And that being symptomatic of a swimming head
nay, of a whole bodyour friend would return but still
reluctant
:
and we would then proceed up the stream till
beyond
the influence of the back water.
At the time of his perilous-peril, Mr. H. was in company
with the Rev. Mr. Widdersarch, who also could not swim.
A large creek was raging with its swollen waters across their
way, rendering it necessary to cross or return; unless like
sop's wise man they should wait the subsidence of the
flood. But that might be a long time yet, the waters still
rising; and beside it was absolutely necessary to go onas
it always is when people are going anywhere, especially a
western minister, who usually, after riding many long miles,
and fording and swimming many dangerous creeks, to keep
with punctuality a gratuitous appointment, finds at the
preaching cabin a large congregation ofsix: viz. the man
and his wife, with three little children and a help. For, of
course this thimblefull of folks would be too disappointed,
if the minister came not! And hence, valuable men feel
bound to be punctual out there, always at the risk of their
health, and not rarely their very lives.
The discussion in the present emergency soon ended by
the plunging of both brethren into the water; deeper,
indeed
,
than had been presumed! How deep was difficult
to say, the horses for some reason or other beginning to
swim immediately on entering the creekperhaps,
however
,
unlike Dick, they could not resist a bloated stream
till the water went over their backs! Every thing proper
and customary was done with the ministerial legs to keep
the limbs dry; yet at the first souse those important
appendages
were unpacked, all their capabilities being
required
to hold on the ridersand nothing was now visible
above the turbid waters save two snorting horse heads,
followed
by two human heads and busts.
And now the saddle-bags of Mr. Widdersarch, not being
rightly secured to the stirrup-leathers, floated off the saddle,
and, like hard ridden demagogues, went down with the
stream; upon which the owner not only made a very
desperate
and very unsuccessful effort to arrest the articles,
but was, alas! by that very effort himself soused headlong
into the boiling waters! How, Mr. Widdersarch could
never tell, yet at the moment of his fall(like Palinurus
grasping part of a helm in a fall from another poop)he
felt and clutched with drowning energy, the floating tail of
his horse!and holding to that he was carried safely till
his feet rested on the bottom. During all this Mr. Hilsbury
was in advance; but while he heard the fall and the cry
of his friend, he could render no assistance, having the
greatest difficulty to retain even his own seat; and by the
time he had reached the opposite bank in safety, his friend
could stand on the earth with his head above water;
seeing
then the saddle-bags whirling in an eddy, Mr. H.
hurried
with a long pole to a point whence it was thought the
leathery apparatus might be arrested. In his eagerness to
hook the bags as he leaned over the bank, that treacherous
bank gave way, and our excellent bishop himself was now
struggling for life in the whirlpool!
He was a man more than six feet high; yet in vain did
he try to stand on the bottom of his maelstroom, and hold up
his head in the world!until driven violently against the
bank he managed with
coolness
certainly, if not presence
of mind, to clutch in one hand some roots in its side and
with the other and his feet to stick to its mud, till Mr.
Widdersarch
,
now landed, hastened to his assistance. In the
meantime, the saddle-wallets despairing of all rescue had
taken fresh start for some other port; but our involuntary
baptists running with poles to the next headland, were there
successful with their baitless bobbing, and had the
satisfaction
of rescuing, and maybe from a watery grave, the
well-soaked conveniences! And so ends our second
lesson
.
The last trial was one of equanimity and patience
more difficult to endure, however, than the other sorts.
Our friend, as has been often intimated, was forced to work
literally with his own hands. On one occasion he was
ploughing; when, to save his feet from injury, he had
encased
or buried them in a pair of ungainly cow-hide shoes,
with exterior seams, like those of a hose, (viz: a leather
fire-engine,) such as no primitive apostle ever wore, and
most modern eastern parsons certainly never saw. They
had, indeed, been made at our tannery by a volunteer
shoemaker
(such as a legislature will create some of these
days, when it is determined by them that every man may be
his own shoemaker,) so that they looked for all the world
as if they were vegetables and had grown on a shoe-tree!
Moreover, our clerical ploughman, like Cincinnatus, had
on no toga, and was in the state boys call, barelegged, or
to speak with modesty and taste, his limbs were destitute
of hose (or hoses.)
Now, in this fix, will any man of broadcloth and
French calf-skin, conjecture that our Rector's outer man
exhibited signs of worldly pride? And yet, my dear
brethren
,
the keen eyes of a parishioner saw pride in those
shoes!
Impossible! unless it was deemed a pharisaical
humility
,
or a papistical penance.
No, no! but on the contrary, the penance was not deemed
severe enough: for this Christian mister on finding his
bishop thus ploughing, reported through the whole
diocese
that
Mr. Hilsbury was a most powerful proud man, as he
actially ketch'd him a ploughing withhis shoes on!
I conclude, therefore, this discourse by asking you, dear
brethren, what would have happened if the Rt. Rev.
Bishop
Hilsbury had in preaching sported a white
handkerchief
and black silk gloves? or, horrible dictu (i.e.
tell it not
in Gath
) had he worn ruffles? Be assured we had some
rough and hard Christians out there who would have
deemed him an emissary of Satan, and one that deserved
burning on a log-heap!
Permit me next to introduce the clerk of the court
Bishop Shrub. Of this gentleman we shall merely say, that
if a profound and an extensive acquaintance with all the
important
and various subjects of ecclesiastical learning,
together
with uncommon research in most other kinds; if the
command of elegant style in writing, and the power of rich
and copious elocution in preaching; if a pious and a
conscientious
mind, an ardent zeal in the service of his Master,
and incessant labours for the good of men; if the most
engaging
and winning manners in conversation; if all these
and similar excellences, possess charms, then would the
reader have rejoiced to know Bishop Shrub, and would have
classed and cherished him among the most highly
estimated
friends.
As Mr. Merry will speak for himself in this chapter, the
reader may say what he thinks of this person after reading
his Buckeye Sermon, delivered at Forster's Mills.
Among the dogmata of the New Purchase Council, it
was ordained that Brothers Shrub and Merry should
perform
a missionary tour of some weeks between 41 and
42 N. latitude, and in a region destitute of any spiritual
instruction
;
a region indeed almost destitute, it proved, of
inhabitants too, the thin sprinkle having, in all
probability
sought a place free from all trammels, political as well
as ecclesiastical. The brethren took neither purse nor scrip,
and expected no present reward farther than the pleasure
of doing good; and yet they laboured as if in expectation
of being at the end of the tour, thrown into a modern
[39]
[39]
A real rite-dity church and state
bishop.
bishop's seenot of glass, but of silver and gold and other
clinking evils. Having myself long desired to visit the
country now laid out as missionary ground, I begged
permission
to join the party; which request being cheerfully
granted, away we started asmissionarieshem! See
then, reader, how we apples swim!
During the excursion, three discourses were delivered
daily, the ministers alternately preaching, and the times
being
usually 10 o'clock, A.M., 2 o'clock, P.M., and 5 o'clock
in the evening. In proceeding up the river (the Big
Gravelly
)
appointments were left for our return, and also sent
on before us, by any chance person found going towards the
polar circle. Nor ever did any one show reluctance to
bear the message; although on overtaking once a
woodsman
,
and begging him to name some place where we could
preach next day, at 10 o'clock, he replied:
Well, most sartinly, I'll give out preachin for any
feller-critturs
whatseverand Forster's saw-mill is jist about the
best place in all these partsbut I sorter allow 'taint no
use no how much, as folks in them diggins isn't powerful
gospel greedy. And then, excusing
himself
from hearing
Bishop Shrub that same evening, he rode suddenly down
an abrupt bank of the river, and plunged into water, barely
admitting his large horse to go over without swimming,
yet he faithfully made the appointment for his
feller-critturs
at the mill, although of our neighbour himself we
never saw more.
Our churches of course, were usually cabins, our pulpits
chairs; but the church at Forster's saw-mill deserves
special
commemoration from the odd oddity of the place, the
audience, and the sermon of Brother Merry.
The church was literally in the mill; nor was this a
frame building painted red, with flocks of pigeons careering
round, or perched on its dormer windows, or strutting and
billing and cooing and pouting along the horizontal spout;
while, on a neighbouring elevation stood a commodious
stone house, the owner's and mason's names handsomely
done on a smooth stone near the summit of its gable; and
smiling meadows stretched away along the dancing waters
concomitants rendering a mill so enchanting in old
countries
!
no: no:here was a naked, unplanked, saw-mill!
a roof of boards twisted, warped and restless, on the top of
a few posts; the prominent objects being the great wheel,
the saw itself, and the log in the very act of transition into
plank and scantling!
No human dwelling was in sight, and it was afterwards
found that the owner and his men lived three miles from
the mill; that they went home but once or twice in the
week, eating during the day, when hungry, of cold corn and
pork, and sleeping during the night in the snuggest corner
of the mill-shed, and drinking both day and night when
thirsty or otherwise, freely of water andwhiskey. For
prospect around was an ugly, half-cleared clearing, with
piles of huge logs, not to be burned, however, but sawed.
The dam was invisible. A large square trough conducted
a portion of the Big Gravelly river to its scene of paltry
labour
;
and there the water, after leaping angrily from the
end of its wooden channel, and indignantly whirling a great
lubberly, ill-made, clattering wheel, as in derision of its
architect
,
hurried impatient along a vile looking ditch, half
choked with weeds and grass, to remingle with the
sparkling
,
free stream below!
Meeting, then, was to be held on a few loose planks,
constituting the floor, laid
ad capsisum!
The pulpit was
to be the near end of the log, arrested for a time in its
transformation
to lumber; while at the far end was to be the
congregationat least the sinners, who might sit, or lean,
or recline, or stand, as suited convenience. The
congregation
was big of its size, consisting of the saw-miller, Mr.
Forster, and Mr. Forster's two menand also, three
hunters
,
who accidentally hunting in the neighbourhood, had
chanced to stop just now at the millin all six sinners;
more, however, than are allowed in a Puseyite cathedral,
where conversions are unfashionable!
As we rode up, a few minutes before ten o'clock, the
saw was gnashing away its teeth at the far end of the log,
nor did it cease till we had entered the shed; and then, the
owner unwillingly stopped the performance, seeming by his
manner to sayCome, let's have your preaching
powerful
quick, the saw wants to be cutting agin. This was
far from encouraging, yet Mr. Merry, whose turn was to
preach, began his preparations, observing in a conciliatory
way, that he would not hinder his friends very long, but
that we felt it would not be right to pass any settlement
where the neighbours were kind enough to give us an
opportunity
of preaching. The preacher's manner so far
won on our sullen congregation, that Mr. Forster and two
others took seats in a row on their end of the log; while
two leaned themselves against the saw-frame, and one
against an adjoining post: Brother Shrub and Mister
Carlton
sat among the saints at the pulpit-end of the log, like
good folks and penitents in churches with altars.
In this combination of adverse circumstances, great as
was our confidence in Mr. Merry, who was as used to this
sort of matters as are eels to skinning, we feared for his
success to-day. Yet he began seemingly unembarrassed,
holding a small testament, in which was concealed a piece
of paper, size of a thumb, and pencilled with some half a
dozen words constituting the parson's notes! And notes in
the New Purchase and the adjacent parts are always
concealed
by preachers who use them; for the use of such
argues to most hearers there is a want of heart religion;
beside that no place is found in our pulpits to spread out
written discourses. To have used in Forster's
mill-meeting
to day, any other than the thumb-paper just named,
would have been considerably worse than ridiculousit
would have deserved a scratch or so from Mr. Forster's
saw-teeth; or what is next to it, a scourging from Lord
Bishop Baltimore.
Brother Merry quickly perceived that even the plainest
and almost child-like topics with suitable language and
illustrations
failed to preserve his
spectators
' attention. One
man began to look at the ditch where now the water was
trickling along with a subdued voice; another, to cut a
clapboard with his scalping knife; and Mr. Forster looked
wistfully at his saw, evidently more desirous to hear its
music than both our preachers' voices together. Something
desperate must then be attempted to arrest attention, or
hope of doing good at present abandoned. For while true
that men cannot hear without a preacher, it does not follow
that they will always hear with one: and hence Mr.
Merry
,
after some vain attempts to convert spectators into
auditors
,
suddenly stopped as if done
preaching
, and as if
talking
,
commenced thus:
My friends and neighbours don't you all shoot the
rifle in this settlement? That shot
was
central: it even
startled the Rev. Shrub and myself. The man using up
the clap-board looked like an excited doghis very ears
seeming on full cock; and Mr. Forster was so interested
that he answered in the affirmative by a nod. So I
thought. No hardy woodsman is ignorant of that weapon
the noble death-dealing rifle. Ay! with that and the bold
hearts and steady hands and sharp eyes of backwoodsmen,
what need we fear any
human
enemies. (Approving
smiles from all accompanied with nods and winks)And
no doubt you all go to shooting matches?(Assent by a
unanimous nod and wink)Yes! yes! it would be
strange if you never went. Now, my dear friends, I have
no doubt some of you are first-rate marksmen, and can drive
the centre off-hand a hundred honest yards. (Here one
man on the congregational end of the log stood right up, and
with a look and manner equivalent to I'm jist the very
feller what can do that.Ay! I see it in your looks.
I'm fond of shooting a little myself; 'tis very excitingand
when I indulge in shooting, I have to keep a
powerful
guard
over my heart and temper. For don't we feel ourselves,
neighbours, a right smart chance better than persons that
can't shoot at all? Perhaps we feel a sort of glad when a
neighbour makes worse shots than ourselvesperhaps we
even secretly hope the man firing against us may miss, or
that something may happen to spoil his chance? And then,
when we make good shots, don't we walk about sometimes
and brag a littleeven while we hate to hear any body
else bragging? Come, my honest friends, don't we all on
such occasions do some things, and say some things, and
wish some things, that when we get home, and are alone,
and begin to think over the day, make us feel sorry about
our conduct at the shooting? Come, we are all friends and
neighbours here, to-dayaint it so? (Several nods in
assentbut no smiles as at firstwith fixed attention, and
a go-on-Mr. Preacher-look, at the far end of the log)Yes,
yes, my dear friends, it is sothat is honest and noble in
us to confess: now there is a rule in this Bookyou all
know what it isa rule saying, that we ought to do to
others, what we, in the same circumstances, would wish
them to do to us. And surely, that is a most glorious and
excellent rule! Well, don't we often forget this rule at a
shooting match? and in more ways than one! And again,
every sensible man well knows how mean pride is, and
we all despise the proudand yet, aint we guilty ourselves
of something like pride at a shooting match?
Well, it seems, then, by our own
allowing
, we may be
secretly guilty of some bad and mean things, even when
we are not openly wicked and guilty, say of
swearing
(shot at a venture)or maybe
drunkenness
(one of the
sinners stole a look at the whiskey jug)or any other bad
Vol. I.13
practice; and we see, a man in his heart may be very
proud like, and hate his neighbour, even if we do wear
homespun, and live in a cabin. (The brethren were
neatly, but very plain clad). Ah! dear friends, our hearts,
mine as well as yours, are much worse than we usually
thinkand a shooting match is a place to make us find out
some of our sins and wickedness. You all know, how as
we are going through a clearing, we sometimes see a heap
of ashes at an old log heapand at first it all seems cold
and dead, but when we stir it about with a piece of brush,
or the end of a ram-rod, up flash sparks, and smoke, too,
comes out. Well, 'tis exactly so with our natural hearts.
They conceal a great deal of wickedness, but when they
are stirred up by any thing like a shooting-match, or when
we get angry, or are determined to have money or a
quarter
section of land at all hazardsah! my dear friends,
how many wicked thoughts we have! how many wicked
words we say! how many wicked things we do! (Winks
and nods had ceasedthere was something in the
benevolence
,
and earnestness, and tenderness of our preacher's
voice and manner, that kept attention rivetted; and it was
plain enough, conscience was busy at, I believe, both ends
of the log.) Well! now, my friends and neighbours, do
our own hearts condemn us and make us ashamed? Look
up to yon blue sky above usthat is God's sun shining
there! Hark! the leaves are moving in the treesit is
God's breath that stirs them! and that God is here! Ay!
that God is now looking down into our very hearts! He
sees what we now think, and he knows all we have
concealed
there! That glorious law we spoke of in this book,
that we have so often broken, is his law! Friends!would
we be willing to die at this very instant? And yet die we
all must at some instant; and if we repent not and seek
forgiveness through our Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ
you, dear neighbours, I myself, and every one of us
must perish andfor ever!
[40]
[40]
I can never forget how that word rang out into the adjacent forest
nor the echo returned, as if sent back from the invisible spirit land
for ever!
I shall not repeat any more of of Mr. Merry's discourse.
His point was gained. Attention was fixed; salutary
convictions
were implanted in the auditors minds; and they
evidently increased in depth and intensity as the preacher
proceeded. Nay, when he in a strain of peculiar and wild
and impassioned eloquence, dwelled on the only way of
escape
from divine wrath through the blessed Son of God,
our poor foresters gazed on his face with tears in their
eyes, and remained till the conclusion of the services,
without even the smallest symptom of impatience.
When meeting was out, the woodsmen cordially shook
hands with us all, and especially with Mr. M.; and
expressed
a unanimous wish to have, if possible, another meeting
at the Saw Mill. Bishop Shrub was so tenderly affected
that as we rode away and had got beyond hearing at the
Mill, he exclaimed:Amen to that shooting, Brother
Merry
!
we shall never in this life see again these poor men
but the effect of this day's preaching must be lasting as
their lives: surely we shall meet them in Heaven!
Little specially interesting occurred after this, till our
return
was commenced. And then early one bright morning
we turned aside to visit a deserted Indian town. A few
wigwams in ruins were the only habitations left for the
living: but in a sequestered loneliness on the margin of
the river, we found by the swelling mounds and other
marks of sepulture that we walked amid the habitations of
the dead! I have ever been deeply moved by the sorrows
and the injuries of the Indianever since childhoodbut
now so unexpectedly among their gravesthe sacred graves
around which Indians linger till the last! which they
so mourn after when exiled far away in their wanderings!
when we looked on the pure white waters where the bark
canoe had glided so noiseless; and heard the wind so
sweet and yet so sad, like moaning spirits, over the tall
grass and through the treesa feeling so mournful, so
desolate came over the soul, that I walked hastily away to
a still more lonely spot, and there sat down and cried as if
my heart were breaking for its own dead!
When we rejoined one another tears were in the eyes
of all! None spokethe white man's voice seemed dese
cration! We were true mourners over those graves.
Poor Indians! at that solemn moment it was in our hearts
to live, and wander and die with you in the forest home
to spend life in teaching you the way of salvation! Blessed!
blessed! be ye, noble band of missionaries, who do all
this!ye shall not loose your reward!
To-day the evening service was in the neighbourhood of
Mr. Redwhite, for many years a trader among the Indians.
He being present insisted on our passing the night at his
house. We consented. For forty years he had lived
among the aborigines, and was master of five or six Indian
languages; having adopted also many of their opinions on
political and religious points, and believing with the natives
themselves and not a few civilized folks, that the Indians
have had abundant provocations for most of their misdeeds.
Hence, Mr. Redwhite and Mr. Carlton soon became
powerful
thicki. e. very intimate friends.
The most interesting thing in Mr. Redwhite's
establishment
,
was his Christian or white wife. She, in infancy,
had escaped the tomahawk at the massacre of Wyoming,
and afterwards had been adopted as a child of the Indian
tribe. Our friend's heathen or red wife was a full-blooded
savagess(the
belle
and the
savage
;)and had deserted
her husband to live with her exiled people: and so Red
white, poor fellow! was a widower with one wifeviz.
this Miss Wyoming! Much of this lady's life had passed
among the Canadian French: and she was, therefore,
mistress
of the Indian, the French, and the English; and also
of the most elegant cookery, either as regards substantial
dishes or nicnacry. And of this you may judge, when we
set on supper. But first be it said our host was rich, not
only for that country but for this: and though he lived in a
cabin, or rather a dozen cabins, he owned tracts of very
valuable land presented to him by his red lady's tribe
territory enough in fact to form a darling little state of his
own, nearly as small as Rhode Island or Delaware. Beside,
he owned more real silversilver done into plate, and some
elaborately and tastefully graved and chased, than could be
found even in a pet bank, when dear old Uncle Sam
[41]
[41]
This affectionate old gentleman gets into a dotage occasionally;
or at least some of his friends who undertake to be the government,
so represent him. But he is a clever feller himself.
sent
some of his cronies to look for it.
Well, now the eatables and drinkables. We had tea,
black and green, and coffeeall first chop and superbly
made, regaling with fragrance, and their delicacy aided by
the just admixture of appropriate sugars, together with
richest
cream:the additamenta being handed on a silver
waiter and in silver bowls and cups. The decoctions and
infusions themselves were poured from silver spouts
curving
gracefully from massy silver pots and urns. Wheat
bread of choice flour and raised with yeast, formed, some
into loaves and some into rolls, was present, to be spread
with delicious butter rising in unctuous pyramids, fretted
from base to apex into a kind of butyrial shell work:this
resting on silver and to be cut with silver. Corn, too,
figured in pone and pudding, and vapoured away in little
clouds of steam; while at judicious intervals were handed
silver plates of rich and warm flannel or blanket cakes,
13*
with so soft and melting an expression as to win our most
tender regards. There stood a plate of planed venison,
there one of dried beef; while at becoming distances were
large china dishes partly hid under steaks of ham and
venison
done on gridirons, and sending forth most fragrant
odours:so that the very hounds, and mastiffs and
wolf-dogs
of the colony were enticed to the door of our supper
cabin by the witchery of the floating essence!
But time would fail to tell of the bunnsand jumbles
and sponge cakeand fruit dittoand pound alsoand
silver basketsand all these on cloth as white assnow!
Reader! was ever such contrast as between the
untutored
world around and the array, and splendour, and
richness
of our sumptuous banquet? And all this in an Indian
country! and prepared by almost the sole survivor from a
massacre that extinguished a whole Christian village!
How like a
dream
this!
And thou wast saved at Wyoming! Do I look on thee?
upon whose innocent face of infancy years ago gushed
the warm blood of the mother falling with her babe locked
to her bosom! Didst thou really hear the fiendish yells of
that night?when the flames of a father's house revealed
the forms of infuriate ones dancing in triumph among the
mangled corses of their victims! Who washed the
congealed
gore from thy cheek? And what barbarian nurse
gave strange nourishment from a breast so responsive to
the bloody call of the warwhoop that made thee motherless?
and now so tenderly melting at the hunger cries of the
orphan
!
And she tied thee to a barken cradle and bore thee
far, far away to her dark forest haunts!and there
swinging
thee to the bending branches bade the wild winds rock
thee!and she became thy mother and there was thy
home! Oh! what different destiny thine in the sweet
village of thy birthbut for that night!
And yet, reader, this hostess was now so wholly Indian
and Canadian that when she talked of Wyoming it was
without emotion!while I was repressing tears! Alas!
she had not one faint desire to see the land of her ancestors!
Could this be Campbell's Gertrude?
CHAPTER XXXI.
Tend me to night!
May be it is the period of your duty:
Haply, you shall not see me more!
The
missionary party was dissolved at Timberopolis
and I set out for Glenville alone. One night was to be
past on the road: and I, therefore, so ordered matters as
to tarry that night with a friend, who had cordially invited
me to make his house my home in case I ever should
travel that way.
It was early in the evening when I reached his cabin,
but no one, to my surprise, appeared in answer to repeated
calls; yet there being manifest signs of inhabitants, I
dismounted
and entered the house without ceremony. And
of course I found the familybut all in bed! Yes! the
motherand every mother's son of them and daughter too:
they had the ague!
Two, indeed, were a sort of convalescent; yet eight
were too ill to sit up voluntarily. Instead, therefore of
being
ministered unto, I myself became a minister, and set
right to work, assisting the partly renovated son and
daughter in getting wood, in boiling water, and in handing
along jesuit bark, and sulphate of quinine. We three
cooked, in partnership, something for supperwhat, I never
exactly knewit was in sad contrast to the Wyoming
banquet! and that night I shared a bed with the squalid and
dejected ague-smitten son!
For the accommodation of the nine others, were four
other bedsthe sleepers averaging thus two and a quarter
per bed. In our room were two beds in the adjoining one
three: an arrangement tending to purify the air, ten of the
sleepers being sick and exhaling ftid breath. Was it
then so very surprising after all, that within one day after
reaching Glenville, our historian, having been with
missionaries
in aguish districts, and having had a comfortable
night's repose amid this aguish household, should himself
contrive to get, in the very last chapter of his first volume
the Fever and Ague? Alas! many a volume equally
promising in its beginning becomes sickly in its close: a
character perhaps of all books detailing life as it is! For
what, pray, is life itself, except a progress from elastic
infancy
to flaccid old age!from hope to disappointment!
from health to sickness!from living to dying?
Reader!(supposing
one
is this far)perhaps you have
discovered that the writer is disposed to laugh as well as
cry: not maliciouslybut in a spirit ofofGood
nature
,
Mr. Carlton? That is it, my dear reader; however,
our delicacy and good taste preferred another to praise us.
Well, we have found that such spirit, within its due bounds,
is a great help in sustaining misfortunes and adversities,
especially ourneighbour's; and it does seem a
compensative
in some natures that their melancholy states may
be followed by joyous and sunny ones. And not rarely
have our elastic tendencies lifted us from deep and miry
sloughs of despond; and even yet, after the crushing of
fond hopes, and the endurance of exceedingly weighty
griefs, we laugh even loud although in a subdued tone;
for the dear ones we laughed with in earlier days can
never, never join again their merry voice with ours!but
then even in our tears we smile, because we trust to smile
and rejoice with these again and without danger of sin,
amid serene and perfect and perpetual joys!
This premised, what was more natural than that we
should laugh at the Fever and Aguewhen our neighbours
had this twin disease? Indeed, hearing the patients
themselves
jest about it, how was it possible not to join with
them? At last I was seized with this mirth-creating
malady
myself: and of course you wish to know how I
behaved
myself. Well, at first I laughed as heartily as ever
just as I once did in the first stage of sea-sickness. And
then I took emetics, and cathartics, and herb-teas, and barks,
and bitters, and quinine, and hot toddies seasoned with
pepper
,
oh! with such winning smiles!that the folks all said
it was quite a
privilege!
hem!to wait on me!
Fye! on our hypocrisy and selfishness! all this
captivating
behaviour arose from a persuasion that it would aid
a speedy cure! And for a time the enemy seemed willing
to be smiled awaywith the coelaboration of the above
smile-creating dosesand, I do believe, we got to
laughing
more than ever. But one day after my
cure
, on
returning
from a little walk extra(with a rifle on my
shoulder)a very gentle, but rather chilly sensation
began
very ridiculously to trickle down my spineand there,
would you believe it, was our Monsheer Tonson again!
Now, be it remembered, here was a surprise and a
cowardly
and treacherous assault, if I now for the first looked
grum: besides it was evident good nature was no
permanent
cure for the ague. Nay, Dr. Sylvan told me that
once he had the ague, and repeatedly after he was
cured
the thing kept sneaking
back
and down his
back;
till on
the last occasion coming, after it had seemingly been
physicked
to death like some of the patients, he was so
incensed
at its impudence as to set to and so kick and stamp and
toss and dance and wriggle about, that the fit was
actually stormed out! and from that hour no ague, dumb,
vocal, or shaking had ever ventured near him! Had I
heard this in time, my insidious foe would have been
treated
to a similar assault and battery. But, perhaps, so
violent exercise on my part might have only accelerated
and made fatal a crisis now approaching; for soon I
became
so alarmingly ill that John Glenville was posting to
Woodville for Dr. Sylvan: but before he could have
reached that place I was raging in the delirium of fever!
Two things in the events of that dreadful night seem
worth mentioning: first, while nothing done to or for me
was known, I have to this day the most distinct
remembrance
of my phrenzy visions; and secondly, that hours
dwindled into minutes; for seeming only to shut and open
my eyes, it was said afterwards that then I had slept even
two full hours!and that my countenance and motions
indicated
a state of fearful mental agitation. In that state
two visions, each repeated and re-repeated with vivid
intensity
,
and seeming to fill spaces of time like those
marked
by flashes of lightning, were so terrific and appalling as
to force me to violent gestures and alarming outcries.
One vision was this. A gigantic cuirassier, more than
twenty feet high, and steel clad, was mounted on a
mammoth
of jet black color and glistening, and moving with the
grace and swiftness of an antelope. On the rider's left was
couched a spear in size like a beam, and its barbed point
flaming as the fires of a furnace: while in his right hand
was brandished an immense sword of scimetar shape, and
so intensely bright as to blind the beholders. To oppose
this apparition was drawn out in battle a large army, with
all the apparatus of war, swords, spears, smaller fire arms,
and the heaviest artillerythe troops being in several lines
with cannon in the centre and rifles on the wings; and all
ready with levelled weapons and burning matches
awaiting
the onset of the terrific riderDeath! Soon came a
signal flash from the heavens clothed in sackcloth looking
cloudsa kind of meteor sunlightand at its gleam the
cuirassier on his Black Mammeth, like a tempest driven
by a whirlwind, swept rushing on!the nostrils of the
strange beast dilated with fiery foam, his hoofs thundering
over the rocks and streaming fire; while the rider, upright
in the stirrups, poised with one hand his spear, and with
the other flashed his scimetar, and uttered a war-cry so
loud and clear as to reach the very heavens and appal and
confound the stoutest hearts! At this instant would I be
possessed with a strange and invincible furor, and pouring
forth shrieks and outcries in answer to the war-cry of the
warrior-spirit, I would strike with my clenched hands as if
armed with weaponswhile the army awaiting our now
combined onset raised their responsive shouts of defiance,
and then poured out against us stream after stream of fire,
with the clatter and crash and roar of many thundersbut
in vain!On, on, on we rushed!the earth shook and
groaned and broke asunder into yawning gulfs and
sulphureous
caverns!and down, down, down sank the troops,
smitten, dismayed, crushed!while the Black Mammoth,
reeling from ten thousand balls, and spears and barbed
arrows
,
with the fiendish voice of many demons, plunged
headlong into the discomfited host, and there falling with
the shock of an earthquake, crushed men, cannon, horses,
spears, into one horrible, quivering mass! Then from
amidst this ruin up sprang the giant-spirit with triumphant
shouts, and strided away to mount another Black Mammoth,
and renew with variations this battle of my exahusting
vision!
My other vision was as solemn to me as ever can be the
very article of death. Methought I lay in a little, narrow,
frail canoe, and with power neither to move nor speakyet
with as keen perceptions as if I were all senses. The
canoe itself was at the head of a gulf, tied to its bank with
a twine of thread and trembling on its violent waves; the
gulf being between walls of rock towering away up smooth
and perpendicular for many hundred feet, and running with
dark and dismal waters very swiftly towards a narrow
opening
through an adamantine rock. That opening was an
egress into an unknown, bottomless, shoreless, chaotic and
wildly tumultuating ocean!I felt myself quivering on the
current of time just as it was sweeping into Eternity!I
saw strange sights!I heard unearthly sounds! Oh! the
unutterable anguish and despair as I lay helpless and
awaited
the sundering of my cobweb tiein the twinkling of an
eye should I pass into that vast and dread unknown!
Reader! was this really sleepand did I only dream?
or was it the summoning of the spirit to see in a trance
what awaits us all? Aye! be assured our dreams are not
always dreams! A spirit-world is round usand it is
perhaps
in such visions God designs we should catch faint
glimpses of that other state? Sneer, vile Atheist
[42]
[42]
Not the reader, we hopeyet in these irreligious days it might be.
the
hour is coming when we shall sneer at thee!for the
wicked shall rise to
shame
and everlasting
contempt!
When Glenville returned from Woodville, he was
accompanied
not by Doctor Slyvan, but by the Doctor's nephew
one of the two young gentlemen of Indian grave memory.
And he brought a long paper of written and minute
directions
;
and among others, the Doctor's favourite plan of
changing the character of aguesfor making a dumb ague
speak or shake. It answered well, I believe, with all
patients
of vigorous constitution: at all events, if one could
endure it, nothing could so fairly make a dumb ague not
only shake, but speak, ay, and scream right out But when
that part of the prescription was read to me, I most
obstinately
refused to have my ague thus converted: and yet as
the bare reading made me
shiver
, doubtless, the operation
itself would have made me
shake
like an earthquake!
Sticking, therefore, to my refusal, my dumb ague, as Doctor
Sylvan predicted, stuck to me; and for twelve long
cheerless
months! Yet, here is an extract from the Doctor's
paper, so that it can be better judged whether my refusal
was altogether owing to obstinacy:
and then, as the shaking ague is
altogether
tractable, his dumb ague must be immediately changed
into the other. Carry then your patient into the passage
between the two cabins, or into the open air, and strip off
all his clothes that he may lie naked in the cold air and
upon a bare sackingand then and there pour over and
upon him successive buckets of cold spring water, and
continue
until he has a decided and pretty powerful smart
chance of a shake.
Ohhoo! ooh!(double
oo
in moon, with very strong
aspiration
)it
makes me shake now!
Well!at long last the dumb thing left me; so that I
lived to write more books than two: but we shall not say
how often we put on a damp night-cap and relapsed,
nor how apparently near what began in laughing came to
ending in tears. Only let my reader draw from this case
two practical resolutions:
Firstto cultivate a fixed determination never to get any
kind of an agueif he can help it: and
Secondly, to indulge no unseeming pleasantry when he
sees a neighbour shiver or shakeunless that neighbour
insist manfully that you shall laugh rather than cry with him.
Shortly after my first convalescence, the Hon. John
Glenville departed for the House; and there, among other
matters, he assisted in having Robert Carlton, Esq.,
appointed
one of the Trustees of the College at Woodville;
with orders to procure as soon as possible competent
professors
and teachers. For this I wrote to my friend, Charles
Clarence, then in the Theological School at Princeton,
New Jersey; but his reply belongs to our next year, and,
indeed
,
to a new era of the Purchase, and hence, we may very
appropriately end herea Chaptera Yearand a Volume.Rev. Mr. Hilsbury asqr.,you are pertiklurly invited
to atend the house of mr. Abrim Ashford asq. to injine upon
i the yoke of konjegal mattrimunny with his dater miss
Susan Ashford as wasthersday mornin next 10 aklok
before
dinner a. m.
mr. Joseph Redden
your humbell sarv't,
mr. William Welden, groomsman.
p. s. dont say nuthin about this 'ere weddin that's to
beas its to be sekritand to morrer Billy Welden's goin
to ride round and give the invitesand all your settlemint's
to be axed.